   Frantz Fanon

THE WRETCHED
OF THE EARTH
        Preface by
   JEAN-PAUL SARTRE


       Translated by
 CONSTANCE FARRINGTON




         T
      GROVE PRESS
        New York
 Copyright © 1963 by Presence Africaine

All rights reserved. No part of this book may be reproduced in any form
or by any electronic or mechanical means, including information storage
and retrieval systems, without permission in writing from the publisher,
except by a reviewer, who may quote brief passages in a review. Any
members of educational institutions wishing to photocopy part or all of
the work for classroom use, or publishers who would like to obtain
permission to include the work in an anthology, should send their
inquiries to Grove/Atlantic, Inc., 841 Broadway, New York, NY 10003.

Originally published by Francois Maspero editeur, Paris, France, under
the title Les damnes de la ierre, copyright © 1961 by Francois Maspero
editeur S.A.R.L.

Published simultaneously in Canada
Printed in the United States of America


Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 65-14196
ISBN 0-8021-5083-7


Grove Press
841 Broadway
New York, NY 10003

01 02 45 44 43 42 41 40
                      CONTENTS


Preface                                       7
Concerning Violence                          35
    Violence in the International Context    95
Spontaneity: Its Strength and Weakness      107
The Pitfalls of National Consciousness      148
On National Culture                         206
Colonial War and Mental Disorders           249
    Series A                                254
    Series B                                270
    Series C                                280
    Series D                                289
Conclusion                                  311
                         PREFACE


 Not so very long ago, the earth numbered two thousand
 million inhabitants: five hundred million men, and one
 thousand five hundred million natives. The former had
 the Word; the others had the use of it. Between the two
 there were hired kinglets, overlords, and a bourgeoisie,
 sham from beginning to end, which served as go-betweens.
 In the colonies the truth stood naked, but the citizens of
 the mother country preferred it with clothes on: the
native had to love them, something in the way mothers
are loved. The European elite undertook to manufacture
a native elite. They picked out promising adolescents; they
branded them, as with a red-hot iron, with the principles
of Western culture; they stuffed their mouths full with
high-sounding phrases, grand glutinous words that stuck
to the teeth. After a short stay in the mother country they
were sent home, whitewashed. These walking lies had
nothing left to say to their brothers; they only echoed.
From Paris, from London, from Amsterdam we would
utter the words "Parthenon! Brotherhood!" and some­
where in Africa or Asia lips would open ". . . thenon!
. . . therhood!" It was the golden age.
   It came to an end; the mouths opened by themselves;
the yellow and black voices still spoke of our humanism
                            7
8 / Preface

but only to reproach us with our inhumanity. We listened
 without displeasure to these polite statements of resent­
 ment, at first with proud amazement. What? They are
 able to talk by themselves? Just look at what we have
 made of them! We did not doubt but that they would
accept our ideals, since they accused us of not being faith­
ful to them. Then, indeed, Europe could believe in her
 mission; she had hellenized the Asians; she had created
 a new breed, the Greco-Latin Negroes. We might add,
 quite between ourselves, as men of the world: "After all,
let them bawl their heads off, it relieves their feelings; dogs
 that bark don't bite."
    A new generation came on the scene, which changed
the issue. With unbelievable patience, its writers and poets
tried to explain to us that our values and the true facts of
their lives did not hang together, and that they could
neither reject them completely nor yet assimilate them.
By and large, what they were saying was this: "You are
making us into monstrosities; your humanism claims we
are at one with the rest of humanity but your racist
methods set us apart." Very much at our ease, we listened
to them all; colonial administrators are not paid to read
Hegel, and for that matter they do not read much of him,
but they do not need a philosopher to tell them that
uneasy consciences are caught up in their own contradic­
tions. They will not get anywhere; so, let us perpetuate
their discomfort; nothing will come of it but talk. If they
were, the experts told us, asking for anything at all precise
in their wailing, it would be integration. Of course, there
is no question of granting that; the system, which depends
on overexploitation, as you know, would be ruined. But
it's enough to hold the carrot in front of their noses,
they'll gallop all right. As to a revolt, we need not worry
at all; what native in his senses would go off to massacre
the fair sons of Europe simply to become European as


they are? In short, we encouraged these disconsolate spirits
and thought it not a bad idea for once to award the Prix
Goncourt to a Negro. That was before '39.
    1961. Listen: "Let us waste no time in sterile litanies
and nauseating mimicry. Leave this Europe where they are
 never done talking of Man, yet murder men everywhere
 they find them, at the corner of every one of their own
 streets, in all the corners of the globe. For centuries they
have stifled almost the whole of humanity in the name
of a so-called spiritual experience." The tone is new. Who
 dares to speak thus? It is an African, a man from the
Third World, an ex-"native." He adds: "Europe now lives
 at such a mad, reckless pace that she is running headlong
 into the abyss; we would do well to keep away from it."
 In other words, she's done for. A truth which is not pleas­
 ant to state but of which we are all convinced, are we not,
fellow-Europeans, in the marrow of our bones?
    We must however make one reservation. When a French­
 man, for example, says to other Frenchmen, "The country
is done for"—which has happened, I should think, almost
 every day since 1930—it is emotional talk; burning with
love and fury, the speaker includes himself with his fellow-
 countrymen. And then, usually, he adds, "Unless..." His
meaning is clear; no more mistakes must be made; if his
instructions are not carried out to the letter, then and
only then will the country go to pieces. In short, it is a
threat followed by a piece of advice and these remarks are
so much the less shocking in that they spring from a na­
tional intersubjectivity. But on the contrary, when Fanon
says of Europe that she is rushing to her doom, far from
sounding the alarm he is merely setting out a diagnosis.
This doctor neither claims that she is a hopeless case—
miracles have been known to exist—nor does he give her
the means to cure herself. He certifies that she is dying,
on external evidence, founded on symptoms that he can
 10 / Preface

observe. As to curing her, no; he has other things to think
about; he does not give a damn whether she lives or dies.
Because of this, his book is scandalous. And if you mur­
mur, jokingly embarrassed, "He has it in for us!" the true
nature of the scandal escapes you; for Fanon has nothing
in for you at all; his work—red-hot for some—in what
concerns you is as cold as ice; he speaks of you often,
never to you. The black Goncourts and the yellow Nobels
are finished; the days of colonized laureates are over. An
ex-native, French-speaking, bends that language to new
requirements, makes use of it, and speaks to the colonized
 only: "Natives of all underdeveloped countries, unite!"
W h a t a downfall! For the fathers, we alone were the
speakers; the sons no longer even consider us as valid
 intermediaries: we are the objects of their speeches. Of
 course, Fanon mentions in passing our well-known crimes:
 Setif, Hanoi, Madagascar: but he does not waste his time
 in condemning them; he uses them. If he demonstrates
 the tactics of colonialism, the complex play of relations
which unite and oppose the colonists to the people of the
 mother country, it is for his brothers; his aim is to teach
 them to beat us at our own game.
    In short, the Third World finds itself and speaks to
itself through his voice. W e know that it is not a homo­
geneous world; we know too that enslaved peoples are
still to be found there, together with some who have
achieved a simulacrum of phony independence, others
who are still fighting to attain sovereignty and others
again who have obtained complete freedom but who live
under the constant menace of imperialist aggression. These
differences are born of colonial history, in other words of
oppression. Here, the mother country is satisfied to keep
some feudal rulers in her pay; there, dividing and ruling
she has created a native bourgeoisie, sham from beginning
to end; elsewhere she has played a double game: the


 colony is planted with settlers and exploited at the same
 time. Thus Europe has multiplied divisions and opposing
 groups, has fashioned classes and sometimes even racial
 prejudices, and has endeavored by every means to bring
 about and intensify the stratification of colonized so­
 cieties. Fanon hides nothing: in order to fight against us
 the former colony must fight against itself: or, rather, the
 two struggles form part of a whole. In the heat of battle,
 all internal barriers break down; the puppet bourgeoisie of
 businessmen and shopkeepers, the urban proletariat, which
 is always in a privileged position, the lumpenproletariat of
 the shanty towns—all fall into line with the stand made
 by the rural masses, that veritable reservoir of a national
 revolutionary army; for in those countries where colonial­
 ism has deliberately held up development, the peasantry,
 when it rises, quickly stands out as the revolutionary class.
 For it knows naked oppression, and suffers far more from
 it than the workers in the towns, and in order not to die
 of hunger, it demands no less than a complete demolishing
of all existing structures. In order to triumph, the national
revolution must be socialist; if its career is cut short, if
the native bourgeoisie takes over power, the new state, in
spite of its formal sovereignty, remains in the hands of
the imperialists. The example of Katanga illustrates this
quite well. Thus the unity of the Third World is not yet
achieved. It is a work in progress, which begins by the
union, in each country, after independence as before, of
the whole of the colonized people under the command
of the peasant class. This is what Fanon explains to his
brothers in Africa, Asia, and Latin America: we must
achieve revolutionary socialism all together everywhere, or
else one by one we will be defeated by our former masters.
He hides nothing, neither weaknesses, nor discords, nor
mystification. Here, the movement gets off to a bad start;
there, after a striking initial success it loses momentum;


 elsewhere it has come to a standstill, and if it is to start
 again, the peasants must throw their bourgeoisie over­
 board. The reader is sternly put on his guard against the
 most dangerous will o' the wisps: the cult of the leader
and of personalities, Western culture, and what is equally
 to be feared, the withdrawal into the twilight of past
African culture. For the only true culture is that of the
revolution; that is to say, it is constantly in the making.
 Fanon speaks out loud; we Europeans can hear him, as
 the fact that you hold this book in your hand proves; is
he not then afraid that the colonial powers may take ad­
vantage of his sincerity?
    No; he fears nothing. Our methods are out-of-date; they
can sometimes delay emancipation, but not stop it. And
do not think that we can change our ways; neo-colonial-
ism, that idle dream of mother countries, is a lot of hot
air; the "Third Forces" don't exist, or if they do they are
only the tin-pot bourgeoisies that colonialism has already
placed in the saddle. Our Machiavellianism has little pur­
chase on this wide-awake world that has run our false­
hoods to earth one after the other. The settler has only
recourse of one thing: brute force, when he can com­
mand it; the native has only one choice, between servitude
or supremacy. W h a t does Fanon care whether you read
his work or not? It is to his brothers that he denounces
our old tricks, and he is sure we have no more up our
sleeves. It is to them he says: "Europe has laid her hands
on our continents, and we must slash at her fingers till
she lets go. It's a good moment; nothing can happen at
Bizerta, at Elizabethville or in the Algerian bled* that the
whole world does not hear about. The rival blocs take
opposite sides, and hold each other in check; let us take
advantage of this paralysis, let us burst into history, forcing

  * Up-country in North Africa.—Trans.


 it by our invasion into universality for the first time. Let
 us start fighting; and if we've no other arms, the waiting
knife's enough."
    Europeans, you must open this book and enter into it.
After a few steps in the darkness you will see strangers
gathered around a fire; come close, and listen, for they
are talking of the destiny they will mete out to your
trading centers and to the hired soldiers who defend them.
They will see you, perhaps, but they will go on talking
among themselves, without even lowering their voices.
This indifference strikes home: their fathers, shadowy
 creatures, your creatures, were but dead souls; you it was
who allowed them glimpses of light, to you only did they
dare speak, and you did not bother to reply to such
zombies. Their sons ignore you; a fire warms them and
sheds light around them, and you have not lit it. Now,
at a respectful distance, it is you who will feel furtive,
nightbound, and perished with cold. Turn and turn about;
in these shadows from whence a new dawn will break, it
is you who are the zombies.
    In this case, you will say, lef s throw away this book.
Why read it if it is not written for us? For two reasons:
the first is that Fanon explains you to his brothers and
shows them the mechanism by which we are estranged
from ourselves; take advantage of this, and get to know
yourselves seen in the light of truth, objectively. Our vic­
tims know us by their scars and by their chains, and it is
this that makes their evidence irrefutable. It is enough
that they show us what we have made of them for us to
realize what we have made of ourselves. But is it any use?
Yes, for Europe is at death's door. But, you will say, we
live in the mother country, and we disapprove of her
excesses. It is true, you are not settlers, but you are no
better. For the pioneers belonged to you; you sent them
overseas, and it was you they enriched. You warned them


that if they shed too much blood you would disown them,
or say you did, in something of the same way as any
state maintains abroad a mob of agitators, agents provo-
cateurs, and spies whom it disowns when they are caught.
You, who are so liberal and so humane, who have such
an exaggerated adoration of culture that it verges on
affectation, you pretend to forget that you own colonies
and that in them men are massacred in your name.
Fanon reveals to his comrades—above all to some of
them who are rather too Westernized—the solidarity of
the people of the mother country and of their representa­
tives in the colonies. Have the courage to read this book,
for in the first place it will make you ashamed, and shame,
as Marx said, is a revolutionary sentiment. You see, I, too,
am incapable of ridding myself of subjective illusions; I,
too, say to you: "All is lost, unless . . . " As a European,
I steal the enemy's book, and out of it I fashion a remedy
for Europe. Make the most of it.
   And here is the second reason: if you set aside Sorel's
fascist utterances, you will find that Fanon is the first
since Engels to bring the processes of history into the
clear light of day. Moreover, you need not think that
hotheadedness or an unhappy childhood has given him
some uncommon taste for violence; he acts as the inter­
preter of the situation, that's all. But this is enough to
enable him to constitute, step by step, the dialectic which
liberal hypocrisy hides from you and which is as much
responsible for our existence as for his.
   During the last century, the middle classes looked on
the workers as covetous creatures, made lawless by their
greedy desires; but they took care to include these great
brutes in our own species, or at least they considered that
they were free men—that is to say, free to sell their labor.
In France, as in England, humanism claimed to be
universal.


    In the case of forced labor, it is quite the contrary.
There is no contract; moreover, there must be intimida­
tion and thus oppression grows. Our soldiers overseas, re­
jecting the universalism of the mother country, apply the
 "numerus clausus" to the human race: since none may
enslave, rob, or kill his fellow man without committing a
crime, they lay down the principle that the native is not
one of our fellow men. Our striking power has been given
the mission of changing this abstract certainty into real­
 ity: the order is given to reduce the inhabitants of the
annexed country to the level of superior monkeys in order
to justify the settler's treatment of them as beasts of
 burden. Violence in the colonies does not only have for
its aim the keeping of these enslaved men at arm's length;
it seeks to dehumanize them. Everything will be done to
wipe out their traditions, to substitute our language for
theirs and to destroy their culture without giving them
ours. Sheer physical fatigue will stupefy them. Starved
and ill, if they have any spirit left, fear will finish the job;
guns are leveled at the peasant; civilians come to take
over his land and force him by dint of flogging to till the
land for them. If he shows fight, the soldiers fire and he's
a dead man; if he gives in, he degrades himself and he is
no longer a man at all; shame and fear will split up his
character and make his inmost self fall to pieces. The
business is conducted with flying colors and by experts;
the "psychological services" weren't established yesterday;
nor was brainwashing. And yet, in spite of all these efforts,
their ends are nowhere achieved: neither in the Congo,
where Negroes' hands were cut off, nor in Angola, where
until very recently malcontents' lips were pierced in order
to shut them with padlocks. I do not say that it is im­
possible to change a man into an animal: I simply say
that you won't get there without weakening him consid­
erably. Blows will never suffice; you have to push the


starvation further, and that's the trouble with slavery.
   For when you domesticate a member of our own species,
you reduce his output, and however little you may give
him, a farmyard man finishes by costing more than he
brings in. For this reason the settlers are obliged to stop
the breaking-in halfway; the result, neither man nor ani­
mal, is the native. Beaten, undernourished, ill, terrified—
but only up to a certain point—he has, whether he's
black, yellow, or white, always the same traits of charac­
ter: he's a sly-boots, a lazybones, and a thief, who lives
on nothing, and who understands only violence.
   Poor settler; here is his contradiction naked, shorn of its
trappings. He ought to kill those he plunders, as they say
djinns do. Now, this is not possible, because he must
exploit them as well. Because he can't carry massacre on
to genocide, and slavery to animal-like degradation, he
loses control, the machine goes into reverse, and a relent­
less logic leads him on to decolonization.
   But it does not happen immediately. At first the Euro­
pean's reign continues. He has already lost the battle, but
this is not obvious; he does not yet know that the natives
are only half native; to hear him talk, it would seem that
he ill-treats them in order to destroy or to repress the evil
that they have rooted in them; and after three generations
their pernicious instincts will reappear no more. W h a t
instincts does he mean? The instincts that urge slaves on
to massacre their master? Can he not here recognize his
own cruelty turned against himself? In the savagery of
these oppressed peasants, does he not find his own settler's
savagery, which they have absorbed through every pore
and for which there is no cure? The reason is simple; this
imperious being, crazed by his absolute power and by the
fear of losing it, no longer remembers clearly that he was
once a man; he takes himself for a horsewhip or a gun;
he has come to believe that the domestication of the


  "inferior races" will come about by the conditioning of
 their reflexes. But in this he leaves out of account the
 human memory and the ineffaceable marks left upon it;
 and then, above all there is something which perhaps he
 has never known: we only become what we are by the
 radical and deep-seated refusal of that which others have
 made of us. Three generations did we say? Hardly has the
 second generation opened their eyes than from then on
 they've seen their fathers being flogged. In psychiatric
 terms, they are "traumatized" for life. But these constantly
 renewed aggressions, far from bringing them to submission,
 thrust them into an unbearable contradiction which the
 European will pay for sooner or later. After that, when it
 is their turn to be broken in, when they are taught what
 shame and hunger and pain are, all that is stirred up in
 them is a volcanic fury whose force is equal to that of the
 pressure put upon them. You said they understand nothing
but violence? Of course; first, the only violence is the
 settler's; but soon they will make it their own; that is to
say, the same violence is thrown back upon us as when
 our reflection comes forward to meet us when we go
toward a mirror.
    Make no mistake about it; by this mad fury, by this
bitterness and spleen, by their ever-present desire to kill us,
by the permanent tensing of powerful muscles which are
afraid to relax, they have become men: men because of
the settler, who wants to make beasts of burden of them—
because of him, and against him. Hatred, blind hatred
which is as yet an abstraction, is their only wealth; the
Master calls it forth because he seeks to reduce them to
animals, but he fails to break it down because his interests
stop him halfway. Thus the "half natives" are still hu­
mans, through the power and the weakness of the oppres­
sor which is transformed within them into a stubborn
refusal of the animal condition. We realize what follows;


they're lazy: of course—it's a form of sabotage. They're sly
and thieving; just imaginel But their petty thefts mark
the beginning of a resistance which is still unorganized.
That is not enough; there are those among them who
assert themselves by throwing themselves barehanded
against the guns; these are their heroes. Others make men
of themselves by murdering Europeans, and these are shot
down; brigands or martyrs, their agony exalts the terrified
masses.
   Yes, terrified; at this fresh stage, colonial aggression
turns inward in a current of terror among the natives. By
this I do not only mean the fear that they experience
when faced with our inexhaustible means of repression
but also that which their own fury produces in them. They
are cornered between our guns pointed at them and those
terrifying compulsions, those desires for murder which
spring from the depth of their spirits and which they do
not always recognize; for at first it is not their violence,
it is ours, which turns back on itself and rends them; and
the first action of these oppressed creatures is to bury
deep down that hidden anger which their and our morali­
ties condemn and which is however only the last refuge
of their humanity. Read Fanon: you will learn how, in the
period of their helplessness, their mad impulse to murder
is the expression of the natives' collective unconscious.
   If this suppressed fury fails to find an outlet, it turns in
a vacuum and devastates the oppressed creatures them­
selves. In order to free themselves they even massacre each
other. The different tribes fight between themselves since
they cannot face the real enemy—and you can count on
colonial policy to keep up their rivalries; the man who
raises his knife against his brother thinks that he has
destroyed once and for all the detested image of their
common degradation, even though these expiatory victims
don't quench their thirst for blood. They can only stop


themselves from marching against the machine-guns by
doing our work for us; of their own accord they will speed
up the dehumanization that they reject. Under the amused
eye of the settler, they will take the greatest precautions
against their own kind by setting up supernatural barriers,
at times reviving old and terrible myths, at others binding
themselves by scrupulous rites. It is in this way that an
obsessed person flees from his deepest needs—by binding
himself to certain observances which require his attention
at every turn. They dance; that keeps them busy; it re­
laxes their painfully contracted muscles; and then the
dance mimes secretly, often without their knowing, the
refusal they cannot utter and the murders they dare not
commit. In certain districts they make use of that last
resort—possession by spirits. Formerly this was a religious
experience in all its simplicity, a certain communion of
the faithful with sacred things; now they make of it a
weapon against humiliation and despair; Mumbo-Jumbo
and all the idols of the tribe come down among them, rule
over their violence and waste it in trances until it is ex­
hausted. At the same time these high-placed personages
protect them; in other words the colonized people protect
themselves against colonial estrangement by going one
better in religious estrangement, with the unique result
that finally they add the two estrangements together and
each reinforces the other. Thus in certain psychoses the
hallucinated person, tired of always being insulted by his
demon, one fine day starts hearing the voice of an angel
who pays him compliments; but the jeers don't stop for
all that; only from then on, they alternate with congratula­
tions. This is a defense, but it is also the end of the story;
the self is disassociated, and the patient heads for madness.
Let us add, for certain other carefully selected unfortu­
nates, that other witchery of which I have already spoken:
Western culture. If I were them, you may say, I'd prefer
 20 / Preface

my Mumbo-Jumbo to their Acropolis. Very good: you've
grasped the situation. But not altogether, because you
aren't them—or not yet. Otherwise you would know that
they can't choose; they must have both. Two worlds: that
makes two bewitchings; they dance all night and at dawn
they crowd into the churches to hear mass; each day the
split widens. Our enemy betrays his brothers and becomes
our accomplice; his brothers do the same thing. The status
of "native" is a nervous condition introduced and main­
tained by the settler among colonized people with their
consent.
   Laying claim to and denying the human condition at
the same time: the contradiction is explosive. For that
matter it does explode, you know as well as I do; and we
are living at the moment when the match is put to the
fuse. When the rising birth rate brings wider famine in its
wake, when these newcomers have life to fear rather more
than death, the torrent of violence sweeps away all bar­
riers. In Algeria and Angola, Europeans are massacred at
sight. It is the moment of the boomerang; it is the third
phase of violence; it comes back on us, it strikes us, and
we do not realize any more than we did the other times
that if s we who have launched it. The "liberals" are
stupefied; they admit that we were not polite enough to
the natives, that it would have been wiser and fairer to
allow them certain rights in so far as this was possible;
they ask nothing better than to admit them in batches
and without sponsors to that very exclusive club, our
species; and now this barbarous, mad outburst doesn't
spare them any more than the bad settlers. The Left at
home is embarrassed; they know the true situation of the
natives, the merciless oppression they are submitted to;
they do not condemn their revolt, knowing full well that
we have done everything to provoke it. But, all the same,
they think to themselves, there are limits; these guerillas


 should be bent on showing that they are chivalrous; that
would be the best way of showing they are men. Some­
 times the Left scolds them . . . "You're going too far; we
 won't support you any more." The natives don't give a
 damn about their support; for all the good it does them
 they might as well stuff it up their backsides. Once their
 war began, they saw this hard truth: that every single one
 of us has made his bit, has got something out of them;
 they don't need to call anyone to witness; they'll grant
 favored treatment to no one.
    There is one duty to be done, one end to achieve: to
 thrust out colonialism by every means in their power. T h e
 more farseeing among us will be, in the last resort, ready
 to admit this duty and this end; but we cannot help seeing
in this ordeal by force the altogether inhuman means that
these less-than-men make use of to win the concession of
a charter of humanity. Accord it to them at once, then,
and let them endeavor by peaceful undertakings to deserve
it. Our worthiest souls contain racial prejudice.
   They would do well to read Fanon; for he shows clearly
that this irrepressible violence is neither sound and fury,
nor the resurrection of savage instincts, nor even the effect
of resentment: it is man recreating himself. I think we
understood this truth at one time, but we have forgotten
it—that no gentleness can efface the marks of violence;
only violence itself can destroy them. The native cures
himself of colonial neurosis by thrusting out the settler
through force of arms. When his rage boils over, he redis­
covers his lost innocence and he comes to know himself
in that he himself creates his self. Far removed from his
war, we consider it as a triumph of barbarism; but of its
own volition it achieves, slowly but surely, the emancipa­
tion of the rebel, for bit by bit it destroys in him and
around him the colonial gloom. Once begun, it is a war
that gives no quarter. You may fear or be feared; that is


to say, abandon yourself to the disassociations of a sham
existence or conquer your birthright of unity. When the
peasant takes a gun in his hands, the old myths grow dim
and the prohibitions are one by one forgotten. The rebel's
weapon is the proof of his humanity. For in the first days
of the revolt you must kill: to shoot down a European is
to kill two birds with one stone, to destroy an oppressor
and the man he oppresses at the same time: there remain
a dead man, and a free man; the survivor, for the first
time, feels a national soil under his foot. At this moment
the Nation does not shrink from him; wherever he goes,
wherever he may be, she is; she follows, and is never lost
to view, for she is one with his liberty. But, after the first
surprise, the colonial army strikes; and then all must unite
or be slaughtered. Tribal dissensions weaken and tend to
disappear; in the first place because they endanger the
revolution, but for the more profound reason that they
served no other purpose before than to divert violence
against false foes. When they remain—as in the Congo—
it's because they are kept up by the agents of colonialism.
The Nation marches forward; for each of her children she
is to be found wherever his brothers are fighting. Their
feeling for each other is the reverse of the hatred they feel
for you; they are brothers inasmuch as each of them has
killed and may at any moment have to kill again. Fanon
shows his readers the limits of "spontaneity" and the
need for and dangers of "organization." But however great
may be the task at each turning of the way the revolu­
tionary consciousness deepens. The last complexes flee
away; no one need come to us talking of the "dependency"
complex of an ALN soldier.*
  With his blinkers off, the peasant takes account of his
real needs; before they were enough to kill him, but he

  * National Army of Liberation in Algeria.—Trans.


tried to ignore them; now he sees them as infinitely great
requirements. In this violence which springs from the
people, which enables them to hold out for five years—
for eight years as the Algerians have done—the military,
political, and social necessities cannot be separated. The
war, by merely setting the question of command and re­
sponsibility, institutes new structures which will become
the first institutions of peace. Here, then, is man even
now established in new traditions, the future children of
a horrible present; here then we see him legitimized by a
law which will be born or is born each day under fire:
once the last settler is killed, shipped home, or assimilated,
the minority breed disappears, to be replaced by socialism.
And that's not enough; the rebel does not stop there; for
you can be quite sure that he is not risking his skin to
find himself at the level of a former inhabitant of the old
mother country. Look how patient he is! Perhaps he
dreams of another Dien Bien Phu,* but don't think he's
really counting on it; he's a beggar fighting, in his poverty,
against rich men powerfully armed. While he is waiting
for decisive victories, or even without expecting them at
all, he tires out his adversaries until they are sick of him.
   It will not be without fearful losses; the colonial army
becomes ferocious; the country is marked out, there are
mopping-up operations, transfers of population, reprisal
expeditions, and they massacre women and children. He
knows this; this new man begins his life as a man at the
end of it; he considers himself as a potential corpse. He
will be killed; not only does he accept this risk, he's sure
of it. This potential dead man has lost his wife and his
children; he has seen so many dying men that he prefers
victory to survival; others, not he, will have the fruits of

  * The French army's drastic defeat at Dien Bien Phu ended the
war in Indo-China.—Trans.


victory; he is too weary of it all. But this weariness of the
heart is the root of an unbelievable courage. We find our
humanity on this side of death and despair; he finds it
beyond torture and death. We have sown the wind; he is
the whirlwind. The child of violence, at every moment he
draws from it his humanity. We were men at his expense,
he makes himself man at ours: a different man; of higher
quality.
   Here Fanon stops. He has shown the way forward: he
is the spokesman of those who are fighting and he has
called for union, that is to say the unity of the African
continent against all dissensions and all particularisms.
He has gained his end. If he had wished to describe in all
its details the historical phenomenon of decolonization he
would have to have spoken of us; this is not at all his
intention. But, when we have closed the book, the argu­
ment continues within us, in spite of its author; for we
feel the strength of the peoples in revolt and we answer
by force. Thus there is a fresh moment of violence; and
this time we ourselves are involved, for by its nature this
violence is changing us, accordingly as the "half native"
is changed. Every one of us must think for himself—always
provided that he thinks at all; for in Europe today,
 stunned as she is by the blows received by France, Bel­
gium, or England, even to allow your mind to be diverted,
however slightly, is as good as being the accomplice in
crime of colonialism. This book had not the slightest need
of a preface, all the less because it is not addressed to us.
Yet I have written one, in order to bring the argument
to its conclusion; for we in Europe too are being de­
colonized: that is to say that the settler which is in every
one of us is being savagely rooted out. Let us look at our­
selves, if we can bear to, and see what is becoming of us.
First, we must face that unexpected revelation, the strip
tease of our humanism. There you can see it, quite naked,


 and it's not a pretty sight. It was nothing but an ideology
 of lies, a perfect justification for pillage; its honeyed words,
 its affectation of sensibility were only alibis for our ag­
 gressions. A fine sight they are too, the believers in non­
 violence, saying that they are neither executioners nor
 victims. Very well then; if you're not victims when the
 government which you've voted for, when the army in
 which your younger brothers are serving without hesitation
 or remorse have undertaken race murder, you are, without
 a shadow of doubt, executioners. And if you choose to be
 victims and to risk being put in prison for a day or two,
 you are simply choosing to pull your irons out of the fire.
 But you will not be able to pull them out; they'll have to
 stay there till the end. Try to understand this at any rate:
 if violence began this very evening and if exploitation and
 oppression had never existed on the earth, perhaps the
 slogans of non-violence might end the quarrel. But if the
 whole regime, even your non-violent ideas, are conditioned
 by a thousand-year-old oppression, your passivity serves
 only to place you in the ranks of the oppressors.
    You know well enough that we are exploiters. You know
 too that we have laid hands on first the gold and metals,
 then the petroleum of the "new continents," and that we
have brought them back to the old countries. This was
not without excellent results, as witness our palaces, our
cathedrals, and our great industrial cities; and then when
there was the threat of a slump, the colonial markets were
there to soften the blow or to divert it. Crammed with
riches, Europe accorded the human status de jure to its
inhabitants. With us, to be a man is to be an accomplice
of colonialism, since all of us without exception have
profited by colonial exploitation. This fat, pale continent
ends by falling into what Fanon rightly calls narcissism.
Cocteau became irritated with Paris—"that city which
talks about itself the whole time." Is Europe any different?


And that super-European monstrosity, North America?
Chatter, chatter: liberty, equality, fraternity, love, honor,
patriotism, and what have you. All this did not prevent
us from making anti-racial speeches about dirty niggers,
dirty Jews, and dirty Arabs. High-minded people, liberal
or just softhearted, protest that they were shocked by such
inconsistency; but they were either mistaken or dishonest,
for with us there is nothing more consistent than a racist
humanism since the European has only been able to be­
come a man through creating slaves and monsters. While
there was a native population somewhere this imposture
was not shown up; in the notion of the human race we
found an abstract assumption of universality which served
as cover for the most realistic practices. On the other side
of the ocean there was a race of less-than-humans who,
thanks to us, might reach our status a thousand years
hence, perhaps; in short, we mistook the elite for the
genus. Today, the native populations reveal their true na­
ture, and at the same time our exclusive "club" reveals its
weakness—that it's neither more nor less than a minority.
Worse than that: since the others become men in name
against us, it seems that we are the enemies of mankind;
the elite shows itself in its true colors—it is nothing more
than a gang. Our precious sets of values begin to molt; on
closer scrutiny you won't see one that isn't stained with
blood. If you are looking for an example, remember these
fine words: "How generous France is!" Us, generous?
What about Setif, then? And those eight years of ferocious
war which have cost the lives of over a million Algerians?
And the tortures?
   But let it be understood that nobody reproaches us with
having been false to such-and-such a mission—for the very
good reason that we had no mission at all. It is generosity
itself that's in question; this fine melodious word has only
one meaning: the granting of a statutory charter. For the


folk across the water, new men, freed men, no one has the
power nor the right to give anything to anybody; for each
of them has every right, and the right to everything. And
when one day our human kind becomes full-grown, it will
 not define itself as the sum total of the whole world's
inhabitants, but as the infinite unity of their mutual needs.
Here I stop; you will have no trouble in finishing the job;
all you have to do is to look our aristocratic virtues straight
in the face, for the first and last time. They are cracking
up; how could they survive the aristocracy of underlings
who brought them into being? A few years ago, a bourgeois
colonialist commentator found only this to say in defense
of the West: "We aren't angels. But we, at least, feel
some remorse." What a confession! Formerly our conti­
nent was buoyed up by other means: the Parthenon,
Chartres, the Rights of Man, or the swastika. Now we
know what these are worth; and the only chance of our
being saved from shipwreck is the very Christian sentiment
of guilt. You can see it's the end; Europe is springing
leaks everywhere. What then has happened? It simply is
that in the past we made history and now it is being made
of us. The ratio of forces has been inverted; decolonization
has begun; all that our hired soldiers can do is to delay
its completion.
   The old "mother countries" have still to go the whole
hog; they still have to engage their entire forces in a battle
which is lost before it has begun. At the end of the ad­
venture we again find that colonial brutality which was
Bugeaud's* doubtful glory; but though it has been multi­
plied ten-fold, it's still not enough. The national service
units are sent to Algeria, and they remain there seven
   * Thomas-Robert Bugeaud de la Piconnerie, 1784-1849, Duke of
Islay, Marshall of Fiance. Famous for military exploits in the con­
quest of Algeria, he was appointed Governor of Algeria in 1840.—
Trans.


years with no result. Violence has changed its direction.
When we were victorious we practiced it without its seem­
ing to alter us; it broke down the others, but for us men
our humanism remained intact. United by their profits,
the peoples of the mother countries baptized their com­
monwealth of crimes, calling them fraternity and love;
today violence, blocked everywhere, comes back on us
through our soldiers, comes inside and takes possession of
us. Involution starts; the native recreates himself, and we,
settlers and Europeans, ultras and liberals, we break up.
Rage and fear are already blatant; they show themselves
openly in the nigger-hunts in Algiers. Now, which side
are the savages on? Where is barbarism? Nothing is miss­
ing, not even the tom-toms; the motorhorns beat out
"Al-ger-ie fran-caise" while the Europeans burn Moslems
alive. Fanon reminds us that not so very long ago, a con­
gress of psychiatrists was distressed by the criminal propen­
sities of the native population. "Those people kill each
other," they said, "that isn't normal. The Algerian's cortex
must be underdeveloped." In central Africa, others have
established that "the African makes very little use of his
frontal lobes." These learned men would do well today
to follow up their investigations in Europe, and particu­
larly with regard to the French. For we, too, during the
last few years, must be victims of "frontal sluggishness"
since our patriots do quite a bit of assassinating of their
fellow-countrymen, and if they're not at home, they blow
up their house and their concierge. This is only a be­
ginning; civil war is forecast for the autumn, or for the
spring of next year. Yet our lobes seem to be in perfect
condition; is it not rather the case that, since we cannot
crush the natives, violence comes back on its tracks, ac­
cumulates in the very depths of our nature and seeks a
way out? The union of the Algerian people causes the
disunion of the French people; throughout the whole ter-


ritory of the ex-mother-country, the tribes are dancing
their war dances. The terror has left Africa, and is settling
here; for quite obviously there are certain furious beings
who want to make us pay with our own blood for the
shame of having been beaten by the native. Then too,
there are the others, all the others who are equally guilty
 (for after Bizerta, after the lynchings of September, who
among them came out into the streets to shout "We've
had enough"?) but less spectacular—the liberals, and the
toughs of the tender Left.
   The fever is mounting amongst them too, and resent­
 ment at the same time. And they certainly have the wind
 up! They hide their rage in myths and complicated rites;
 in order to stave off the day of reckoning and the need for
 decision they have put at the head of our affairs a Grand
Magician whose business it is to keep us all in the dark
at all costs. Nothing is being done; violence, proclaimed
by some, disowned by others, turns in a vacuum; one day
it bursts out at Metz, the next at Bordeaux; it's here, there
and everywhere, like in a game of hunt the slipper. It's our
turn to tread the path, step by step, which leads down to
native level. But to become natives altogether, our soil
must be occupied by a formerly colonized people and we
must starve of hunger. This won't happen; for it's a dis­
credited colonialism which is taking hold of us; this is the
senile, arrogant master who will straddle us; here he comes,
our Mumbo-Jumbo.
   And when you have read Fanon's last chapter, you will
be convinced that it would be better for you to be a
native at the uttermost depths of his misery than to be
a former settler. It is not right for a police official to be
obliged to torture for ten hours a day; at that rate, his
nerves will fall to bits, unless the torturers are forbidden
in their own interests to work overtime. "When it is de­
sirable that the morality of the nation and the army
 30 / Preface

should be protected by the rigors of the law, it is not right
that the former should systematically demoralize the lat­
ter, nor that a country with a Republican tradition should
confide hundreds and thousands of its young folk to the
care of putschist officers. It is not right, my fellow-country­
men, you who know very well all the crimes committed
in our name, it's not at all right that you do not breathe a
word about them to anyone, not even to your own soul,
for fear of having to stand in judgment of yourself. I am
willing to believe that at the beginning you did not realize
what was happening; later, you doubted whether such
things could be true; but now you know, and still you
hold your tongues. Eight years of silence; what degrada­
 tion! And your silence is all to no avail; today, the blinding
 sun of torture is at its zenith; it lights up the whole
 country. Under that merciless glare, there is not a laugh
 that does not ring false, not a face that is not painted to
 hide fear or anger, not a single action that does not betray
 our disgust, and our complicity. It is enough today for two
 French people to meet together for there to be a dead
 man between them. One dead man did I say? In other
 days France was the name of a country. W e should take
 care that in 1961 it does not become the name of a ner­
 vous disease.
   Will we recover? Yes. For violence, like Achilles' lance,
can heal the wounds that it has inflicted. Today, we are
bound hand and foot, humiliated and sick with fear; we
cannot fall lower. Happily this is not yet enough for the
colonialist aristocracy; it cannot complete its delaying
mission in Algeria until it has first finished colonizing the
French. Every day we retreat in front of the battle, but
you may be sure that we will not avoid it; the killers need
it; they'll go for us and hit out blindly to left and right.
   Thus the day of magicians and fetishes will end; you
will have to fight, or rot in concentration camps. This is


the end of the dialectic; you condemn this war but do not
yet dare to declare yourselves to be on the side of the
Algerian fighters; never fear, you can count on the settlers
and the hired soldiers; they'll make you take the plunge.
Then, perhaps, when your back is to the wall, you will let
loose at last that new violence which is raised up in you
by old, oft-repeated crimes. But, as they say, that's another
story: the history of mankind. The time is drawing near, I
am sure, when we will join the ranks of those who make it
                                      —Jean-Paul Sartre
 The Wretched
 of the Earth
             CONCERNING VIOLENCE


 National liberation, national renaissance, the restoration
 of nationhood to the people, commonwealth: whatever
 may be the headings used or the new formulas introduced,
 decolonization is always a violent phenomenon. At what­
 ever level we study it—relationships between individuals,
 new names for sports clubs, the human admixture at cock­
 tail parties, in the police, on the directing boards of
 national or private banks—decolonization is quite simply
 the replacing of a certain "species" of men by another
 "species" of men. Without any period of transition, there
 is a total, complete, and absolute substitution. It is true
 that we could equally well stress the rise of a new nation,
 the setting up of a new state, its diplomatic relations, and
 its economic and political trends. But we have precisely
 chosen to speak of that kind of tabula rasa which charac­
 terizes at the outset all decolonization. Its unusual im­
portance is that it constitutes, from the very first day, the
minimum demands of the colonized. To tell the truth, the
proof of success lies in a whole social structure being
changed from the bottom up. The extraordinary impor­
tance of this change is that it is willed, called for, de­
manded. The need for this change exists in its crude state,
impetuous and compelling, in the consciousness and in the
                              35


lives of the men and women who are colonized. But the
possibility of this change is equally experienced in the
form of a terrifying future in the consciousness of another
"species" of men and women: the colonizers.
   Decolonization, which sets out to change the order of
the world, is, obviously, a program of complete disorder.
But it cannot come as a result of magical practices, nor of
a natural shock, nor of a friendly understanding. Decol­
onization, as we know, is a historical process: that is to
say that it cannot be understood, it cannot become in­
telligible nor clear to itself except in the exact measure
that we can discern the movements which give it histori­
cal form and content. Decolonization is the meeting of
two forces, opposed to each other by their very nature,
which in fact owe their originality to that sort of sub-
stantification which results from and is nourished by the
situation in the colonies. Their first encounter was marked
by violence and their existence together—that is to say
the exploitation of the native by the settler—was carried
 on by dint of a great array of bayonets and cannons. The
settler and the native are old acquaintances. In fact, the
settler is right when he speaks of knowing "them" well.
For it is the settler who has brought the native into
existence and who perpetuates his existence. The settler
owes the fact of his very existence, that is to say, his
property, to the colonial system.
   Decolonization never takes place unnoticed, for it in­
fluences individuals and modifies them fundamentally. It
transforms spectators crushed with their inessentiality into
privileged actors, with the grandiose glare of history's
floodlights upon them. It brings a natural rhythm into
existence, introduced by new men, and with it a new
language and a new humanity. Decolonization is the
veritable creation of new men. But this creation owes
nothing of its legitimacy to any supernatural power; the


"thing" which has been colonized becomes man during
the same process by which it frees itself.
   In decolonization, there is therefore the need of a com­
plete calling in question of the colonial situation. If we
wish to describe it precisely, we might find it in the well-
known words: "The last shall be first and the first last."
Decolonization is the putting into practice of this sen­
tence. That is why, if we try to describe it, all decoloniza­
tion is successful.
   The naked truth of decolonization evokes for us the
searing bullets and bloodstained knives which emanate
from it. For if the last shall be first, this will only come
to pass after a murderous and decisive struggle between
the two protagonists. That affirmed intention to place the
last at the head of things, and to make them climb at a
pace (too quickly, some say) the well-known steps which
characterize an organized society, can only triumph if we
use all means to turn the scale, including, of course, that
of violence.
   You do not turn any society, however primitive it may
be, upside down with such a program if you have not
decided from the very beginning, that is to say from the
actual formulation of that program, to overcome all the
obstacles that you will come across in so doing. The native
who decides to put the program into practice, and to be­
come its moving force, is ready for violence at all times.
From birth it is clear to him that this narrow world,
strewn with prohibitions, can only be called in question
by absolute violence.
   The colonial world is a world divided into compart­
ments. It is probably unnecessary to recall the existence
of native quarters and European quarters, of schools for
natives and schools for Europeans; in the same way we
need not recall apartheid in South Africa. Yet, if we
examine closely this system of compartments, we will at


least be able to reveal the lines of force it implies. This
approach to the colonial world, its ordering and its geo­
graphical layout will allow us to mark out the lines on
which a decolonized society will be reorganized.
   The colonial world is a world cut in two. The dividing
line, the frontiers are shown by barracks and police sta­
tions. In the colonies it is the policeman and the soldier
who are the official, instituted go-betweens, the spokesmen
of the settler and his rule of oppression. In capitalist
societies the educational system, whether lay or clerical,
the structure of moral reflexes handed down from father
to son, the exemplary honesty of workers who are given
a medal after fifty years of good and loyal service, and the
affection which springs from harmonious relations and
good behavior—all these aesthetic expressions of respect for
the established order serve to create around the exploited
person an atmosphere of submission and of inhibition
which lightens the task of policing considerably. In the
capitalist countries a multitude of moral teachers, coun­
selors and "bewilderers" separate the exploited from those
in power. In the colonial countries, on the contrary, the
policeman and the soldier, by their immediate presence
and their frequent and direct action maintain contact with
the native and advise him by means of rifle butts and
napalm not to budge. It is obvious here that the agents
of government speak the language of pure force. The
intermediary does not lighten the oppression, nor seek to
hide the domination; he shows them up and puts them
into practice with the clear conscience of an upholder of
the peace; yet he is the bringer of violence into the home
and into the mind of the native.
   The zone where the natives live is not complementary
to the zone inhabited by the settlers. The two zones are
opposed, but not in the service of a higher unity. Obe­
dient to the rules of pure Aristotelian logic, they both


follow the principle of reciprocal exclusivity. No concilia­
 tion is possible, for of the two terms, one is superfluous.
 The settlers' town is a strongly built town, all made of
 stone and steel. It is a brightly lit town; the streets are
 covered with asphalt, and the garbage cans swallow all
the leavings, unseen, unknown and hardly thought about.
The settler's feet are never visible, except perhaps in the
sea; but there you're never close enough to see them. His
feet are protected by strong shoes although the streets of
his town are clean and even, with no holes or stones. The
settler's town is a well-fed town, an easygoing town; its
belly is always full of good things. The settlers' town is a
town of white people, of foreigners.
    The town belonging to the colonized people, or at least
the native town, the Negro village, the medina, the reser­
vation, is a place of ill fame, peopled by men of evil
repute. They are born there, it matters little where or
how; they die there, it matters not where, nor how. It is
a world without spaciousness; men live there on top of
each other, and their huts are built one on top of the
other. The native town is a hungry town, starved of bread,
of meat, of shoes, of coal, of light. The native town is a
crouching village, a town on its knees, a town wallowing
in the mire. It is a town of niggers and dirty Arabs. The
look that the native turns on the settler's town is a look
of lust, a look of envy; it expresses his dreams of posses­
sion—all manner of possession: to sit at the settler's table,
to sleep in the settler's bed, with his wife if possible. The
colonized man is an envious man. And this the settler
knows very well; when their glances meet he ascertains
bitterly, always on the defensive, "They want to take our
place." It is true, for there is no native who does not
dream at least once a day of setting himself up in the
settler's place.
  This world divided into compartments, this world cut
 40 / The Wretched of the Earth

in two is inhabited by two different species. The originality
of the colonial context is that economic reality, inequality,
and the immense difference of ways of life never come to
mask the human realities. When you examine at close
quarters the colonial context, it is evident that what par­
cels out the world is to begin with the fact of belonging
to or not belonging to a given race, a given species. In
the colonies the economic substructure is also a super­
structure. The cause is the consequence; you are rich
because you are white, you are white because you are rich.
This is why Marxist analysis should always be slightly
stretched every time we have to do with the colonial
problem.
   Everything up to and including the very nature of pre­
capitalist society, so well explained by Marx, must here be
thought out again. The serf is in essence different from the
knight, but a reference to divine right is necessary to
legitimize this statutory difference. In the colonies, the
foreigner coming from another country imposed his rule
by means of guns and machines. In defiance of his success­
ful transplantation, in spite of his appropriation, the set­
tler still remains a foreigner. It is neither the act of owning
factories, nor estates, nor a bank balance which dis­
tinguishes the governing classes. The governing race is
first and foremost those who come from elsewhere, those
who are unlike the original inhabitants, "the others."
   The violence which has ruled over the ordering of the
colonial world, which has ceaselessly drummed the rhythm
for the destruction of native social forms and broken up
without reserve the systems of reference of the economy,
the customs of dress and external life, that same violence
will be claimed and taken over by the native at the mo­
ment when, deciding to embody history in his own per­
son, he surges into the forbidden quarters. To wreck the
colonial world is henceforward a mental picture of action


which is very clear, very easy to understand and which
 may be assumed by each one of the individuals which con­
stitute the colonized people. To break up the colonial
world does not mean that after the frontiers have been
abolished lines of communication will be set up between
 the two zones. The destruction of the colonial world is
no more and no less that the abolition of one zone, its
burial in the depths of the earth or its expulsion from the
country.
   The natives' challenge to the colonial world is not a
rational confrontation of points of view. It is not a treatise
on the universal, but the untidy affirmation of an original
idea propounded as an absolute. The colonial world is a
Manichean world. It is not enough for the settler to de­
limit physically, that is to say with the help of the army
and the police force, the place of the native. As if to show
the totalitarian character of colonial exploitation the
settler paints the native as a sort of quintessence of evil.*
Native society is not simply described as a society lacking
in values. It is not enough for the colonist to affirm that
those values have disappeared from, or still better never
existed in, the colonial world. The native is declared in­
sensible to ethics; he represents not only the absence of
values, but also the negation of values. He is, let us dare
to admit, the enemy of values, and in this sense he is the
absolute evil. He is the corrosive element, destroying all
that comes near him; he is the deforming element, dis­
figuring all that has to do with beauty or morality; he is
the depository of maleficent powers, the unconscious and
irretrievable instrument of blind forces. Monsieur Meyer
could thus state seriously in the French National Assem­
bly that the Republic must not be prostituted by allowing

   * We have demonstrated the mechanism of this Manichean world
in Black Skin, White Masks (New York: Grove Press, 1967).


the Algerian people to become part of it. All values, in
fact, are irrevocably poisoned and diseased as soon as they
are allowed in contact with the colonized race. The cus­
toms of the colonized people, their traditions, their myths
—above all, their myths—are the very sign of that poverty
of spirit and of their constitutional depravity. That is why
we must put the D D T which destroys parasites, the
bearers of disease, on the same level as the Christian re­
ligion which wages war on embryonic heresies and in­
stincts, and on evil as yet unborn. The recession of yellow
fever and the advance of evangelization form part of the
same balance sheet. But the triumphant communiques
from the missions are in fact a source of information con­
cerning the implantation of foreign influences in the core
of the colonized people. I speak of the Christian religion,
and no one need be astonished. The Church in the
colonies is the white people's Church, the foreigner's
Church. She does not call the native to God's ways but
to the ways of the white man, of the master, of the op­
pressor. And as we know, in this matter many are called
but few chosen.
   At times this Manicheism goes to its logical conclusion
and dehumanizes the native, or to speak plainly, it turns
him into an animal. In fact, the terms the settler uses
when he mentions the native are zoological terms. He
speaks of the yellow man's reptilian motions, of the stink
of the native quarter, of breeding swarms, of foulness, of
spawn, of gesticulations. When the settler seeks to describe
the native fully in exact terms he constantly refers to the
bestiary. The European rarely hits on a picturesque style;
but the native, who knows what is in the mind of the
settler, guesses at once what he is thinking of. Those
hordes of vital statistics, those hysterical masses, those
faces bereft of all humanity, those distended bodies which
are like nothing on earth, that mob without beginning or


end, those children who seem to belong to nobody, that
laziness stretched out in the sun, that vegetative rhythm
of life—all this forms part of the colonial vocabulary.
General de Gaulle speaks of "the yellow multitudes" and
Francois Mauriac of the black, brown, and yellow masses
which soon will be unleashed. The native knows all this,
and laughs to himself every time he spots an allusion to
the animal world in the other's words. For he knows that
he is not an animal; and it is precisely at the moment he
realizes his humanity that he begins to sharpen the
weapons with which he will secure its victory.
   As soon as the native begins to pull on his moorings,
and to cause anxiety to the settler, he is handed over to
well-meaning souls who in cultural congresses point out to
him the specificity and wealth of Western values. But
every time Western values are mentioned they produce in
the native a sort of stiffening or muscular lockjaw. During
the period of decolonization, the native's reason is ap­
pealed to. He is offered definite values, he is told fre­
quently that decolonization need not mean regression,
and that he must put his trust in qualities which are well-
tried, solid, and highly esteemed. But it so happens that
when the native hears a speech about Western culture he
pulls out his knife—or at least he makes sure it is within
reach. The violence with which the supremacy of white
values is affirmed and the aggressiveness which has per­
meated the victory of these values over the ways of life
and of thought of the native mean that, in revenge, the
native laughs in mockery when Western values are men­
tioned in front of him. In the colonial context the settler
only ends his work of breaking in the native when the
latter admits loudly and intelligibly the supremacy of the
white man's values. In the period of decolonization, the
colonized masses mock at these very values, insult them,
and vomit them up.


   This phenomenon is ordinarily masked because, during
the period of decolonization, certain colonized intellec­
tuals have begun a dialogue with the bourgeoisie of the
colonialist country. During this phase, the indigenous
population is discerned only as an indistinct mass. The
few native personalities whom the colonialist bourgeois
have come to know here and there have not sufficient in­
fluence on that immediate discernment to give rise to
nuances. On the other hand, during the period of libera­
tion, the colonialist bourgeoisie looks feverishly for con­
tacts with the elite and it is with these elite that the
familiar dialogue concerning values is carried on. The
colonialist bourgeoisie, when it realizes that it is impossible
for it to maintain its domination over the colonial coun­
tries, decides to carry out a rearguard action with regard to
culture, values, techniques, and so on. Now what we must
never forget is that the immense majority of colonized
peoples is oblivious to these problems. For a colonized
people the most essential value, because the most concrete,
is first and foremost the land: the land which will bring
them bread and, above all, dignity. But this dignity has
nothing to do with the dignity of the human individual:
for that human individual has never heard tell of it. All
that the native has seen in his country is that they can
freely arrest him, beat him, starve him: and no professor
of ethics, no priest has ever come to be beaten in his
place, nor to share their bread with him. As far as the
native is concerned, morality is very concrete; it is to
silence the settler's defiance, to break his flaunting vio­
lence—in a word, to put him out of the picture. The well-
known principle that all men are equal will be illustrated
in the colonies from the moment that the native claims
that he is the equal of the settler. One step more, and he
is ready to fight to be more than the settler. In fact, he
has already decided to eject him and to take his place; as


we see it, it is a whole material and moral universe which
 is breaking up. The intellectual who for his part has fol­
lowed the colonialist with regard to the universal abstract
 will fight in order that the settler and the native may live
 together in peace in a new world. But the thing he does
 not see, precisely because he is permeated by colonialism
and all its ways of thinking, is that the settler, from the
 moment that the colonial context disappears, has no
longer any interest in remaining or in co-existing. It is
not by chance that, even before any negotiation * be­
tween the Algerian and French governments has taken
place, the European minority which calls itself "liberal"
has already made its position clear: it demands nothing
more nor less than twofold citizenship. By setting them­
selves apart in an abstract manner, the liberals try to force
the settler into taking a very concrete jump into the un­
known. Let us admit it, the settler knows perfectly well
that no phraseology can be a substitute for reality.
   Thus the native discovers that his life, his breath, his
beating heart are the same as those of the settler. He finds
out that the settler's skin is not of any more value than
a native's skin; and it must be said that this discovery
shakes the world in a very necessary manner. All the new,
revolutionary assurance of the native stems from it. For
if, in fact, my life is worth as much as the settler's, his
glance no longer shrivels me up nor freezes me, and his
voice no longer turns me into stone. I am no longer on
tenterhooks in his presence; in fact, I don't give a damn
for him. Not only does his presence no longer trouble me,
but I am already preparing such efficient ambushes for
him that soon there will be no way out but that of flight.
   We have said that the colonial context is characterized
by the dichotomy which it imposes upon the whole peo-

  * Fanon is writing in 1961.—Trans.


pie. Decolonization unifies that people by the radical
 decision to remove from it its heterogeneity, and by unify­
 ing it on a national, sometimes a racial, basis. W e know
 the fierce words of the Senegalese patriots, referring to
 the maneuvers of their president, Senghor: " W e have
 demanded that the higher posts should be given to Afri­
 cans; and now Senghor is Africanizing the Europeans."
 That is to say that the native can see clearly and imme­
 diately if decolonization has come to pass or not, for his
 minimum demands are simply that the last shall be first.
    But the native intellectual brings variants to this peti­
 tion, and, in fact, he seems to have good reasons: higher
 civil servants, technicians, specialists—all seem to be
 needed. Now, the ordinary native interprets these unfair
 promotions as so many acts of sabotage, and he is often
 heard to declare: "It wasn't worth while, then, our be­
 coming independent . . ."
    In the colonial countries where a real struggle for free­
 dom has taken place, where the blood of the people has
 flowed and where the length of the period of armed war­
 fare has favored the backward surge of intellectuals toward
bases grounded in the people, we can observe a genuine
 eradication of the superstructure built by these intellec­
tuals from the bourgeois colonialist environment. The
colonialist bourgeoisie, in its narcissistic dialogue, ex­
pounded by the members of its universities, had in fact
deeply implanted in the minds of the colonized intellec­
tual that the essential qualities remain eternal in spite of
all the blunders men may make: the essential qualities of
the West, of course. The native intellectual accepted the
cogency of these ideas, and deep down in his brain you
could always find a vigilant sentinel ready to defend the
Greco-Latin pedestal. Now it so happens that during the
straggle for liberation, at the moment that the native
intellectual comes into touch again with his people, this


artificial sentinel is turned into dust. All the Mediterranean
values—the triumph of the human individual, of clarity,
and of beauty—become lifeless, colorless knickknacks. All
those speeches seem like collections of dead words; those
values which seemed to uplift the soul are revealed as
worthless, simply because they have nothing to do with
the concrete conflict in which the people is engaged.
   Individualism is the first to disappear. The native in­
tellectual had learnt from his masters that the individual
ought to express himself fully. The colonialist bourgeoisie
had hammered into the native's mind the idea of a so­
ciety of individuals where each person shuts himself up
in his own subjectivity, and whose only wealth is indi­
vidual thought. Now the native who has the opportunity
to return to the people during the struggle for freedom
will discover the falseness of this theory. The very forms
of organization of the struggle will suggest to him a dif­
ferent vocabulary. Brother, sister, friend—these are words
outlawed by the colonialist bourgeoisie, because for them
my brother is my purse, my friend is part of my scheme
for getting on. The native intellectual takes part, in a
sort of auto-da-fe, in the destruction of all his idols: ego­
ism, recrimination that springs from pride, and the child­
ish stupidity of those who always want to have the last
word. Such a colonized intellectual, dusted over by
colonial culture, will in the same way discover the sub­
stance of village assemblies, the cohesion of people's com­
mittees, and the extraordinary fruitfulness of local meet­
ings and groupments. Henceforward, the interests of one
will be the interests of all, for in concrete fact everyone
will be discovered by the troops, everyone will be mas­
 sacred—or everyone will be saved. The motto "look out
 for yourself," the atheist's method of salvation, is in this
 context forbidden.
    Self-criticism has been much talked about of late, but


few people realize that it is an African institution.
 Whether in the djemaas * of northern Africa or in the
meetings of western Africa, tradition demands that the
 quarrels which occur in a village should be settled in
public. It is communal self-criticism, of course, and with
a note of humor, because everybody is relaxed, and be­
cause in the last resort we all want the same things. But
the more the intellectual imbibes the atmosphere of the
people, the more completely he abandons the habits of
calculation, of unwonted silence, of mental reservations,
and shakes off the spirit of concealment. And it is true
that already at that level we can say that the community
triumphs, and that it spreads its own light and its own
reason.
   But it so happens sometimes that decolonization occurs
in areas which have not been sufficiently shaken by the
struggle for liberation, and there may be found those
same know-all, smart, wily intellectuals. We find intact
in them the manners and forms of thought picked up
during their association with the colonialist bourgeoisie.
Spoilt children of yesterday's colonialism and of today's
national governments, they organize the loot of whatever
national resources exist. Without pity, they use today's
national distress as a means of getting on through schem­
ing and legal robbery, by import-export combines, limited
liability companies, gambling on the stock exchange, or
unfair promotion. They are insistent in their demands for
the nationalization of commerce, that is to say the reser­
vation of markets and advantageous bargains for nationals
only. As far as doctrine is concerned, they proclaim the
pressing necessity of nationalizing the robbery of the
nation. In this arid phase of national life, the so-called
period of austerity, the success of their depredations is

  * Village assemblies.—Trans.


swift to call forth the violence and anger of the people.
For this same people, poverty-stricken yet independent,
comes very quickly to possess a social conscience in the
African and international context of today; and this the
petty individualists will quickly learn.
   In order to assimilate and to experience the oppressor's
culture, the native has had to leave certain of his intellec­
tual possessions in pawn. These pledges include his adop­
tion of the forms of thought of the colonialist bourgeoisie.
This is very noticeable in the inaptitude of the native
intellectual to carry on a two-sided discussion; for he can­
not eliminate himself when confronted with an object or
an idea. On the other hand, when once he begins to
militate among the people he is struck with wonder and
amazement; he is literally disarmed by their good faith
and honesty. The danger that will haunt him continually
is that of becoming the uncritical mouthpiece of the
masses; he becomes a kind of yes-man who nods assent at
every word coming from the people, which he interprets
as considered judgments. Now, the fellah, the unemployed
man, the starving native do not lay a claim to the truth;
they do not say that they represent the truth, for they
are the truth.
   Objectively, the intellectual behaves in this phase like
a common opportunist. In fact he has not stopped ma­
 neuvering. There is never any question of his being either
 rejected or welcomed by the people. What they ask is
 simply that all resources should be pooled. The inclusion
 of the native intellectual in the upward surge of the masses
 will in this case be differentiated by a curious cult of de­
 tail. That is not to say that the people are hostile to
 analysis; on the contrary, they like having things explained
 to them, they are glad to understand a line of argument
 and they like to see where they are going. But at the
 beginning of his association with the people the native
 50 / The Wretched of the Earth

intellectual over-stresses details and thereby comes to for­
get that the defeat of colonialism is the real object of the
struggle. Carried away by the multitudinous aspects of
the fight, he tends to concentrate on local tasks, performed
with enthusiasm but almost always too solemnly. He fails
to see the whole of the movement all the time. He intro­
duces the idea of special disciplines, of specialized func­
tions, of departments within the terrible stone crusher,
the fierce mixing machine which a popular revolution is.
He is occupied in action on a particular front, and it so
happens that he loses sight of the unity of the movement.
Thus, if a local defeat is inflicted, he may well be drawn
into doubt, and from thence to despair. The people, on
the other hand, take their stand from the start on the
broad and inclusive positions of bread and the land: how
can we obtain the land, and bread to eat? And this ob­
stinate point of view of the masses, which may seem
shrunken and limited, is in the end the most worthwhile
and the most efficient mode of procedure.
   The problem of truth ought also to be considered. In
every age, among the people, truth is the property of the
national cause. No absolute verity, no discourse on the
purity of the soul, can shake this position. The native re­
plies to the living lie of the colonial situation by an equal
falsehood. His dealings with his fellow-nationals are open;
they are strained and incomprehensible with regard to the
settlers. Truth is that which hurries on the break-up of
the colonialist regime; it is that which promotes the emer­
gence of the nation; it is all that protects the natives, and
ruins the foreigners. In this colonialist context there is no
truthful behavior: and the good is quite simply that which
is evil for "them."
   Thus we see that the primary Manicheism which gov­
erned colonial society is preserved intact during the period
of decolonization; that is to say that the settler never


ceases to be the enemy, the opponent, the foe that must
be overthrown. The oppressor, in his own sphere, starts
the process, a process of domination, of exploitation and
of pillage, and in the other sphere the coiled, plundered
creature which is the native provides fodder for the process
as best he can, the process which moves uninterruptedly
from the banks of the colonial territory to the palaces and
the docks of the mother country. In this becalmed zone
the sea has a smooth surface, the palm tree stirs gently
in the breeze, the waves lap against the pebbles, and raw
materials are ceaselessly transported, justifying the pres­
ence of the settler: and all the while the native, bent
double, more dead than alive, exists interminably in an
unchanging dream. The settler makes history; his life is
an epoch, an Odyssey. He is the absolute beginning:
"This land was created by us"; he is the unceasing cause:
"If we leave, all is lost, and the country will go back to
the Middle Ages." Over against him torpid creatures,
wasted by fevers, obsessed by ancestral customs, form an
almost inorganic background for the innovating dynamism
of colonial mercantilism.
   The settler makes history and is conscious of making it.
And because he constantly refers to the history of his
mother country, he clearly indicates that he himself is
the extension of that mother country. Thus the history
which he writes is not the history of the country which
he plunders but the history of his own nation in regard to
all that she skims oE, all that she violates and starves.
   The immobility to which the native is condemned can
only be called in question if the native decides to put an
end to the history of colonization—the history of pillage—
and to bring into existence the history of the nation—the
history of decolonization.
   A world divided into compartments, a motionless,
Manicheistic world, a world of statues: the statue of the
 52-/ The Wretched of the Earth

general who carried out the conquest, the statue of the
engineer who built the bridge; a world which is sure of
itself, which crushes with its stones the backs flayed by
whips: this is the colonial world. The native is a being
hemmed in; apartheid is simply one form of the division
into compartments of the colonial world. The first thing
which the native learns is to stay in his place, and not to
go beyond certain limits. This is why the dreams of the
native are always of muscular prowess; his dreams are of
action and of aggression. I dream I am jumping, swim­
ming, running, climbing; I dream that I burst out laugh­
ing, that I span a river in one stride, or that I am followed
by a flood of motorcars which never catch up with me.
During the period of colonization, the native never stops
achieving his freedom from nine in the evening until six
in the morning.
   The colonized man will first manifest this aggressiveness
which has been deposited in his bones against his own
people. This is the period when the niggers beat each
other up, and the police and magistrates do not know
which way to turn when faced with the astonishing waves
of crime in North Africa. We shall see later how this
phenomenon should be judged.* When the native is
confronted with the colonial order of things, he finds he
is in a state of permanent tension. The settler's world is
a hostile world, which spums the native, but at the same
time it is a world of which he is envious. We have seen
that the native never ceases to dream of putting himself
in the place of the settler—not of becoming the settler
but of substituting himself for the settler. This hostile
world, ponderous and aggressive because it fends off the
colonized masses with all the harshness it is capable of,
represents not merely a hell from which the swiftest flight

  * See the section: "Colonial War and Mental Disorders."


possible is desirable, but also a paradise close at hand
which is guarded by terrible watchdogs.
   The native is always on the alert, for since he can only
make out with difficulty the many symbols of the colonial
world, he is never sure whether or not he has crossed the
frontier. Confronted with a world ruled by the settler,
the native is always presumed guilty. But the native's
guilt is never a guilt which he accepts; it is rather a kind
of curse, a sort of sword of Damocles, for, in his innermost
spirit, the native admits no accusation. He is overpowered
but not tamed; he is treated as an inferior but he is not
convinced of his inferiority. He is patiently waiting until
the settler is off his guard to fly at him. The native's
muscles are always tensed. You can't say that he is ter­
rorized, or even apprehensive. He is in fact ready at a
moment's notice to exchange the role of the quarry for
that of the hunter. The native is an oppressed person
whose permanent dream is to become the persecutor. The
symbols of social order—the police, the bugle calls in the
barracks, military parades and the waving flags—are at one
and the same time inhibitory and stimulating: for they
do not convey the message "Don't dare to budge"; rather,
 they cry out "Get ready to attack." And, in fact, if the native
had any tendency to fall asleep and to forget, the settler's
hauteur and the settler's anxiety to test the strength of
 the colonial system would remind him at every turn that
 the great showdown cannot be put off indefinitely. That
 impulse to take the settler's place implies a tonicity of
 muscles the whole time; and in fact we know that in
 certain emotional conditions the presence of an obstacle
 accentuates the tendency toward motion.
  The settler-native relationship is a mass relationship.
The settler pits brute force against the weight of numbers.
He is an exhibitionist. His preoccupation with security
makes him remind the native out loud that there he alone


is master. The settler keeps alive in the native an anger
which he deprives of outlet; the native is trapped in the
tight links of the chains of colonialism. But we have
seen that inwardly the settler can only achieve a pseudo
petrification. The native's muscular tension finds outlet
regularly in bloodthirsty explosions—in tribal warfare, in
feuds between septs, and in quarrels between individuals.
   Where individuals are concerned, a positive negation
of common sense is evident. While the settler or the
policeman has the right the livelong day to strike the
native, to insult him and to make him crawl to them,
you will see the native reaching for his knife at the
slightest hostile or aggressive glance cast on him by an­
other native; for the last resort of the native is to defend
his personality vis-a-vis his brother. Tribal feuds only
serve to perpetuate old grudges buried deep in the memory.
By throwing himself with all his force into the vendetta,
the native tries to persuade himself that colonialism does
not exist, that everything is going on as before, that his­
tory continues. Here on the level of communal organiza­
tions we clearly discern the well-known behavior patterns
of avoidance. It is as if plunging into a fraternal blood­
bath allowed them to ignore the obstacle, and to put off
till later the choice, nevertheless inevitable, which opens
up the question of armed resistance to colonialism. Thus
collective autodestruction in a very concrete form is one
of the ways in which the native's muscular tension is set
free. All these patterns of conduct are those of the death
reflex when faced with danger, a suicidal behavior which
proves to the settler (whose existence and domination is
by them all the more justified) that these men are not
reasonable human beings. In the same way the native
manages to by-pass the settler. A belief in fatality removes
all blame from the oppressor; the cause of misfortunes and
of poverty is attributed to God: He is Fate. In this way


the individual accepts the disintegration ordained by God,
bows down before the settler and his lot, and by a kind
of interior restabilization acquires a stony calm.
   Meanwhile, however, life goes on, and the native will
strengthen the inhibitions which contain his aggressive­
ness by drawing on the terrifying myths which are so
frequently found in underdeveloped communities. There
are maleficent spirits which intervene every time a step
is taken in the wrong direction, leopard-men, serpent-men,
six-legged dogs, zombies—a whole series of tiny animals
or giants which create around the native a world of pro­
hibitions, of barriers and of inhibitions far more terrifying
than the world of the settler. This magical superstructure
which permeates native society fulfills certain well-defined
functions in the dynamism of the libido. One of the
characteristics of underdeveloped societies is in fact that
the libido is first and foremost the concern of a group,
or of the family. The feature of communities whereby a
man who dreams that he has sexual relations with a
woman other than his own must confess it in public and
pay a fine in kind or in working days to the injured hus­
band or family is fully described by ethnologists. W e may
note in passing that this proves that the so-called pre­
historic societies attach great importance to the uncon­
scious.
   The atmosphere of myth and magic frightens me and
 so takes on an undoubted reality. By terrifying me, it
 integrates me in the traditions and the history of my
 district or of my tribe, and at the same time it reassures
 me, it gives me a status, as it were an identification paper.
 In underdeveloped countries the occult sphere is a sphere
 belonging to the community which is entirely under magi­
 cal jurisdiction. By entangling myself in this inextricable
 network where actions are repeated with crystalline in­
 evitability, I find the everlasting world which belongs to


me, and the perenniality which is thereby affirmed of the
world belonging to us. Believe me, the zombies are more
terrifying than the settlers; and in consequence the prob­
lem is no longer that of keeping oneself right with the
colonial world and its barbed-wire entanglements, but of
considering three times before urinating, spitting, or going
out into the night.
   The supernatural, magical powers reveal themselves as
essentially personal; the settler's powers are infinitely
shrunken, stamped with their alien origin. We no longer
really need to fight against them since what counts is the
frightening enemy created by myths. We perceive that all
is settled by a permanent confrontation on the phantasmic
plane.
   It has always happened in the struggle for freedom that
such a people, formerly lost in an imaginary maze, a prey
to unspeakable terrors yet happy to lose themselves in a
dreamlike torment, such a people becomes unhinged, re­
organizes itself, and in blood and tears gives birth to very
real and immediate action. Feeding the moudjahidines*
posting sentinels, coming to the help of families which
lack the bare necessities, or taking the place of a husband
who has been killed or imprisoned: such are the concrete
tasks to which the people is called during the struggle for
freedom.
   In the colonial world, the emotional sensitivity of the
native is kept on the surface of his skin like an open sore
which flinches from the caustic agent; and the psyche
shrinks back, obliterates itself and finds outlet in muscular
demonstrations which have caused certain very wise men
 to say that the native is a hysterical type. This sensitive
emotionalism, watched by invisible keepers who are how-

   * Highly-trained soldiers who are completely dedicated to the Mos­
lem cause.—Trans.


ever in unbroken contact with the core of the personality,
will find its fulfillment through eroticism in the driving
forces behind the crisis' dissolution.
    On another level we see the native's emotional sensibil­
ity exhausting itself in dances which are more or less
ecstatic. This is why any study of the colonial world
should take into consideration the phenomena of the
dance and of possession. The native's relaxation takes pre­
cisely the form of a muscular orgy in which the most acute
aggressivity and the most impelling violence are canalized,
transformed, and conjured away. The circle of the dance is
a permissive circle: it protects and permits. At certain
times on certain days, men and women come together at
a given place, and there, under the solemn eye of the
tribe, fling themselves into a seemingly unorganized pan­
tomime, which is in reality extremely systematic, in which
by various means—shakes of the head, bending of the
spinal column, throwing of the whole body backward—
may be deciphered as in an open book the huge effort of
a community to exorcise itself, to liberate itself, to explain
itself. There are no limits—inside the circle. The hillock
 up which you have toiled as if to be nearer to the moon;
 the river bank down which you slip as if to show the
 connection between the dance and ablutions, cleansing
 and purification—these are sacred places. There are no
 limits—for in reality your purpose in coming together is
 to allow the accumulated libido, the hampered aggressivity,
 to dissolve as in a volcanic eruption. Symbolical killings,
  fantastic rides, imaginary mass murders—all must be
  brought out. The evil humors are undammed, and flow
  away with a din as of molten lava.
    One step further and you are completely possessed. In
  fact, these are actually organized seances of possession and
  exorcism; they include vampirism, possession by djinns,
  by zombies, and by Legba, the famous god of the voodoo.


This disintegrating of the personality, this splitting and
dissolution, all this fulfills a primordial function in the
organism of the colonial world. When they set out, the
men and women were impatient, stamping their feet in
a state of nervous excitement; when they return, peace has
been restored to the village; it is once more calm, and
unmoved.
   During the struggle for freedom, a marked alienation
from these practices is observed. The native's back is to
the wall, the knife is at his throat (or, more precisely, the
electrode at his genitals): he will have no more call for
his fancies. After centuries of unreality, after having wal­
lowed in the most outlandish phantoms, at long last the
native, gun in hand, stands face to face with the only
forces which contend for his life—the forces of colonial­
ism. And the youth of a colonized country, growing up in
an atmosphere of shot and fire, may well make a mock
of, and does not hesitate to pour scorn upon the zombies
of his ancestors, the horses with two heads, the dead who
rise again, and the djinns who rush into your body while
you yawn. The native discovers reality and transforms it
into the pattern of his customs, into the practice of vio­
lence and into his plan for freedom.
   W e have seen that this same violence, though kept very
much on the surface all through the colonial period, yet
turns in the void. W e have also seen that it is canalized
by the emotional outlets of dance and possession by spirits;
we have seen how it is exhausted in fratricidal combats.
Now the problem is to lay hold of this violence which is
 changing direction. When formerly it was appeased by
myths and exercised its talents in finding fresh ways of
 committing mass suicide, now new conditions will make
 possible a completely new line of action.
   Nowadays a theoretical problem of prime importance is
 being set, on the historical plane as well as on the level of


political tactics, by the liberation of the colonies: when
can one affirm that the situation is ripe for a movement
of national liberation? In what form should it first be
manifested? Because the various means whereby decol­
onization has been carried out have appeared in many
different aspects, reason hesitates and refuses to say which
is a true decolonization, and which a false. We shall see
that for a man who is in the thick of the fight it is an
urgent matter to decide on the means and the tactics to
employ: that is to say, how to conduct and organize the
movement. If this coherence is not present there is only a
blind will toward freedom, with the terribly reactionary
risks which it entails.
   What are the forces which in the colonial period open
up new outlets and engender new aims for the violence
of colonized peoples? In the first place there are the politi­
cal parries and the intellectual or commercial elites. Now,
the characteristic feature of certain political structures is
that they proclaim abstract principles but refrain from
issuing definite commands. The entire action of these
nationalist political parties during the colonial period is
action of the electoral type: a string of philosophico-
political dissertations on the themes of the rights of peo­
ples to self-determination, the rights of man to freedom
from hunger and human dignity, and the unceasing af­
firmation of the principle: "One man, one vote." The
national political parties never lay stress upon the neces­
sity of a trial of armed strength, for the good reason that
their objective is not the radical overthrowing of the sys­
tem. Pacifists and legalists, they are in fact partisans of
order, the new order—but to the colonialist bourgeoisie
they put bluntly enough the demand which to them is
the main one: "Give us more power." On the specific
question of violence, the elite are ambiguous. They are
violent in their words and reformist in their attitudes.
 60 / The Wretched       of the Earth

 When the nationalist political leaders say something, they
 make quite clear that they do not really think it.
   This characteristic on the part of the nationalist politi­
 cal parties should be interpreted in the light both of the
 make-up of their leaders and the nature of their followings.
 The rank-and-file of a nationalist party is urban. The
workers, primary schoolteachers, artisans, and small shop­
keepers who have begun to profit—at a discount, to be
sure—from the colonial setup, have special interests at
heart. W h a t this sort of following demands is the better­
 ment of their particular lot: increased salaries, for example.
The dialogue between these political parties and colonial­
ism is never broken off. Improvements are discussed, such
as full electoral representation, the liberty of the press,
and liberty of association. Reforms are debated. Thus it
need not astonish anyone to notice that a large number
of natives are militant members of the branches of politi­
cal parties which stem from the mother country. These
natives fight under an abstract watchword: "Government
by the workers," and they forget that in their country it
should be nationalist watchwords which are first in the
field. The native intellectual has clothed his aggressiveness
in his barely veiled desire to assimilate himself to the
colonial world. He has used his aggressiveness to serve his
own individual interests.
   Thus there is very easily brought into being a kind of
class of affranchised slaves, or slaves who are individually
free. What the intellectual demands is the right to mul­
tiply the emancipated, and the opportunity to organize a
genuine class of emancipated citizens. On the other hand,
the mass of the people have no intention of standing by
and watching individuals increase their chances of success.
What they demand is not the settler's position of status,
but the settler's place. The immense majority of natives
want the settler's farm. For them, there is no question of


entering into competition with the settler. They want to
take his place.
    The peasantry is systematically disregarded for the most
part by the propaganda put out by the nationalist parties.
And it is clear that in the colonial countries the peasants
alone are revolutionary, for they have nothing to lose and
everything to gain. The starving peasant, outside the class
system, is the first among the exploited to discover that
only violence pays. For him there is no compromise, no
possible coming to terms; colonization and decolonization
are simply a question of relative strength. The exploited
man sees that his liberation implies the use of all means,
and that of force first and foremost. When in 1956, after
 the capitulation of Monsieur Guy Mollet to the settlers
 in Algeria, the Front de Lib6ration Nationale, in a famous
 leaflet, stated that colonialism only loosens its hold when
 the knife is at its throat, no Algerian really found these
 terms too violent. The leaflet only expressed what every
 Algerian felt at heart: colonialism is not a thinking ma­
 chine, nor a body endowed with reasoning faculties. It is
 violence in its natural state, and it will only yield when
 confronted with greater violence.
     At the decisive moment, the colonialist bourgeoisie,
  which up till then has remained inactive, comes into the
  field. It introduces that new idea which is in proper par­
  lance a creation of the colonial situation: non-violence. In
  its simplest form this non-violence signifies to the intellec­
  tual and economic elite of the colonized country that the
  bourgeoisie has the same interests as they and that it is
   therefore urgent and indispensable to come to terms for
   the public good. Non-violence is an attempt to settle the
   colonial problem around a green baize table, before any
   regrettable act has been performed or irreparable gesture
   made, before any blood has been shed. But if the masses,
   without waiting for the chairs to be arranged around the


baize table, listen to their own voice and begin committing
outrages and setting fire to buildings, the elite and the
nationalist bourgeois parties will be seen rushing to the
colonialists to exclaim, "This is very serious! W e do not
know how it will end; we must find a solution—some sort
of compromise."
   This idea of compromise is very important in the phe­
nomenon of decolonization, for it is very far from being
a simple one. Compromise involves the colonial system
and the young nationalist bourgeoisie at one and the
same time. The partisans of the colonial system discover
that the masses may destroy everything. Blown-up bridges,
ravaged farms, repressions, and fighting harshly disrupt
the economy. Compromise is equally attractive to the
nationalist bourgeoisie, who since they are not clearly
aware of the possible consequences of the rising storm,
are genuinely afraid of being swept away by this huge
hurricane and never stop saying to the settlers: " W e are
still capable of stopping the slaughter; the masses still
have confidence in us; act quickly if you do not want to
put everything in jeopardy." One step more, and the
leader of the nationalist party keeps his distance with
regard to that violence. He loudly proclaims that he has
nothing to do with these Mau-Mau, these terrorists, these
throat-slitters. At best, he shuts himself off in a no man's
land between the terrorists and the settlers and willingly
offers his services as go-between; that is to say, that as the
settlers cannot discuss terms with these Mau-Mau, he
himself will be quite willing to begin negotiations. Thus
it is that the rear guard of the national struggle, that very
party of people who have never ceased to be on the other
side in the fight, find themselves somersaulted into the
van of negotiations and compromise—precisely because
that p i r tv has taken very good care never to break contact
with colonialism.


    Before negotiations have been set afoot, the majority of
nationalist parties confine themselves for the most part to
explaining and excusing this "savagery." They do not
assert that the people have to use physical force, and it
sometimes even happens that they go so far as to con­
demn, in private, the spectacular deeds which are declared
to be hateful by the press and public opinion in the
mother country. The legitimite excuse for this ultra-con­
servative policy is the desire to see things in an objective
light; but this traditional attitude of the native intellectual
and of the leaders of the nationalist parties is not, in
reality, in the least objective. For in fact they are not at
all convinced that this impatient violence of the masses
is the most efficient means of defending their own in­
terests. Moreover, there are some individuals who are con­
vinced of the ineffectiveness of violent methods; for them,
there is no doubt about it, every attempt to break colonial
oppression by force is a hopeless effort, an attempt at
suicide, because in the innermost recesses of their brains
the settler's tanks and airplanes occupy a huge place.
 When they are told "Action must be taken," they see
 bombs raining down on them, armored cars coming at
 them on every path, machine-gunning and police action . . .
 and they sit quiet. They are beaten from the start. There
 is no need to demonstrate their incapacity to triumph by
 violent methods; they take it for granted in their everyday
 life and in their political maneuvers. They have remained
 in the same childish position as Engels took up in his
 famous polemic with that monument of puerility, Mon­
 sieur Duhring:
   In the same way that Robinson [Crusoe] was able to ob­
tain a sword, we can just as well suppose that [Man] Friday
might appear one fine morning with a loaded revolver in his
hand, and from then on the whole relationship of violence is
reversed: Man Friday gives the orders and Crusoe is obliged


to work. . . . Thus, the revolver triumphs over the sword, and
even the most childish believer in axioms will doubtless form
the conclusion that violence is not a simple act of will, but
needs for its realization certain very concrete preliminary con­
ditions, and in particular the implements of violence; and the
more highly developed of these implements will carry the day
against primitive ones. Moreover, the very fact of the ability
to produce such weapons signifies that the producer of highly
developed weapons, in everyday speech the arms manufac­
turer, triumphs over the producer of primitive weapons. To
put it briefly, the triumph of violence depends upon the pro­
duction of armaments, and this in its turn depends on pro­
duction in general, and thus . . . on economic strength, on
the economy of the State, and in the last resort on the ma­
terial means which that violence commands.*
   In fact, the leaders of reform have nothing else to say
than: "With what are you going to fight the settlers?
With your knives? Your shotguns?"
   It is true that weapons are important when violence
comes into play, since all finally depends on the distribu­
tion of these implements. But it so happens that the
liberation of colonial countries throws new light on the
subject. For example, we have seen that during the Span­
ish campaign, which was a very genuine colonial war,
Napoleon, in spite of an army which reached in the offen­
sives of the spring of 1810 the huge figure of 400,000 men,
was forced to retreat. Yet the French army made the
whole of Europe tremble by its weapons of war, by the
bravery of its soldiers, and by the military genius of its
leaders. Face to face with the enormous potentials of the
Napoleonic troops, the Spaniards, inspired by an unshake-
able national ardor, rediscovered the famous methods of
guerilla warfare which, twenty-five years before, the Amer­
ican militia had tried out on the English forces. But the
   * Friedrich Engels: Anti-Duhring, Part II, Chapter III, "Theory
of Violence," p. 199.


native's guerilla warfare would be of no value as o p
posed to other means of violence if it did not form a
new element in the worldwide process of competition
between trusts and monopolies.
   In the early days of colonization, a single column could
occupy immense stretches of country: the Congo, Nigeria,
the Ivory Coast, and so on. Today, however, the colonized
countries' national struggle crops up in a completely new
international situation. Capitalism, in its early days, saw in
the colonies a source of raw materials which, once turned
into manufactured goods, could be distributed on the
European market. After a phase of accumulation of capi­
tal, capitalism has today come to modify its conception of
the profit-earning capacity of a commercial enterprise.
The colonies have become a market. The colonial popula­
tion is a customer who is ready to buy goods; conse­
quently, if the garrison has to be perpetually reinforced,
if buying and selling slackens off, that is to say if manu­
 factured and finished goods can no longer be exported,
 there is clear proof that the solution of military force must
be set aside. A blind domination founded on slavery is
 not economically speaking worthwhile for the bourgeoisie
 of the mother country. The monopolistic group within
 this bourgeoisie does not support a government whose
 policy is solely that of the sword. W h a t the factory-
 owners and finance magnates of the mother country ex­
 pect from their government is not that it should decimate
 the colonial peoples, but that it should safeguard with the
  help of economic conventions their own "legitimate
 interests."
  Thus there exists a sort of detached complicity between
capitalism and the violent forces which blaze up in
colonial territory. W h a t is more, the native is not alone
against the oppressor, for indeed there is also the political
and diplomatic support of progressive countries and peo-


pies. But above all there is competition, that pitiless war
which financial groups wage upon each other. A Berlin
Conference was able to tear Africa into shreds and divide
her up between three or four imperial flags. At the mo­
ment, the important thing is not whether such-and-such
a region in Africa is under French or Belgian sovereignty,
but rather that the economic zones are respected. Today,
wars of repression are no longer waged against rebel
sultans; everything is more elegant, less bloodthirsty; the
liquidation of the Castro regime will be quite peaceful.
They do all they can to strangle Guinea and they elimi­
nate Mossadegh. Thus the nationalist leader who is
frightened of violence is wrong if he imagines that colo­
nialism is going to "massacre all of us." The military will
of course go on playing with tin soldiers which date from
the time of the conquest, but higher finance will soon
bring the truth home to them.
   This is why reasonable nationalist political parties are
asked to set out their claims as clearly as possible, and to
seek with their colonialist opposite numbers, calmly and
without passion, for a solution which will take the in­
terests of both parties into consideration. W e see that if
this nationalist reformist tendency which often takes the
form of a kind of caricature of trade unionism decides to
take action, it will only do so in a highly peaceful fashion,
through stoppages of work in the few industries which
have been set up in the towns, mass demonstrations to
cheer the leaders, and the boycotting of buses or of im­
ported commodities. All these forms of action serve at
one and the same time to bring pressure to bear on the
forces of colonialism, and to allow the people to work off
their energy. This practice of therapy by hibernation, this
s'eep-cure used on the people, may sometimes be success­
 ful thns out of the conference around the green baize
 table comes the political selectiveness which enables Mon-


sieur M'ba, the president of the Republic of Gabon, to
state in all seriousness on his arrival in Paris for an official
visit: "Gabon is independent, but between Gabon and
France nothing has changed; everything goes on as before."
In fact, the only change is that Monsieur M'ba is presi­
dent of the Gabonese Republic and that he is received by
the president of the French Republic.
   The colonialist bourgeoisie is helped in its work of
calming down the natives by the inevitable religion. All
those saints who have turned the other cheek, who have
forgiven trespasses against them, and who have been spat
on and insulted without shrinking are studied and held
up as examples. On the other hand, the elite of the
colonial countries, those slaves set free, when at the head
of the movement inevitably end up by producing an
ersatz conflict. They use their brothers' slavery to shame
the slavedrivers or to provide an ideological policy of
quaint humanitarianism for their oppressors' financial com­
petitors. The truth is that they never make any real appeal
to the aforesaid slaves; they never mobilize them in con­
crete terms. On the contrary, at the decisive moment (that
is to say, from their point of view the moment of indeci­
sion) they brandish the danger of a "mass mobilization"
as the crucial weapon which would bring about as if by
magic the "end of the colonial regime." Obviously there
are to be found at the core of the political parties and
among their leaders certain revolutionaries who delib­
erately turn their backs upon the farce of national inde­
pendence. But very quickly their questionings, their en­
ergy, and their anger obstruct the party machine; and
these elements are gradually isolated, and then quite
simply brushed aside. At this moment, as if there existed
a dialectic concomitance, the colonialist police will fall
upon them. With no security in the towns, avoided by
 the militants of their former party and rejected by its


leaders, these undesirable firebrands will be stranded in
 coun f y dis nets. Then it is that they will realize be-
wi'dered'y that the peasant masses catch on to what they
have to say immediate"y, and w'thout delay ask them the
 question to which they have not yet prepared the answer:
"When do we start?"
   This meeting of revolutionaries coming from the towns
and country dwellers will be dealt with later on. For the
moment we must go back to the political parties, in order
to show the nature of their action, which is all the same
progressive. In their speeches the political leaders give a
name to the nation. In this way the native's demands are
given shipe.
   There is however no definite subject matter and no
po- t cal or social program. There is a vague outline or
ske'e on, which is neverthe^ss national in form, what we
describe as "minimum requirements." The politicians who
make speeches and who write in the nationalist newspa­
pers make the people dream dreams. They avoid the
actual overthrowing of the state, but in fact they introduce
into their readers' or hearers' consciousness the terrible
ferment of subversion. The national or tribal language is
often used. Here, once again, dreams are encouraged, and
the imagination is let loose outside the bounds of the
colonial order; and sometimes these politicians speak of
"We Negroes, we Arabs," and these terms which are so
profoundly ambivalant take on during the colonial epoch
a sacramental signification. The nationalist politicians are
playing with fire: for, as an African leader recently warned
a group of young intellectuals, "Think well before you
speak to the masses, for they flare up quickly." This is one
of the terrible tricks that destiny plays in the colonies.
   When a political leader calls a mass meeting, we may
say th-t mere is blood in the air. Yet the same leader very
often is above all anxious to "make a show" of force, so


that in fact he need not use it. But the agitation which
ensues, the coming and going, the listening to speeches,
seeing the people assembled in one place, with the police
all around, the military demonstrations, arrests, and the
deportation of the leaders—all this hubbub makes the
people think that the moment has come for them to take
action. In these times of instability the political parties
multiply their appeals to the left for calm, while on their
right they scan the horizon, trying to make out the liberal
intentions of colonialism.
    In the same way the people make use of certain episodes
in the life of the community in order to hold themselves
ready and to keep alive their revolutionary zeal. For ex­
ample, the gangster who holds up the police set on to
track him down for days on end, or who dies in single
combat after having killed four or five policemen, or who
commits suicide in order not to give away his accomplices
—these types light the way for the people, form the blue­
prints for action and become heroes. Obviously, it's a
waste of breath to say that such-and-such a hero is a thief,
a scoundrel, or a reprobate. If the act for which he is
prosecuted by the colonial authorities is an act exclusively
directed against a colonialist person or colonialist prop­
 erty, the demarcation line is definite and manifest. The
process of identification is automatic.
    W e must also notice in this ripening process the role
 played by the history of the resistance at the time of the
 conquest. The great figures of the colonized people are
 always those who led the national resistance to invasion.
 Behanzin, Soundiata, Samory, Abdel Kader—all spring
 again to life with peculiar intensity in the period which
 comes directly before action. This is the proof that the
 people are getting ready to begin to go forward again, to
 put an end to the static period begun by colonization, and
  to make history.
 70 / The Wretched       of the Earth

    The uprising of the new nation and the breaking down
 of colonial structures are the result of one of two causes:
 either of a violent struggle of the people in their own right,
 or of action on the part of surrounding colonized peoples
 which acts as a brake on the colonial regime in question.
   A colonized people is not alone. In spite of all that
colonialism can do, its frontiers remain open to new ideas
and echoes from the world outside. It discovers that
violence is in the atmosphere, that it here and there bursts
out, and here and there sweeps away the colonial regime
—that same violence which fulfills for the native a role
that is not simply informatory, but also operative. The
great victory of the Vietnamese people at Dien Bien Phu
is no longer, strictly speaking, a Vietnamese victory. Since
July, 1954, the question which the colonized peoples have
asked themselves has been, " W h a t must be done to bring
about another Dien Bien Phu? How can we manage it?"
Not a single colonized individual could ever again doubt
the possibility of a Dien Bien Phu; the only problem was
how best to use the forces at their disposal, how to organ­
ize them, and when to bring them into action. This en­
compassing violence does not work upon the colonized
people only; it modifies the attitude of the colonialists
who become aware of manifold Dien Bien Phus. This is
why a veritable panic takes hold of the colonialist govern­
ments in turn. Their purpose is to capture the vanguard,
to turn the movement of liberation toward the right, and
to disarm the people: quick, quick, let's decolonize. De­
colonize the Congo before it turns into another Algeria.
Vote the constitutional framework for all Africa, create
the French Communaute, renovate that same Commun-
aute, but for God's sake let's decolonize quick. . . . And
they decolonize at such a rate that they impose independ­
ence on Houphouet-Boigny. To the strategy of Dien Bien
Phu, defined by the colonized peoples, the colonialist re-


plies by the strategy of encirclement—based on the respect
of the sovereignty of states.
   But let us return to that atmosphere of violence, that
violence which is just under the skin. W e have seen that
in its process toward maturity many leads are attached to
it, to control it and show it the way out. Yet in spite of the
metamorphoses which the colonial regime imposes upon
it in the way of tribal or regional quarrels, that violence
makes its way forward, and the native identifies his enemy
and recognizes all his misfortunes, throwing all the exacer­
bated might of his hate and anger into this new channel.
But how do we pass from the atmosphere of violence to
violence in action? What makes the lid blow off? There is
first of all the fact that this development does not leave
the settler's blissful existence intact. The settler who "un­
derstands" the natives is made aware by several straws in
the wind showing that something is afoot. "Good" natives
become scarce; silence falls when the oppressor ap­
proaches; sometimes looks are black, and attitudes and re­
marks openly aggressive. The nationalist parties are astir,
they hold a great many meetings, the police are increased
and reinforcements of soldiers are brought in. The settlers,
above all the farmers isolated on their land, are the first to
 become alarmed. They call for energetic measures.
  The authorities do in fact take some spectacular meas­
ures. They arrest one or two leaders, they organize military
parades and maneuvers, and air force displays. But the
demonstrations and warlike exercises, the smell of gun­
powder which now fills the atmosphere, these things do
not make the people draw back. Those bayonets and
cannonades only serve to reinforce their aggressiveness.
The atmosphere becomes dramatic, and everyone wishes
to show that he is ready for anything. And it is in these
circumstances that the guns go off by themselves, for nerves
are jangled, fear reigns and everyone is trigger-happy. A


single commonplace incident is enough to start the ma­
chine-gunning: S6tif in Algeria, the Central Quarries in
Morocco, Moramanga in Madagascar.
   The repressions, far from calling a halt to the forward
rush of national consciousness, urge it on. Mass slaughter
in the colonies at a certain stage of the embryonic develop­
ment of consciousness increases that consciousness, for
the hecatombs are an indication that between oppressors
and oppressed everything can be solved by force. It must
be remarked here that the political parties have not called
for armed insurrection, and have made no preparations for
such an insurrection. All these repressive measures, all
those actions which are a result of fear are not within the
leaders' intentions: they are overtaken by events. At this
moment, then, colonialism may decide to arrest the na­
tionalist leaders. But today the governments of colonized
countries know very well that it is extremely dangerous to
deprive the masses of their leaders; for then the people,
unbridled, fling themselves into jacqueries, mutinies, and
"brutish murders." The masses give free rein to their
"bloodthirsty instincts" and force colonialism to free their
leaders, to whom falls the difficult task of bringing them
back to order. The colonized people, who have spontane­
ously brought their violence to the colossal task of destroy­
ing the colonial system, will very soon find themselves
with the barren, inert slogan "Release X or Y."* Then
colonialism will release these men, and hold discussions
with them. The time for dancing in the streets has come.
   In certain circumstances, the party political machine
may remain intact. But as a result of the colonialist repres­
sion and of the spontaneous reaction of the people the
parties find themselves out-distanced by their militants.
  * It may happen that the arrested leader is in fact the authentic
mouthpiece of the colonized masses. In this case colonialism will
make use of his period of detention to try to launch new leaders.


The violence of the masses is vigorously pitted against the
military forces of the occupying power, and the situation
deteriorates and comes to a head. Those leaders who are
free remain, therefore, on the touchline. They have sud­
denly become useless, with their bureaucracy and their
reasonable demands; yet we see them, far removed from
events, attempting the crowning imposture—that of
"speaking in the name of the silenced nation." As a gen­
eral rule, colonialism welcomes this godsend with open
arms, tranforms these "blind mouths" into spokesmen,
and in two minutes endows them with independence, on
condition that they restore order.
    So we see that all parties are aware of the power of such
violence and that the question is not always to reply to it
by a greater violence, but rather to see how to relax the
tension.
    What is the real nature of this violence? We have seen
that it is the intuition of the colonized masses that their
liberation must, and can only, be achieved by force. By
what spiritual aberration do these men, without technique,
starving and enfeebled, confronted with the military and
 economic might of the occupation, come to believe that
 violence alone will free them? How can they hope to
 triumph?
    It is because violence (and this is the disgraceful thing)
 may constitute, in so far as it forms part of its system, the
 slogan of a political party. The leaders may call on the
 people to enter upon an armed struggle. This problemati­
 cal question has to be thought over. When militarist Ger­
 many decides to settle its frontier disputes by force, we
 are not in the least surprised; but when the people of
 Angola, for example, decide to take up arms, when the
 Algerian people reject all means which are not violent,
  these are proofs that something has happened or is hap­
  pening at this very moment. The colonized races, those


slaves of modern times, are impatient. They know that
this apparent folly alone can put them out of reach of
colonial oppression. A new type of relations is established
in the world. The underdeveloped peoples try to break
their chains, and the extraordinary thing is that they suc­
ceed. It could be argued that in these days of sputniks it
is ridiculous to die of hunger; but for the colonized masses
the argument is more down-to-earth. The truth is that
there is no colonial power today which is capable of
adopting the only form of contest which has a chance
of succeeding, namely, the prolonged establishment of
large forces of occupation.
   As far as their internal situation is concerned, the
colonialist countries find themselves faced with contra­
dictions in the form of working-class demands which
necessitate the use of their police forces. As well, in the
present international situation, these countries need their
troops to protect their regimes. Finally there is the well-
known myth of liberating movements directed from Mos­
cow. In the regime's panic-stricken reasoning, this signifies
"If that goes on, there is a risk that the communists will
turn the troubles to account and infiltrate into these
parts."
   In the native's eagerness, the fact that he openly brand­
ishes the threat of violence proves that he is conscious of
the unusual character of the contemporary situation and
that he means to profit by it. But, still on the level of
immediate experience, the native, who has seen the mod­
ern world penetrate into the furthermost corners of the
bush, is most acutely aware of all the things he does not
possess. The masses by a sort of (if we may say so) child­
like process of reasoning convince themselves that they
have been robbed of all these things. That is why in
certain underdeveloped countries the masses forge ahead
 very quickly, and realize two or three years after independ-


ence that they have been frustrated, that "it wasn't worth
while" fighting, and that nothing could really change. In
1789, after the bourgeois revolution, the smallest French
peasants benefited substantially from the upheaval. But it
is a commonplace to observe and to say that in the
majority of cases, for 95 per cent of the population of un­
derdeveloped countries, independence brings no immediate
change. The enlightened observer takes note of the exist­
ence of a kind of masked discontent, like the smoking
ashes of a burnt-down house after the fire has been put
out, which still threaten to burst into flames again.
    So they say that the natives want to go too quickly.
Now, let us never forget that only a very short time ago
they complained of their slowness, their laziness, and their
fatalism. Already we see that violence used in specific ways
at the moment of the struggle for freedom does not magi­
cally disappear after the ceremony of trooping the na­
tional colors. It has all the less reason for disappearing
since the reconstruction of the nation continues within the
framework of cutthroat competition between capitalism
and socialism.
    This competition gives an almost universal dimension
to even the most localized demands. Every meeting held,
 every act of represson committed, reverberates in the inter­
 national arena. The murders of Sharpeville shook public
 opinion for months. In the newspapers, over the wave­
 lengths, and in private conversations Sharpeville has be­
 come a symbol. It was through Sharpeville that men and
 women first became acquainted with the problem of
 apartheid in South Africa. Moreover, we cannot believe
 that demagogy alone is the explanation for the sudden
 interest the big powers show in the petty affairs of under­
  developed regions. Each jacquerie, each act of sedition in
  the Third World makes up part of a picture framed by the
  Cold War. Two men are beaten up in Salisbury, and at


once the whole of a bloc goes into action, talks about
those two men, and uses the beating-up incident to bring
up the particular problem of Rhodesia, linking it, more­
over, with the whole African question and with the whole
question of colonized people. The other bloc however is
equally concerned in measuring by the magnitude of the
campaign the local weaknesses of its system. Thus the
colonized peoples realize that neither clan remains outside
local incidents. They no longer limit themselves to re­
gional horizons, for they have caught on to the fact that
they live in an atmosphere of international stress.
   When every three months or so we hear that the Sixth
or Seventh Fleet is moving toward such-and-such a coast;
when Khrushchev threatens to come to Castro's aid with
rockets; when Kennedy decides upon some desperate
solution for the Laos question, the colonized person or
the newly independent native has the impression that
whether he wills it or not he is being carried away in a
kind of frantic cavalcade. In fact, he is marching in it
already. Let us take, for example, the case of the govern­
ments of recently liberated countries. The men at the
head of affairs spend two-thirds of their time in watching
the approaches and trying to anticipate the dangers which
threaten them, and the remaining one-third of their time
in working for their country. At the same time, they search
for allies. Obedient to the same dialectic, the national
parties of opposition leave the paths of parliamentary be­
havior. They also look for allies to support them in their
ruthless ventures into sedition. The atmosphere of vio­
lence, after having colored all the colonial phase, con­
tinues to dominate national life, for as we have already
said, the Third World is not cut off from the rest. Quite
the contrary, it is at the middle of the whirlpool. This is
why the statesmen of underdeveloped countries keep up


indefinitely the tone of aggressiveness and exasperation in
their public speeches which in the normal way ought to
have disappeared. Herein, also, may be found the reasons
for that lack of politeness so often spoken of in connection
with newly established rulers. But what is less visible is the
extreme courtesy of these same rulers in their contacts
with their brothers or their comrades. Discourtesy is first
and foremost a manner to be used in dealings with the
others, with the former colonists who come to observe and
to investigate. The "ex-native" too often gets the impres­
sion that these reports are already written. The photos
which illustrate the article are simply a proof that one
knows what one is talking about, and that one has visited
the country. The report intends to verify the evidence:
everything's going badly out there since we left. Frequently
reporters complain of being badly received, of being forced
to work under bad conditions and of being fenced round
by indifference or hostility: all this is quite normal. The
 nationalist leaders know that international opinion is
formed solely by the Western press. Now, when a journal­
 ist from the West asks us questions, it is seldom in order
to help us. In the Algerian war, for example, even the most
liberal of the French reporters never ceased to use ambigu­
 ous terms in describing our struggle. When we reproached
 them for this, they replied in all good faith that they were
 being objective. For the native, objectivity is always di­
 rected against him. We may in the same way come to un­
  derstand the new tone which swamped international
 diplomacy at the United Nations General Assembly in
 September, 1960. The representatives of the colonial coun­
 tries were aggressive and violent, and carried things to
 extremes, but the colonial peoples did not find that they
  exaggerated. The radicalism of the African spokesmen
  brought the abcess to a head and showed up the inad-


 missible nature of the veto and of the dialogue between
 the great powers, and above all the tiny role reserved for
 the Third World.
   Diplomacy, as inaugurated by the newly independent
 peoples, is no longer an affair of nuances, of implications,
and of hypnotic passes. For the nation's spokesmen are
responsible at one and the same time for safeguarding the
 unity of the nation, the progress of the masses toward a
state of well-being and the right of all peoples to bread
and liberty. Thus it is a diplomacy which never stops mov­
ing, a diplomacy which leaps ahead, in strange contrast to
the motionless, petrified world of colonization. And when
Mr. Khrushchev brandishes his shoe at the United Na­
tions, or thumps the table with it, there's not a single ex-
native, nor any representative of an underdeveloped coun­
try, who laughs. For what Mr. Khrushchev shows the
colonized countries which are looking on is that he, the
moujik, who moreover is the possessor of spacerockets,
treats these miserable capitalists in the way that they de­
serve. In the same way, Castro sitting in military uniform
in the United Nations Organization docs not scandalize
the underdeveloped countries. What Castro demonstrates
is the consciousness he has of the continuing existence of
the rule of violence. The astonishing thing is that he did
not come into the UNO with a machine-gun; but if he
had, would anyone have minded? All the jacqueries and
desperate deeds, all those bands armed with cutlesses or
axes find their nationality in the implacable struggle which
opposes socialism and capitalism.
   In 1945, the 45,000 dead at Setif could pass unnoticed;
in 1947, the 90,000 dead in Madagascar could be the
subject of a simple paragraph in the papers; in 1952, the
200,000 victims of the repression in Kenya could meet with
relative indifference. This was because the international
contradictions were not sufficiently distinct. Already the


Korean and Indo-Chinese wars had begun a new phase.
But it is above all Budapest and Suez which constitute the
decisive moments of this confrontation.
   Strengthened by the unconditional support of the social­
ist countries, the colonized peoples fling themselves with
whatever arms they have against the impregnable citadel
of colonialism. If this citadel is invulnerable to knives
and naked fists, it is no longer so when we decide to take
into account the context of the Cold W a r .
   In this fresh juncture, the Americans take their role of
patron of international captialism very seriously. Early on,
they advise the European countries to decolonize in a
friendly fashion. Later on, they do not hesitate to proclaim
first the respect for and then the support of the principle
of "Africa for the Africans." The United States is not
afraid today of stating officially that they are the defenders
of the right of all peoples to self-determination. Mr. Men-
nen Williams' last journey is only the illustration of the
consciousness which the Americans have that the Third
World ought not to be sacrificed. From then on we under­
stand why the violence of the native is only hopeless if we
compare it in the abstract to the military machine of the
oppressor. On the other hand, if we situate that violence
in the dynamics of the international situation, we see at
once that it constitutes a terrible menace for the oppressor.
Persistent jacqueries and Mau-Mau disturbance unbalance
the colony's economic life but do not endanger the
mother country. W h a t is more important in the eyes of
imperialism is the opportunity for socialist propaganda to
 infiltrate among the masses and to contaminate them. This
is already a serious danger in the cold war; but what would
happen to that colony in case of real war, riddled as it is
by murderous guerillas?
    Thus capitalism realizes that its military strategy has
 everything to lose by the outbreak of nationalist wars.
 80 / The Wretched         of the Earth

Again, within the framework of peaceful co-existence, all
colonies are destined to disappear, and in the long run neu­
tralism is destined to be respected by capitalism. W h a t
must at all costs be avoided is strategic insecurity: the
breakthrough of enemy doctrine into the masses and the
deeprooted hatred of millions of men. The colonized peo­
ples are very well aware of these imperatives which rule
international political life; for this reason even those who
thunder denunciations of violence take their decisions and
act in terms of this universal violence. Today, peaceful co­
existence between the two blocs provokes and feeds vio­
lence in the colonial countries. Tomorrow, perhaps we
shall see the shifting of that violence after the complete
liberation of the colonial territories. Perhaps we will see
the question of minorities cropping up. Already certain
minority groups do not hesitate to preach violent methods
for resolving their problems and it is not by chance (so the
story runs) that in consequence Negro extremists in the
United States organize a militia and arm themselves. It is
not by chance, either, that in the so-called free world there
exist committees for the defense of Jewish minorities in the
USSR, nor an accident if General de Gaulle in one of his
orations sheds tears over the millions of Moslems op­
pressed by Communist dictatorship. Both capitalism and
imperialism are convinced that the struggle against racial­
ism and the movements toward national freedom are
purely and simply directed by remote control, fomented
from outside. So they decide to use that very efficacious
tactic, the Radio Free Europe station, voice of the com­
mittee for the aid of overruled minorities. . . . They prac­
tice anti-colonialism, as did the French colonels in
Algeria when they carried on subversive warfare with the
 SAS * or the psychological services. They "use the people

  * Section Administrative Speciale: An officers' corps whose task
was to strengthen contact with the Algerians in non-military matters.


against the people." W e have seen with what results.
   This atmosphere of violence and menaces, these rockets
brandished by both sides, do not frighten nor deflect the
colonized peoples. W e have seen that all their recent his­
tory has prepared them to understand and grasp the situa­
tion. Between the violence of the colonies and that peace­
ful violence that the world is steeped in, there is a kind of
complicit agreement, a sort of homogeneity. The colonized
peoples are well adapted to this atmosphere; for once, they
are up to date. Sometimes people wonder that the native,
rather than give his wife a dress, buys instead a transistor
radio. There is no reason to be astonished. The natives are
convinced that their fate is in the balance, here and now.
They live in the atmosphere of doomsday, and they con­
sider that nothing ought to be let pass unnoticed. That is
why they understand very well Phouma and Phoumi, Lu­
mumba and Tshombe, Ahidjo and Moumie, Kenyatta, and
the men who are pushed forward regularly to replace
him. They understand all these figures very well, for they
can unmask the forces working behind them. The native
and the underdeveloped man are today political animals
 in the most universal sense of the word.
   It is true to say that independence has brought moral
compensation to colonized peoples, and has established
their dignity. But they have not yet had time to elaborate
a society, or to build up and affirm values. The warming,
light-giving center where man and citizen develop and
enrich their experience in wider and still wider fields does
not yet exist. Set in a kind of irresolution, such men per­
suade themselves fairly easily that everything is going to
 be decided elsewhere, for everybody, at the same time.
 As for the political leaders, when faced with this situation,
 they first hesitate and then choose neutralism.
    There is plenty to be said on the subject of neutralism.
 Some equate it with a sort of tainted mercantilism which


consists of taking what it can get from both sides. In fact,
neutralism, a state of affairs created by the cold war, if it
allows underdeveloped countries to receive economic help
from both sides, does not allow either party to aid under­
developed areas to fee extent that is necessary. Those
literally astronomical sums of money which are invested in
military research, those engineers who are transformed into
technicians of nuclear war, could in the space of fifteen
years raise the standard of living of underdeveloped coun­
tries by 60 per cent. So we see that the true interests of
underdeveloped countries do not lie in the protraction nor
in the accentuation of this cold war. But it so happens
that no one asks their advice. Therefore, when they can,
they cut loose from it. But can they really remain outside
it? At this very moment, France is trying out her atomic
bombs in Africa. Apart from the passing of motions, the
holding of meetings and the shattering of diplomatic rela­
tions, we cannot say feat the peoples of Africa have had
much influence, in this particular sector, on France's
attitude.
   Neutralism produces in the citizen of the Third World
a state of mind which is expressed in everyday life by a
fearlessness and an ancestral pride strangely resembling
defiance. The flagrant refusal to compromise and the tough
will that sets itself against getting tied up are reminiscent
of the behavior of proud, poverty-stricken adolescents,
who are always ready to risk their necks in order to have
the last word. All this leaves Western observers dumb­
founded, for to tell the truth there is a glaring divergence
between what these men claim to be and what they have
behind them. These countries without tramways, without
troops, and without money have no justification for the
bravado that they display in broad daylight. Undoubtedly,
they are impostors. The Third World often gives the im­
pression that it rejoices in sensation and that it must have


its weekly dose of crises. These men at the head of empty
countries, who talk too loud, are most irritating. You'd like
to shut them up. But, on the contrary, they are in great
demand. They are given bouquets; they are invited to din­
ner. In fact, we quarrel over who shall have them. And
this is neutralism. They are 98 per cent illiterate, but they
are the subject of a huge body of literature. They travel a
great deal: the governing classes and students of under­
developed countries are gold mines for airline companies.
African and Asian officials may in the same month follow
a course on socialist planning in Moscow and one on the
advantages of the liberal economy in London or at Colum­
bia University. African trade-union leaders leap ahead at a
great rate in their own field. Hardly have they been ap­
pointed to posts in managerial organizations than they
decide to form themselves into autonomous bodies. They
haven't the requisite fifty years experience of practical
trade-unionism in the framework of an industrial country,
but they already know that non-political trade-unionism
doesn't make sense. They haven't come to grips with the
bourgeois machine, nor developed their consciousness in
the class struggle; but perhaps this isn't necessary. Perhaps.
W e shall see that this will to sum everything up, which
caricatures itself often in facile internationalism, is one of
the most fundamental characteristics of underdeveloped
countries.
   Let us return to considering the single combat between
native and settler. W e have seen that it takes the form of
an armed and open struggle. There is no lack of historical
examples: Indo-China, Indonesia, and of course North
Africa. But what we must not lose sight of is that this
struggle could have broken out anywhere, in Guinea as
well as Somaliland, and moreover today it could break out
in every place where colonialism means to stay on, in
Angola, for example. The existence of an armed struggle


 shows that the people are decided to trust to violent
methods only. He of whom they have never stopped say­
ing that the only language he understands is that of force,
decides to give utterance by force. In fact, as always, the
settler has shown him the way he should take if he is to
become free. The argument the native chooses has been
furnished by the settler, and by an ironic turning of the
tables it is the native who now affirms that the colonialist
understands nothing but force. The colonial regime owes
its legitimacy to force and at no time tries to hide this
aspect of things. Every statue, whether of Faidherbe or of
Lyautey, of Bugeaud or of Sergeant Blandan—all these
conquistadors perched on colonial soil do not cease from
proclaiming one and the same thing: "We are here by
the force of bayonets. . . ."* The sentence is easily com­
pleted. During the phase of insurrection, each settler
reasons on a basis of simple arithmetic. This logic does not
surprise the other settlers, but it is important to point out
that it does not surprise the natives either. To begin with,
the affirmation of the principle "If s them or us" does not
constitute a paradox, since colonialism, as we have seen, is
in fact the organization of a Manichean world, a world
divided up into compartments. And when in laying down
precise methods the settler asks each member of the op­
pressing minority to shoot down 30 or 100 or 200 natives,
he sees that nobody shows any indignation and that the
whole problem is to decide whether it can be done all at
once or by~ stages .t
   This chain of reasoning which presumes very arithmeti-

   * This refers to Mirabeau's famous saying: "I am here by the will
of the People; I shall leave only by the force of bayonets."—Trans.
   f It is evident that this vacuum cleaning destroys the very thing
that they want to preserve. Sartre points this out when he says: "In
short by the very fact of repeating them [concerning racist ideas} it
is revealed that the simultaneous union of all against the natives is


cally the disappearance of the colonized people does not
leave the native overcome with moral indignation. He has
always known that his duel with the settler would take
place in the arena. The native loses no time in lamenta­
tions, and he hardly ever seeks for justice in the colonial
framework. The fact is that if the settler's logic leaves the
native unshaken, it is because the latter has practically
stated the problem of his liberation in identical terms:
" W e must form ourselves into groups of two hundred or
five hundred, and each group must deal with a settler." It
is in this manner of thinking that each of the protagonists
begins the struggle.
   For the native, this violence represents the absolute line
of action. The militant is also a man who works. The
questions that the organization asks the militant bear the
mark of this way of looking at things: "Where have you
worked? With whom? W h a t have you accomplished? "The
group requires that each individual perform an irrevocable
action. In Algeria, for example, where almost all the men
who called on the people to join in the national struggle
were condemned to death or searched for by the French
police, confidence was proportional to the hopelessness of
each case. You could be sure of a new recruit when he
could no longer go back into the colonial system. This
mechanism, it seems, had existed in Kenya among the
Mau-Mau, who required that each member of the group
 should strike a blow at the victim. Each one was thus per­
sonally responsible for the death of that victim. To work
 means to work for the death of the settler. This assumed

unrealizable. Such union only recurs from time to time and more­
over it can only come into being as an active groupment in order to
massacre the natives—an absurd though perpetual temptation to the
settlers, which even if it was feasible would only succeed in abolish­
ing colonization at one blow." {Critique de la Ration Dialectique,
p. 346.)


responsibility for violence allows both strayed and out­
lawed members of the group to come back again and to
find their place once more, to become integrated. Violence
is thus seen as comparable to a royal pardon. The col­
onized man finds his freedom in and through violence.
This rule of conduct enlightens the agent because it in­
dicates to him the means and the end. The poetry of
Cesaire takes on in this precise aspect of violence a
prophetic significance. W e may recall one of the most
decisive pages of his tragedy where the Rebel (indeedl)
explains his conduct:

                   THE REBEL (harshly):
 My name—an offense; my Christian name—humiliation;
my status—a rebel; my age—the stone age.
                        THE MOTHER:
  My race—the human race. My religion—brotherhood.
                         THE REBEL:
   My race: that of the fallen. My religion . . . but it's not
you that will show it to me with your disarmament. . . .
   'tis I myself, with my rebellion and my poor fists clenched
and my woolly head. . . .
    (Very calm): I remember one November day; it was hardly
six months ago. . . . The master came into the cabin in a
cloud of smoke like an April moon. He was flexing his short
muscular arms—he was a very good master—and he was rub­
bing his little dimpled face with his fat fingers. His blue eyes
were smiling and he couldn't get the honeyed words out of
his mouth quick enough. "T'~e kid will be a decent fellow,"
he said looking at me, and he said other pleasant things too,
the master—that you had to start very early, that twenty
years was not too much to make a good Christian and a good
slave, a steady, devoted boy. a good commander's chaining
captain, sharp-eved and st"on"-armed. And all t^at man saw
of mv son's cradle was that it was the cradle of a chaingang
captain.


  W e crept in knife in hand . . .
                             THE MOTHER:
  Alas, you'll die for it.
                             THE REBEL:
   Killed. . . . I killed him with my own hands. . . .
   Yes, 'twas a fruitful death, a copious death. . . .
   It was night. W e crept among the sugar canes.
   The knives sang to the stars, but we did not heed the stars.
   The sugar canes scaned our faces with streams of green
blades.
                             THE MOTHER:
  And I had dreamed of a son to close his mother's eyes.
                             THE REBEL:
  But I chose to open my son's eyes upon another sun.
                             THE MOTHER:
  O my son, son of evil and unlucky death—
                             THE REBEL:
  Mother of living and splendid death,
                             THE MOTHER:
  Because he has hated too much,
                             THE REBEL:
  Because he has too much loved.
                             THE MOTHER:
  Spare me, I am choking in your bonds. I bleed from your
wounds.
                             THE REBEL:
   And the world does not spare me. . . . There is not any­
where in the world a poor creature who's been lynched or tor­
tured in whom I am not murdered and humiliated . . .
                             THE MOTHER:
  God of Heaven, deliver him!
                              THE REBEL:
  My heart, thou wilt not deliver me from all that I remem­
ber . . .
  It was an evening in November . . .


   And suddenly shouts lit up the silence;
   We had attacked, we the slaves; we, the dung underfoot,
we the animals with patient hooves,
   We were running like madmen; shots rang out . . . We
were striking. Blood and sweat cooled and refreshed us. We
were striking where the shouts came from, and the shouts
became more strident and a great clamor rose from the east:
it was the outhouses burning and theflamesflickered sweetly
on our cheeks.
   Then was the assault made on the master's house.
   They were firing from the windows.
   We broke in the doors.
   The master's room was wide open. The master's room was
brilliantly lighted, and the master was there, very calm . . .
and our people stopped dead . . . it was the master . . . I
went in. "It's you," he said, very calm.
   It was I, even I, and I told him so, the good slave, the
faithful slave, the slave of slaves, and suddenly his eyes were
like two cockroaches, frightened in the rainy season . . . I
struck, and the blood spurted; that is the only baptism that I
remember today.*

   It is understandable that in this atmosphere, 3aily life
becomes quite simply impossible. You can no longer be a
fellah, a pimp, or an alcoholic as before. The violence of
the colonial regime and the counter-violence of the native
balance each other and respond to each other in an ex­
traordinary reciprocal homogeneity. This reign of violence
will be the more terrible in proportion to the size of the
implantation from the mother country. The development
of violence among the colonized people will be propor­
tionate to the violence exercised by the threatened colonial
regime. In the first phase of this insurrectional period, the
home governments are the slaves of the settlers, and these
settlers seek to intimidate the natives and their home gov-
   * Aim6 C6saire, Les Armes Miraculeuses (Et les chiens se ttd-
saient), pp. 133—37.


ernments at one and the same time. They use the same
methods against both of them. The assassination of the
Mayor of Evian, in its method and motivation, is identi­
fiable with the assassination of Ali Boumendjel. For the
settlers, the alternative is not between MgSrie algerienne
and Alge'rie frangaise but between an independent Algeria
and a colonial Algeria, and anything else is mere talk or
attempts at treason. The settler's logic is implacable and
one is only staggered by the counter-logic visible in the
behavior of the native insofar as one has not clearly under­
stood beforehand the mechanisms of the settler's ideas.
From the moment that the native has chosen the methods
of counter-violence, police reprisals automatically call
forth reprisals on the side of the nationalists. However,
the results are not equivalent, for machine-gunning from
airplanes and bombardments from the fleet go far beyond
in horror and magnitude any answer the natives can make.
This recurring terror de-mystifies once and for all the
most estranged members of the colonized race. They find
out on the spot that all the piles of speeches on the equality
of human beings do not hide the commonplace fact
that the seven Frenchmen killed or wounded at the Col
de Sakamody kindles the indignation of all civilized con­
sciences, whereas the sack of the douars* of Guergour and
of the dechras of Djerah and the massacre of whole popu­
lations—which had merely called forth the Sakamody
ambush as a reprisal—all this is of not the slightest im­
portance. Terror, counter-terror, violence, counter-violence:
that is what observers bitterly record when they describe
the circle of hate, which is so tenacious and so evident in
Algeria.
  In all armed struggles, there exists what we might call
the point of no return. Almost always it is marked off by

   Temporary village for the use of shepherds.—Trans.
 90 / The Wretched          of the Earth

a huge and all-inclusive repression which engulfs all sectors
of the colonized people. This point was reached in Algeria
in 1955 with the 12,000 victims of Phillippeville, and in
1956 with Lacoste's instituting of urban and rural mili-
tias.t

   t We must go back to this period in order to judge the importance
of this decision on the part of the French government in Algeria.
Thus we may read in "Resistance Algenenne," No. 4, dated 28th
March 1957, the following:
   "In reply to the wish expressed by the General Assembly of the
United Nations, the French Government has now decided to create
urban militias in Algeria. 'Enough blood has been spilled' was what
the United Nations said; Lacoste replies 'Let us form militias.'
'Cease fire,' advised UNO; Lacoste vociferates, 'We must arm the
civilians.' Whereas the two parties face-to-face with each other were
on the recommendation of the United Nations invited to contact
each other with a view to coming to an agreement and finding a
peaceful and democratic solution, Lacoste decrees that henceforward
every European will be armed and should open fire on any person
who seems to him suspect. It was then agreed (in the Assembly)
that savage and iniquitous repression verging on genocide ought at
all costs to be opposed by the authorities: but Lacoste replies 'Let
us systematize the repression and organize the Algerian manhunt.'
And, symbolically, he entrusts the military with civil powers, and
gives military powers to civilians. The ring is closed. In the middle,
the Algerian, disarmed, famished, tracked down, jostled, struck,
lynched, will soon be slaughtered as a suspect. Today, in Algeria,
there is not a single Frenchman who is not authorized and even in­
vited to use his weapons. There is not a single Frenchman, in Al­
geria, one month after the appeal for calm made by UNO, who is
not permitted, and obliged to search out, investigate and pursue
suspects.
   "One month after the vote on the final motion of the General As­
sembly of the United Nations, there is not one European in Algeria
who is not party to the most frightful work of extermination of
modem times. A democratic solution? Right, Lacoste concedes; let's
begin by exterminating the Algerians, and to do that, let's arm the
civilians and give them carte blanche. The Paris press, on the whole,
has welcomed the creation of these armed groups with reserve. Fas­
cist militias, they've been called. Yes; but on the individual level, on
the plane of human rights, what is fascism if not colonialism when
rooted in a traditionally colonialist country? The opinion has been
advanced that they are systematically legalized and commended; but


  does not the body of Algeria bear for the last one hundred and thirty
  years wounds which gape still wider, more numerous and more deep-
  seated than ever? 'Take care,' advises Monsieur Kenne-Vignes, mem­
  ber of parliament for the MRP, 'do we not by the creation of these
  militias risk seeing the gap widen between the two communities in
  Algeria?' Yes; but is not colonial status simply the organized reduc­
  tion to slavery of a whole people? The Algerian revolution is pre­
 cisely the affirmed contestation of that slavery and that abyss. The
 Algerian revolution speaks to the occupying nation and says: 'Take
 your fangs out of the bleeding flesh of Algeria! Let the people of
 Algeria speak!'
     "The creation of militias, they say, will lighten the tasks of the
 Army. It will free certain units whose mission will be to protect the
 Moroccan and Tunisian borders. In Algeria, the Army is six hundred
 thousand strong. Almost all the Navy and the Air Force are based
 there. There is an enormous, speedy police force with a horribly good
 record since it has absorbed the ex-torturers from Morocco and
 Tunisia. The territorial units are one hundred thousand strong. The
 task of the Army, all the same, must be lightened. So let us create
 urban militias. The fact remains that the hysterical and criminal
 frenzy of Lacoste imposes them even on clearsighted French people.
 The truth is that the creation of militias carries its contradiction
 even in its justification. The task of the French Army is neverending.
 Consequently, when it is given as an objective the gagging of the
 Algerian people, the door is closed on the future forever. Above all,
 it is forbidden to analyze, to understand, or to measure the depth
 and the density of the Algerian revolution: departmental leaders,
 housing-estate leaders, street leaders, house leaders, leaders who con­
 trol each landing . . . Today, to the surface checker-board is added
 an underground network.
     "In 48 hours two thousand volunteers were enrolled. The Euro­
peans of Algeria responded immediately to Lacoste's call to kill.
 From now on, each European must check up on all surviving Alge­
 rians in his sector; and in addition he will be responsible for informa­
 tion, for a 'quick response' to acts of terrorism, for the detection of
suspects, for the liquidation of runaways and for the reinforcement
of police services. Certainly, the tasks of the Army must be light­
ened. Today, to the surface mopping-up is added a deeper harrow­
ing. Today, to the killing which is all in the day's work is added
planified murder. 'Stop the bloodshed,' was the advice given by
UNO. "The best way of doing this,' replied Lacoste, 'is to make
sure there remains no blood to shed.' The Algerian people, after
having been delivered up to Massu's hordes, is put under the pro­
tection of the urban militias. By his decision to create these militias,
Lacoste shows quite plainly that he will brook no interference with


   Then it became clear to everybody, including even the
settlers, that "things couldn't go on as before." Yet the
colonized people do not chalk up the reckoning. They
record the huge gaps made in their ranks as a sort of
necessary evil. Since they have decided to reply by vio­
lence, they therefore are ready to take all its consequences.
They only insist in return that no reckoning should be
kept, either, for the others. To the saying "All natives are
the same" the colonized person replies, "All settlers are the
same."*
   When the native is tortured, when his wife is killed or
raped, he complains to no one. The oppressor's govern­
ment can set up commissions of inquiry and of informa­
tion daily if it wants to; in the eyes of the native, these
commissions do not exist. The fact is that soon we shall
have had seven years of crimes in Algeria and there has
not yet been a single Frenchman indicted before a French
court of justice for the murder of an Algerian. In Indo-

HIS war. It is a proof that there are no limits once the rot has set
in. True, he is at the moment a prisoner of the situation; but what
a consolation to drag everyone down in one's fall!
   "After each of these decisions, the Algerian people tense their mus­
cles still more and fight still harder. After each of these organized,
deliberately sought after assassinations, the Algerian people builds up
its awareness of self, and consolidates its resistance. Yes; the tasks
of the French Army are infinite: for oh, how infinite is the unity of
the people of Algerial"
   * This is why there are no prisoners when the fighting first starts.
It is only through educating the local leaders politically that those
at the head of the movement can make the masses accept 1) that
people coming from the mother country do not always act of their
own free will and are sometimes even disgusted by the war; 2) that
it is of immediate advantage to the movement that its supporters
should show by their actions that they respect certain international
conventions; 3) that an army which takes prisoners is an army, and
ceases to be considered as a group of wayside bandits; 4) that what­
ever the circumstances, the possession of prisoners constitutes a
means of exerting pressure which must not be overlooked in order
to protect our men who are in enemy hands.


China, in Madagascar, or in the colonies the native has
always known that he need expect nothing from the other
side. The settler's work is to make even dreams of liberty
impossible for the native. The native's work is to imagine
all possible methods for destroying the settler. On the
logical plane, the Manicheism of the settler produces a
Manicheism of the native. To the theory of the "absolute
evil of the native" the theory of the "absolute evil of the
settler" replies.
   The appearance of the settler has meant in the terms of
syncretism the death of the aboriginal society, cultural
lethargy, and the petrification of individuals. For the na­
tive, life can only spring up again out of the rotting corpse
of the settler. This then is the correspondence, term by
term, between the two trains of reasoning.
   But it so happens that for the colonized people this
violence, because it constitutes their only work, invests
their characters with positive and creative qualities. The
practice of violence binds them together as a whole, since
each individual forms a violent link in the great chain, a
part of the great organism of violence which has surged
upward in reaction to the settler's violence in the begin­
ning. The groups recognize each other and the future
nation is already indivisible. The armed struggle mobilizes
the people; that is to say, it throws them in one way and in
one direction.
   The mobilization of the masses, when it arises out of the
war of liberation, introduces into each man's consciousness
the ideas of a common cause, of a national destiny, and of
a collective history. In the same way the second phase, that
of the building-up of the nation, is helped on by the
existence of this cement which has been mixed with blood
and anger. Thus we come to a fuller appreciation of the
originality of the words used in these underdeveloped
countries. During the colonial period the people are called


upon to fight against oppression; after national liberation,
they are called upon to fight against poverty, illiteracy, and
underdevelopment. The struggle, they say, goes on. The
people realize that life is an unending contest.
   W e have said that the native's violence unifies the peo­
ple. By its very structure, colonialism is separatist and
regionalist. Colonialism does not simply state the existence
of tribes; it also reinforces it and separates them. The
colonial system encourages chieftaincies and keeps alive
the old Marabout confraternities. Violence is in action all-
inclusive and national. It follows that it is closely involved
in the liquidation of regionalism and of tribalism. Thus
the national parties show no pity at all toward the caids
and the customary chiefs. Their destruction is the pre­
liminary to the unification of the people.
   At the level of individuals, violence is a cleansing force.
It frees the native from his inferiority complex and from
his despair and inaction; it makes him fearless and restores
his self-respect. Even if the armed struggle has been
symbolic and the nation is demobilized through a rapid
movement of decolonization, the people have the time
to see that the liberation has been the business of each
and all and that the leader has no special merit. From
thence comes that type of aggressive reticence with regard
to the machinery of protocol which young governments
quickly show. W h e n the people have taken violent part
in the national liberation they will allow no one to set
themselves up as "liberators." They show themselves to
be jealous of the results of their action and take good care
not to place their future, their destiny, or the fate of their
country in the hands of a living god. Yesterday they were
completely irresponsible; today they mean to understand
everything and make all decisions. Illuminated by violence,
the consciousness of the people rebels against any pacifi­
cation. From now on the demagogues, the opportunists,


and the magicians have a difficult task. The action which
has thrown them into a hand-to-hand struggle confers
upon the masses a voracious taste for the concrete. The
attempt at mystification becomes, in the long run, practi­
cally impossible.

        VIOLENCE IN THE INTERNATIONAL CONTEXT

    We have pointed out many times in the preceding
pages that in underdeveloped regions the political leader
is forever calling on his people to fight: to fight against
colonialism, to fight against poverty and underdevelop-
ment, and to fight against sterile traditions. The vocabu­
lary which he uses in his appeals is that of a chief of staff:
"mass mobilization"; "agricultural front"; "fight against
illiteracy"; "defeats we have undergone"; "victories won."
The young independent nation evolves during the first
years in an atmosphere of the battlefield, for the political
leader of an underdeveloped country looks fearfully at the
huge distance his country will have to cover. He calls to
the people and says to them: "Let us gird up our loins and
set to work," and the country, possessed by a kind of
creative madness, throws itself into a gigantic and dispro­
portionate effort. The program consists not only of climb­
ing out of the morass but also of catching up with the
other nations using the only means at hand. They reason
that if the European nations have reached that stage of
development, it is on account of their efforts: "Let us
therefore," they seem to say, "prove to ourselves and to
the whole world that we are capable of the same achieve­
ments." This manner of setting out the problem of the
evolution of underdeveloped countries seems to us to be
neither correct nor reasonable.
   The European states achieved national unity at a mo­
ment when the national middle classes had concentrated


 most of the wealth in their hands. Shopkeepers and
 artisans, clerks and bankers monopolized finance, trade,
 and science in the national framework. The middle class
 was the most dynamic and prosperous of all classes. Its
 coming to power enabled it to undertake certain very im­
 portant speculations: industrialization, the development of
 communications, and soon the search for outlets overseas.
    In Europe, apart from certain slight differences (Eng­
land, for example, was some way ahead) the various states
were at a more or less uniform stage economically when
they achieved national unity. There was no nation which
by reason of the character of its development and evolu­
 tion caused affront to the others.
    Today, national independence and the growth of na­
tional feeling in underdeveloped regions take on totally new
aspects. In these regions, with the exception of certain
spectacular advances, the different countries show the
same absence of infrastructure. The mass of the people
struggle against the same poverty, flounder about making
the same gestures and with their shrunken bellies outline
what has been called the geography of hunger. It is an
underdeveloped world, a world inhuman in its poverty; but
also it is a world without doctors, without engineers, and
without administrators. Confronting this world, the Euro­
pean nations sprawl, ostentatiously opulent. This Euro­
pean opulence is literally scandalous, for it has been
founded on slavery, it has been nourished with the blood
of slaves and it comes directly from the soil and from the
subsoil of that underdeveloped world. The well-being and
the progress of Europe have been built up with the sweat
and the dead bodies of Negroes, Arabs, Indians, and the
yellow races. W e have decided not to overlook this any
longer. When a colonialist country, embarrassed by the
claims for independence made by a colony, proclaims to
the nationalist leaders: "If you wish for independence,


take it, and go back to the Middle Ages," the newly inde­
pendent people tend to acquiesce and to accept the chal­
lenge; in fact you may see colonialism withdrawing its
capital and its technicians and setting up around the
young State the apparatus of economic pressure.* The
apotheosis of independence is transformed into the curse
of independence, and the colonial power through its im­
mense resources of coercion condemns the young nation
to regression. In plain words, the colonial power says:
"Since you want independence, take it and starve." The
nationalist leaders have no other choice but to turn to
   * In the present international context, capitalism does not merely
operate an economic blockade against African or Asiatic colonies.
The United States with its anti-Castro operations is opening a new
chapter in the long story of man's toiling advance toward freedom.
Latin America, made up of new independent countries which sit at
the United Nations and raise the wind there, ought to be an object
lesson for Africa. These former colonies since their liberation have
suffered the brazenfaced rule of Western capitalism in terror and
destitution.
   The liberation of Africa and the growth of consciousness among
mankind have made it possible for the Latin American peoples to
break with the old merry-go-round of dictatorships where each suc­
ceeding regime exactly resembled the preceding one. Castro took
over power in Cuba, and gave it to the people. This heresy is felt to
be a national scourge by the Yankees, and the United States now
organizes counterrevolutionary brigades, puts together a provisional
government, bums the sugar-cane crops, and generally has decided
to strangle the Cuban people mercilessly. But this will be difficult.
The people of Cuba will surfer, but they will conquer. The Brazilian
president Janio Quadras has just announced in a declaration of his­
toric importance that his country will defend the Cuban Revolution
by all means. Perhaps even the United States may draw back when
faced with the declared will of the peoples. When that day comes,
we'll hang out the flags, for it will be a decisive moment for the
men and women of the whole world. The almighty dollar, which
when all is said or done is only guaranteed by slaves scattered all
over the globe, in the oil wells of the Middle East, the mines of
Peru or of the Congo, and the United Fruit or Firestone planta­
tions, will then cease to dominate with all its force these slaves
which it has created and who continue, empty-headed and empty-
bellied, to feed it from their substance.


their people and ask from them a gigantic effort. A regime
of austerity is imposed on these starving men; a dispropor­
tionate amount of work is required from their atrophied
muscles. An autarkic regime is set up and each state, with
the miserable resources it has in hand, tries to find an
answer to the nation's great hunger and poverty. We see
the mobilization of a people which toils to exhaustion in
front of a suspicious and bloated Europe.
   Other countries of the Third World refuse to undergo
this ordeal and agree to get over it by accepting the condi­
tions of the former guardian power. These countries use
their strategic position—a position which accords them
privileged treatment in the struggle between the two blocs
—to conclude treaties and give undertakings. The former
dominated country becomes an economically dependent
country. The ex-colonial power, which has kept intact and
sometimes even reinforced its colonialist trade channels,
agrees to provision the budget of the independent nation
by small injections. Thus we see that the accession to in­
dependence of the colonial countries places an important
question before the world, for the national liberation of
colonized countries unveils their true economic state and
makes it seem even more unendurable. The fundamental
duel which seemed to be that between colonialism and
anticolonialism, and indeed between capitalism and social­
ism, is already losing some of its importance. What counts
today, the question which is looming on the horizon, is
the need for a redistribution of wealth. Humanity must
reply to this question, or be shaken to pieces by it.
   It might have been generally thought that the time had
come for the world, and particularly for the Third World,
to choose between the capitalist and socialist systems. The
underdeveloped countries, which have used the fierce com­
petition which exists between the two systems in order
to assure the triumph of their struggle for national libera-


  tion, should however refuse to become a factor in that
 competition. The Third World ought not to be content to
 define itself in the terms of values which have preceded it.
 On the contrary, the underdeveloped countries ought to
 do their utmost to find their own particular values and
 methods and a style which shall be peculiar to them. The
 concrete problem we find ourselves up against is not that
 of a choice, cost what it may, between socialism and
 capitalism as they have been defined by men of other
 continents and of other ages. Of course we know that the
 capitalist regime, in so far as it is a way of life, cannot
 leave us free to perform our work at home, nor our duty in
 the world. Capitalist exploitation and cartels and monopo­
 lies are the enemies of underdeveloped countries. On the
 other hand the choice of a socialist regime, a regime which
is completely orientated toward the people as a whole and
based on the principle that man is the most precious of
 all possessions, will allow us to go forward more quickly
and more harmoniously, and thus make impossible that
caricature of society where all economic and political
power is held in the hands of a few who regard the na­
tion as a whole with scorn and contempt.
    But in order that this regime may work to good effect so
that we can in every instance respect those principles
which were our inspiration, we need something more than
human output. Certain underdeveloped countries expend
a huge amount of energy in this way. Men and women,
young and old undertake enthusiastically what is in fact
forced labor, and proclaim themselves the slaves of the
nation. The gift of oneself, and the contempt for every
preoccupation which is not in the common interest, bring
into being a national morale which comforts the heart of
man, gives him fresh confidence in the destiny of man­
kind and disarms the most reserved observers. But we can­
not believe that such an effort can be kept up at the same
 100 / The Wretched of the Earth

frenzied pace for very long. These young countries have
agreed to take up the challenge after the unconditional
withdrawal of the ex-colonial countries. The country finds
itself in the hands of new managers; but the fact is that
everything needs to be reformed and everything thought
out anew. In reality the colonial system was concerned
with certain forms of wealth and certain resources only—
precisely those which provisioned her own industries. Up
to the present no serious effort had been made to estimate
the riches of the soil or of mineral resources. Thus the
young independent nation sees itself obliged to use the
economic channels created by the colonial regime. It can,
obviously, export to other countries and other currency
areas, but the basis of its exports is not fundamentally
modified. The colonial regime has carved out certain chan­
nels and they must be maintained or catastrophe will
threaten. Perhaps it is necessary to begin everything all
over again: to change the nature of the country's exports,
and not simply their destination, to re-examine the soil and
mineral resources, the rivers, and—why not?—the sun's
productivity. Now, in order to do all this other things are
needed over and above human output—capital of all
kinds, technicians, engineers, skilled mechanics, and so
on. Lefs be frank: we do not believe that the colossal
effort which the underdeveloped peoples are called upon
to make by their leaders will give the desired results. If
conditions of work are not modified, centuries will be
needed to humanize this world which has been forced
down to animal level by imperial powers.*
   The truth is that we ought not to accept these condi-

   * Certain countries which have benefitted by a large European set­
tlement come to independence with houses and wide streets, and
these tend to forget the poverty-stricken, starving hinterland. By the
irony of fate, they give the impression by a kind of complicit silence
that their towns are contemporaneous with independence.
01

tions. We should flatly refuse the situation to which the
Western countries wish to condemn us. Colonialism and
imperialism have not paid their score when they with­
draw their flags and their police forces from our territories.
For centuries the capitalists have behaved in the under­
developed world like nothing more than war criminals.
Deportations, massacres, forced labor, and slavery have
been the main methods used by capitalism to increase its
wealth, its gold or diamond reserves, and to establish its
power. Not long ago Nazism transformed the whole of
Europe into a veritable colony. The governments of the
various Europan nations called for reparations and de­
manded the restitution in kind and money of the wealth
which had been stolen from them: cultural treasures, pic­
tures, sculptures, and stained glass have been given back
to their owners. There was only one slogan in the mouths
of Europeans on the morrow of the 1945 V-day: "Ger­
many must pay." Herr Adenauer, it must be said, at the
opening of the Eichmann trial, and in the name of the
German people, asked once more for forgiveness from the
Jewish people. Herr Adenauer has renewed the promise of
his people to go on paying to the state of Israel the enor­
mous sums which are supposed to be compensation for the
crimes of the Nazis.*

   * It is true that Germany has not paid all her reparations. The
indemnities imposed on the vanquished nation have not been
claimed in full, for the injured nations have included Germany in
their anti-communist system of defense. This same preoccupation is
the permanent motivation of the colonialist countries when they try
to obtain from their former colonies, if not their inclusion in the
Western system, at least military bases and enclaves. On the other
hand they have decided unanimously to forget their demands for the
sake of NATO strategy and to preserve the free world; and we have
seen Germany receiving floods of dollars and machines. A Germany
once more standing on its feet, strong and powerful, was a necessity
for the Western camp. It was in the understood interests of so-called
free Europe to have a prosperous and reconstructed Germany which
 10

   In the same way we may say that the imperialist states
would make a great mistake and commit an unspeakable
injustice if they contented themselves with withdrawing
from our soil the military cohorts, and the administrative
and managerial services whose function it was to discover
the wealth of the country, to extract it and to send it off
to the mother countries. We are not blinded by the moral
reparation of national independence; nor are we fed by it.
The wealth of the imperial countries is our wealth too. On
the universal plane this affirmation, you may be sure,
should on no account be taken to signify that we feel our­
selves affected by the creations of Western arts or tech­
niques. For in a very concrete way Europe has stuffed her­
self inordinately with the gold and raw materials of the
colonial countries: Latin America, China, and Africa.
From all these continents, under whose eyes Europe today
raises up her tower of opulence, there has flowed out for
centuries toward that same Europe diamonds and oil, silk
and cotton, wood and exotic products. Europe is literally
the creation of the Third World. The wealth which
smothers her is that which was stolen from the under­
developed peoples. The ports of Holland, the docks of
Bordeaux and Liverpool were specialized in the Negro
slave trade, and owe their renown to millions of deported
slaves. So when we hear the head of a European state de­
clare with his hand on his heart that he must come to the
aid of the poor underdeveloped peoples, we do not tremble
with gratitude. Quite the contrary, we say to ourselves:
"It's a just reparation which will be paid to us." Nor will

would be capable of serving as a first rampart against the eventual
Red hordes. Germany has made admirable use of the European
crisis. At the same time the United States and other European states
feel a legitimate bitterness when confronted with this Germany, yes­
terday at their feet, which today metes out to them cutthroat com­
petition in the economic field.
03

we acquiesce in the help for underdeveloped countries be­
ing a program of "sisters of charity." This help should be
the ratification of a double realization: the realization by
the colonized peoples that it is their due, and the realiza­
tion by the capitalist powers that in fact they must pay*
For if, through lack of intelligence (we won't speak of lack
of gratitude) the capitalist countries refuse to pay, then
the relentless dialectic of their own system will smother
them. It is a fact that young nations do not attract much
private capital. There are many reasons which explain and
render legitimate this reserve on the part of the monopo­
lies. As soon as the capitalists know—and of course they
are the first to know—that their government is getting
ready to decolonize, they hasten to withdraw all their
capital from the colony in question. The spectacular flight
of capital is one of the most constant phenomena of de­
colonization.
   Private companies, when asked to invest in independent
countries, lay down conditions which are shown in practice
to be inacceptable or unrealizable. Faithful to the prin­
ciple of immediate returns which is theirs as soon as they
go "overseas," the capitalists are very chary concerning
all long-term investments. They are unamenable and often
openly hostile to the prospective programs of planning
laid down by the young teams which form the new govern­
ment. At a pinch they willingly agree to lend money to
   * "To make a radical difference between the building up of social­
ism in Europe and our relations with the Third World (as if our
only relations with it were external ones) is, whether we know it or
not, to set the pace for the distribution of the colonial inheritance
over and above the liberation of the underdeveloped countries. It is
to wish to build up a luxury socialism upon the fruits of imperialist
robbery—as if, inside the gang, the swag is more or less shared out
equally, and even a little of it is given to the poor in the form of
charity, since it's been forgotten that they were the people it was
stolen from." Marcel Peju, "To die for De Gaulle?" Temps Mod-
ernes, No. 175-6, October-November 1960.
 10

the young states, but only on condition that this money
is used to buy manufactured products and machines: in
other words, that it serves to keep the factories in the
mother country going.
   In fact the cautiousness of the Western financial groups
may be explained by their fear of taking any risk. They
also demand political stability and a calm social climate
which are impossible to obtain when account is taken of
the appalling state of the population as a whole im­
mediately after independence. Therefore, vainly looking
for some guarantee which the former colony cannot give,
they insist on garrisons being maintained or the inclusion
of the young state in military or economic pacts. The
private companies put pressure on their own governments
to at least set up military bases in these countries for the
purpose of assuring the protection of their interests. In
the last resort these companies ask their government to
guarantee the investments which they decide to make in
such-and-such an underdeveloped region.
   It happens that few countries fulfill the conditions
demanded by the trusts and monopolies. Thus capital,
failing to find a safe outlet, remains blocked in Europe,
and is frozen. It is all the more frozen because the capital­
ists refuse to invest in their own countries. The returns
in this case are in fact negligible and treasury control is
the despair of even the boldest spirits.
   In the long run the situation is catastrophic. Capital no
longer circulates, or else its circulation is considerably
diminished. In spite of the huge sums swallowed up by
military budgets, international capitalism is in desperate
straits.
   But another danger threatens it as well. Insofar as the
Third World is in fact abandoned and condemned to
regression or at least to stagnation by the selfishness and
05

wickedness of Western nations, the underdeveloped
peoples will decide to continue their evolution inside a
collective autarky. Thus the Western industries will
quickly be deprived of their overseas markets. The ma­
chines will pile up their products in the warehouses and
a merciless struggle will ensue on the European market
between the trusts and the financial groups. The closing
of factories, the paying off of workers and unemployment
will force the European working class to engage in an
open struggle against the capitalist regime. Then the
monopolies will realize that their true interests lie in
giving aid to the underdeveloped countries—unstinted aid
with not too many conditions. So we see that the young
nations of the Third World are wrong in trying to make
up to the capitalist countries. We are strong in our own
right, and in the justice of our point of view. We ought on
the contrary to emphasize and explain to the capitalist
countries that the fundamental problem of our time is
not the struggle between the socialist regime and them.
The Cold War must be ended, for it leads nowhere. The
plans for nuclearizing the world must stop, and large-scale
investments and technical aid must be given to underde­
veloped regions. The fate of the world depends on the
answer that is given to this question.
   Moreover, the capitalist regime must not try to enlist
the aid of the socialist regime over "the fate of Europe"
in face of the starving multitudes of colored peoples. The
exploit of Colonel Gargarm doesn't seem to displease
General de Gaulle, for is it not a triumph which brings
honor to Europe? For some time past the statesmen of
the capitalist countries have adopted an equivocal attitude
toward the Soviet Union. After having united all their
forces to abolish the socialist regime, they now realize
that they'll have to reckon with it. So they look as pleasant
 10

as they can, they make all kinds of advances, and they
remind the Soviet people the whole time that they "be­
long to Europe."
   They will not manage to divide the progressive forces
which mean to lead mankind toward happiness by brand­
ishing the threat of a Third World which is rising like
the tide to swallow up all Europe. The Third World does
not mean to organize a great crusade of hunger against
the whole of Europe. W h a t it expects from those who for
centuries have kept it in slavery is that they will help it
to rehabilitate mankind, and make man victorious every­
where, once and for all. But it is clear that we are not so
naive as to think that this will come about with the co­
operation and the good will of the European govern­
ments. This huge task which consists of reintroducing
mankind into the world, the whole of mankind, will be
carried out with the indispensable help, of the European
peoples, who themselves must realize that in the past
they have often joined the ranks of our common masters
where colonial questions were concerned. To achieve this,
the European peoples must first decide to wake up and
shake themselves, use their brains, and stop playing the
stupid game of the Sleeping Beauty.
               SPONTANEITY:
      ITS STRENGTH AND WEAKNESS


This consideration of violence has led us to take account
 of the frequent existence of a time lag, or a difference of
rhythm, between the leaders of a nationalist party and the
mass of the people. In every political or trade-union organ­
ization there is a traditional gap between the rank-and-
file, who demand the total and immediate bettering of
their lot, and the leaders, who, since they are aware of the
difficulties which may be made by the employers, seek to
limit and restrain the workers' demands. This is why you
often are aware of a dogged discontentment among the
rank-and-file as regards their leaders. After a day spent in
demonstrating for their demands, the leaders celebrate the
victory, whereas the rank-and-file have a strong suspicion
that they have been cheated. It is through a multiplicity
of demonstrations in support of their claims and through
an increase in trade-union demands that the rank-and-file
achieve their political education. A politically informed
trade-union member is a man who knows that a local con­
flict is not a decisive settlement between himself and the
employers. The native intellectuals, who have studied in
their respective "mother countries" the working of political
parties, carefully organize similar institutions in order to

                             107
 10

mobilize the masses and bring pressure to bear on the
colonial administration. The birth of nationalist parties
in the colonized countries is contemporary with the forma­
tion of an intellectual elite engaged in trade. The elite will
attach a fundamental importance to organization, so much
so that the fetish of organization will often take preced­
ence over a reasoned study of colonial society. The notion
of the party is a notion imported from the mother coun­
try. This instrument of modern political warfare is thrown
down just as it is, without the slightest modification, upon
real life with all its infinite variations and lack of balance,
where slavery, serfdom, barter, a skilled working class, and
high finance exist side by side.
   The weakness of political parties does not only lie in
the mechanical application of an organization which was
created to carry on the struggle of the working class in­
side a highly industrialized, capitalist society. If we limit
ourselves to the type of organization, it is clear that in­
novations and adaptations ought to have been made. The
great mistake, the inherent defect in the majority of poli­
tical parties in underdeveloped regions has been, follow­
ing traditional lines, to approach in the first place those
elements which are the most politically conscious: the
working classes in the towns, the skilled workers, and the
civil servants—that is to say, a tiny portion of the popula­
tion, which hardly represents more than 1 per cent.
   But although this proletariat has read the party pub­
lications and understood its propaganda, it is much less
ready to obey in the event of orders being given which
set in motion the fierce struggle for national liberation.
It cannot be too strongly stressed that in the colonial ter­
ritories the proletariat is the nucleus of the colonized
population which has been most pampered by the colonial
regime. The embryonic proletariat of the towns is in a
comparatively privileged position. In capitalist countries,
09

 the working class has nothing to lose; it is they who in the
long run have everything to gain. In the colonial coun­
 tries the working class has everything to lose; in reality it
 represents that fraction of the colonized nation which is
 necessary and irreplaceable if the colonial machine is to
run smoothly: it includes tram conductors, taxi drivers,
 miners, dockers, interpreters, nurses, and so on. It is these
 elements which constitute the most faithful followers of
 the nationalist parries, and who because of the privileged
 place which they hold in the colonial system constitute
 also the "bourgeois" fraction of the colonized people.
    So we understand that the followers of the nationalist
 political parties are above all town-dwellers—shop stewards,
 industrial workers, intellectuals, and shopkeepers all living
 for the most part in the towns. Their way of thinking is
 already marked in many points by the comparatively well-
 to-do class, distinguished by technical advances, that they
 spring from. Here "modern ideas" reign. It is these classes
 that will struggle against obscurantist traditions, that will
 change old customs, and that will thus enter into open
 conflict with the old granite block upon which the nation
rests.
    The overwhelming majority of nationalist parties show
a deep distrust toward the people of the rural areas. The
fact is that as a body these people appear to them to be
bogged down in fruitless inertia. The members of the
nationalist parties (town workers and intellectuals) pass
the same unfavorable judgment on country districts as the
settlers. But if we try to understand the reasons for this
mistrust on the part of the political parties with regard to
the rural areas, we must remember that colonialism has
often strengthened or established its domination by organ­
izing the petrification of the country districts. Ringed
round by marabouts, witch doctors, and customary chief­
tains, the majority of country-dwellers are still living in
 110 / The Wretched      of the Earth

the feudal manner, and the full power of this medieval
structure of society is maintained by the settlers' military
and administrative officials.
   So now the young nationalist middle class, which is
above all a class interested in trade, is going to compete
with these feudal lords in many and various fields. There
are marabouts and medicine men who bar the way to sick
people who otherwise could consult the doctor, oracles
which pass judgment and thus render lawyers useless,
caids who make use of their political and administrative
powers to set up in trade or to start a transport service,
customary chiefs who oppose, in the name of religion and
tradition, the setting up of businesses and the introduc­
tion of new goods. The rising class of native traders and
wholesalers needs the disappearance of these prohibitions
and barriers in order to develop. The native customers, the
preserve of feudal lords, who now become aware that they
are more or less forbidden to buy the new products, there­
fore become a market to be contended for.
   The feudal leaders form a screen between the young
Westernized nationalists and the bulk of the people. Each
time the elite tries to get through to the country people,
the tribal chieftains, leaders of confraternities, and tradi­
tional authorities intensify their warnings, their threats
and their excommunications. These traditional authori­
ties who have been upheld by the occupying power view
with disfavor the attempts made by the elite to penetrate
the country districts. They know very well that the ideas
which are likely to be introduced by these influences com­
ing from the towns call in question the very nature of
unchanging, everlasting feudalism. Thus their enemy is
not at all the occupying power with which they get along
on the whole very well, but these people with modem
ideas who mean to dislocate the aboriginal society, and
who in doing so will take the bread out of their mouths.
 1 1

   The Westernized elements experience feelings with
 regard to the bulk of the peasantry which are reminiscent
 of those found among the town workers of industrialized
countries. The history of middle-class and working-class
revolutions has shown that the bulk of the peasants often
 constitute a brake on the revolution. Generally in indus­
trialized countries the peasantry as a whole are the least
aware, the worst organized, and at the same time the most
anarchical element. They show a whole range of charac­
teristics—individualism, lack of discipline, liking for
money, and propensities toward waves of uncontrollable
rage and deep discouragement which define a line of
behavior that is objectively reactionary.
   We have seen that the nationalist parties copy their
methods from those of the Western political parties; and
also, for the most part, that they do not direct their prop­
aganda toward the rural masses. In fact if a reasoned
analysis of colonized society had been made, it would have
shown them that the native peasantry lives against a back­
ground of tradition, where the traditional structure of
society has remained intact, whereas in the industrialized
countries it is just this traditional setting which has been
broken up by the progress of industrialization. In the colo­
nies, it is at the very core of the embryonic working class
that you find individualist behavior. The landless peas­
ants, who make up the lurnpenpToletariat, leave the
country districts, where vital statistics are just so many
insoluble problems, rush toward the towns, crowd into
tin-shack settlements, and try to make their way into the
ports and cities founded by colonial domination. The bulk
of the country people for their part continue to live
within a rigid framework, and the extra mouths to feed
have no other alternative than to emigrate toward the
centers of population. The peasant who stays put defends
his traditions stubbornly, and in a colonized society stands


for the disciplined element whose interests lie in maintain­
ing the social structure. It is true that this unchanging
way of life, which hangs on like grim death to rigid social
structures, may occasionally give birth to movements
which are based on religious fanaticism or tribal wars.
But in their spontaneous movements the country people
as a whole remain disciplined and altruistic. The in­
dividual stands aside in favor of the community.
   The country people are suspicious of the townsman.
The latter dresses like a European; he speaks the Eu­
ropean's language, works with him, sometimes even lives
in the same district; so he is considered by the peasants as
a turncoat who has betrayed everything that goes to make
up the national heritage. The townspeople are "traitors
and knaves" who seem to get on well with the occupying
powers, and do their best to get on within the framework
of the colonial system. This is why you often hear the
country people say of town dwellers that they have no
morals. Here, we are not dealing with the old antagonism
between town and country; it is the antagonism which
exists between the native who is excluded from the ad­
vantages of colonialism and his counterpart who manages
to turn colonial exploitation to his account.
   W h a t is more, the colonialists make use of this an­
tagonism in their struggle against the nationalist parties.
They mobilize the people of the mountains and the up-
country dwellers against the townsfolk. They pitch the
hinterland against the seaboard, they rouse up the tribes-
people, and we need not be surprised to see Kalondji
crowned king of Kasai, just as it was not surprising to see,
some years ago, the assembly of the chiefs of Ghana mak­
ing N'kruma dance to their tune.
   The political parties do not manage to organize the
country districts. Instead of using existing structures and
giving them a nationalist or progressive character, they


 mean to try and destroy living tradition in the colonial
 framework. They believe it lies in their power to give the
 initial impulse to the nation, whereas in reality the chains
 forged by the colonial system still weigh it down heavily.
They do not go out to find the mass of the people. They
do not put their theoretical knowledge to the service of
the people; they only try to erect a framework around the
people which follows an a priori schedule. Thus from the
capital city they will "parachute" organizers into the vil­
lages who are either unknown or too young, and who,
armed with instructions from the central authority, mean
to treat the douar or village like a factory cell.
    The traditional chiefs are ignored, sometimes even perse­
cuted. The makers of the future nation's history trample
unconcernedly over small local disputes, that is to say
 the only existing national events, whereas they ought to
make of village history—the history of traditional con­
flicts between clans and tribes—a harmonious whole, at
one with the decisive action to which they call on the
people to contribute. The old men, surrounded by respect
in all traditional societies and usually invested with un­
questionable moral authority, are publicly held up to
ridicule. The occupying power's local authorities do not
fail to use the resentment thus engendered, and keep in
touch with the slightest decisions adopted by this carica­
ture of authority. Police repression, well-informed because
it is based on precise information, strikes. The parachuted
leaders and the consequential members of the new as­
sembly are arrested.
   Such setbacks confirm the "theoretical analysis" of the
nationalist parties. The disastrous experience of trying to
enroll the country people as a whole reinforces their dis­
trust and crystallizes their aggressiveness toward that sec­
tion of the people. Even after the struggle for national
freedom has succeeded, the same mistakes are made and


such mistakes make for the maintenance of decentralizing
and autonomist tendencies. Tribalism in the colonial phase
gives way to regionalism in the national phase, and finds
its expression as far as institutions are concerned in
federalism.
   But it may happen that the country people, in spite of
the slight hold that the nationalist parties have over them,
play a decisive part either in the process of the maturing
of the national consciousness, or through working in with
the action of nationalist parties, or, less frequently, by
substituting themselves purely and simply for the sterility
of these parties. For the propaganda of nationalist parties
always finds an echo in the heart of the peasantry. The
memory of the anti-colonial period is very much alive in
the villages, where women still croon in their children's
ears songs to which the warriors marched when they went
out to fight the conquerers. At twelve or thirteen years of
age the village children know the names of the old men
who were in the last rising, and the dreams they dream in
the douars or in the villages are not those of money or of
getting through their exams like the children of the towns,
but dreams of identification with some rebel or another,
the story of whose heroic death still today moves them to
tears.
   Just when the nationalist parties are trying to organize
the embryonic working class in the towns, we notice
certain seemingly completely inexplicable explosions in
the country districts. Take for example the famous rebel­
lion of 1947 in Madagascar. The colonial authorities were
categorical: it was a peasant rising. In fact we now know
that as usual things were much more complicated than
that. During the Second World War the big colonial com­
panies greatly increased their power and became the pos­
sessors of all the land that up to then was still free. At
the same time there was talk of planting the island even-


 tually with Jewish, Kabylian, and West Indian refugees.
Another rumor was equally rife—that the whites of South
Africa were soon going to invade the island with the col­
lusion of the settlers. Thus, after the war the candidates
on the nationalist list were triumphantly elected. Im­
mediately after, organized repression began of the cells of
 the Mouvement Democratique de la Renovation Mal-
gache (Democratic Movement for Madagascan Restora­
tion). Colonialism, in order to reach its ends, used the
usual traditional methods: frequent arrests, racist prop­
aganda between tribes, and the creation of a party out of
the unorganized elements of the lumpenproletariat. This
party, with the name of the Disinherited Madagascans,
gave the colonial authorities by its distinctly provocative
actions the legal excuse to maintain order. It happened
that this very frequent operation of liquidating a party
which had been set up in advance took on in this context
gigantic proportions. The rural masses, on the defensive
for the last three or four years, suddenly felt themselves
in deadly peril and decided to oppose colonialist forces
savagely. Armed with spears, or more often simply with
sticks and stones, the people flung themselves into the
general revolt for national liberty. W e know the end of
the story.
   Such armed rebellions only represent one of the means
used by the country dwellers to join in the national strug­
gle. Sometimes when the nationalist party in the towns is
tracked down by police repression the peasants carry on
the tradition of urban agitation. News of the repression
comes to the country districts in a grossly exaggerated
form; the tale runs that the leaders are arrested, that ma­
chine-gunning is rife, that the town is running red with
the blood of Negroes, or that the small settlers are bathing
in Arab blood. Thereupon the accumulated, exacerbated
hate explodes. The neighboring police barracks is cap-


tured, the policemen are hacked to pieces, the local school­
master is murdered, the doctor only gets away with his
life because he was not at home, etc. Pacifying forces are
hurried to the spot and the air force bombards it. Then
the banner of revolt is unfurled, the old warriorlike tradi­
tions spring up again, the women cheer, the men organize
and take up positions in the mountains, and guerrila war
begins. The peasantry spontaneously gives concrete form
to the general insecurity; and colonialism takes fright and
either continues the war or negotiates.
   What is the reaction of the nationalist parties to this
eruption of the peasant masses into the national struggle?
We have seen that the majority of nationalist parties have
not written into their propaganda the necessity for armed
intervention. They do not oppose the continuing of the
rebellion, but they content themselves with leaving it to
the spontaneous action of the country people. As a whole
they treat this new element as a sort of manna fallen from
heaven, and pray to goodness that it'll go on falling. They
make the most of the manna, but do not attempt to
organize the rebellion. They don't send leaders into the
countryside to educate the people politically, or to increase
their awareness or put the struggle onto a higher level.
All they do is to hope that, carried onward by its own
momentum, the action of the people will not come to a
standstill. There is no contamination of the rural move­
ment by the urban movement; each develops according to
its own dialectic.
   The nationalist parties do not attempt to give definite
orders to the country people, although the latter are per­
fectly ready to listen to them. They offer them no objec­
tive; they simply hope that this new movement will go on
indefinitely and that the bombardments will not put an
end to it. Thus we see that even when such an occasion
offers, the nationalist parties make no use at all of the


opportunity which is offered to them to integrate the
people of the countryside, to educate them politically,
and to raise the level of their struggle. The old attitude of
mistrust toward the countryside is criminally evident.
   The political leaders go underground in the towns, give
the impression to the colonialists that they have no con­
nection with the rebels, or seek refuge abroad. It very
seldom happens that they join the people in the hills. In
Kenya, for example, during the Mau-Mau rebellion, not
a single well-known nationalist declared his affiliation with
the movement, or even tried to defend the men involved
in it.
   The different strata of the nation never have it out with
each other to any advantage; there is no settling of
accounts between them. Thus, when independence is
achieved, after the repression practiced on the country
people, after the entente between colonialism and the
national parties, it is no wonder that you find this incom­
prehension to an even greater degree. The country dwellers
are slow to take up the structural reforms proposed by
the government; and equally slow in following their social
reforms, even though they may be very progressive if
viewed objectively, precisely because the people now at the
head of affairs did not explain to the people as a whole
during the colonial period what were the aims of the party,
the national trends, or the problems of international
politics.
   The mistrust which country dwellers and those still
living within the feudal system feel toward nationalist
parties during the colonial period is followed by a similarly
strong hostility during the national period. The colonial
secret services which were not disbanded after independ­
ence keep up the discontentment and still manage to make
serious difficulties for the young government;. All in all,
the government is only being made to pay for its laziness


during the period of liberation, and its unfailing mistrust
of the country people. The nation may well have a reason­
able, even progressive, head to it; its body will remain
weak, stubborn and non-cooperative.
   The temptation therefore will be to break up this body
by centralizing the administration and surrounding the
people by a firm administrative framework. This is one
of the reasons why you often hear it said that in under­
developed countries a small dose of dictatorship is needed.
The men at the head of things distrust the people of the
countryside; moreover this distrust takes on serious pro­
portions. This is the case for example of certain govern­
ments which, long after national independence is declared,
continue to consider the interior of the country as a non-
pacified area where the chief of state or his ministers only
go when the national army is carrying out maneuvers
there. For all practical purposes, the interior ranks with
the unknown. Paradoxically, the national government in
its dealings with the country people as a whole is reminis­
cent of certain features of the former colonial power. "We
don't quite know how the mass of these people will react"
is the cry; and the young ruling class does not hesitate to
assert that "they need the thick end of the stick if this
country is to get out of the Middle Ages." But as we have
seen, the offhand way in which the political parties treated
the rural population during the colonial phase could only
prejudice national unity at the very moment when the
young nation needs to get off to a good start.
   Sometimes colonialism attempts to dislocate or create
diversions around the upward thrust of nationalism. In­
stead of organizing the sheiks and the chiefs against the
"revolutionaries" in the towns, native committees organize
the tribes and confraternities into parties. Confronted with
the urban party which was beginning to "embody the
national will" and to constitute a danger for the colonial


 regime, splinter groups are bom, and tendencies and
 parties which have their origin in ethnic or regional differ­
 ences spring up. It is the entire tribe which is turning
 itself into a political party, closely advised by the coloni­
 alists. The conference table can now be pulled out. The
 party which advocates unity will be drowned in the com­
 putations of the various splinter groups, while the tribal
 parties will oppose centralization and unity, and will de­
 nounce the party of unity as a dictatorship.
    Later on, the same tactics will be used by the national
 opposition. The occupying power has made its choice from
 among the two or three nationalist parties which led the
 struggle for liberation. The ways of choosing are well-
 known: when a party has achieved national unanimity
 and has imposed itself on the occupying power as the sole
 spokesman of the nation, the colonial power starts compli­
 cated maneuverings and delays the opening of negotiations
 as much as ever it can. Such a delay will be used to fritter
 away the demands of this party or get its leaders to put
 certain "extremist" elements into the background.
    If on the other hand no party really succeeds in impos­
 ing itself, the occupying power is content to extend
privileges to the party which it considers to be the most
"reasonable." The nationalist parties which have not taken
part in the negotiations engage in denunciations of the
agreement reached between the other party and the occupy­
ing power. The party which takes over the reins from the
colonialists, conscious of the danger with which the
extremely demagogical and confused attitude of the rival
party threatens it, tries to disband its competitor and to
condemn it to illegality. The persecuted party has no
alternative but to seek refuge in the outskirts of the towns
and in the country districts. It tries to rouse the people of
the country against the "traitors of the seaboard and the
corrupt politicians of the capital." Any excuse is good
 120 / The Wretched of the Earth

enough: religious feeling, innovations made by the new
 government which break from tradition, and so on. The
 obscurantist tendencies of the country dwellers are ex­
ploited to the full. The so-called revolutionary doctrine
in fact rests on the retrograde, emotional, and spontaneous
 nature of the country districts. Here and there it is whis­
 pered that the mountain is moving, that the countryside
 is discontented. It's said that in a certain place the police
 have opened fire on the peasantry, that reinforcements
 have been sent out, and that the government is on the
 point of falling. The parties in opposition, since they
 have no clear program, have no other end in view but to
 take the place of the governing party; and with this as
 their goal they place their destiny in the hands of the
 obscure, spontaneous mass of the peasantry.
    Inversely, it sometimes happens that the opposition no
longer relies for support on the country people, but rather
 on the progressive elements found in the trade unions of
the young nation. In this case the government calls upon
 the countryfolk to oppose the demands of the workers,
which they denounce as the maneuvers of anti-tradition­
alist adventurers. The facts we have established regarding
the political parties are once more observed, mutatis
mutandis, on the level of the trade unions. In the begin­
ning the trade-union organizations in colonial territories
are regularly local branches of the trade unions of the
mother country, and their orders are the echo of those
given in the mother country.
    Once the decisive phase of the struggle for liberation
emerges, some native trade unionists will decide upon the
creation of national unions. The old structure, imported
from the mother country, will suffer heavy losses as the
native members desert it. This creating of new unions is
a fresh element of pressure in the hands of the populations


 of the towns upon colonialism. We have seen that the
 working class in the colonies is in an embryonic state
 and represents that fraction of the people which is the
 most favored. The national unions are born out of the
 straggle for independence organized in the towns, and
 their program is above all a political program and a nation­
 alist program. Such a national union which comes into
 being during the decisive phase of the fight for indepen­
 dence is in fact the legal enlistment of conscious, dynamic
nationalist elements.
    The mass of the country dwellers, looked down upon
by the political parties, continue to be kept at a distance.
 Of course there will be an agricultural workers' union there,
but its creation is simply to supply an answer to the
 categorical necessity to "present a united front to colonial­
ism." The trade-union officials who have won their colors
in the field of the union organizations of the mother
country have no idea how to organize the mass of country
people. They have lost all contact with the peasantry and
their primary preoccupation is to enlist dockers, metallur­
gists, and state-employed gas and electricity workers in
their ranks.
    During the colonial phase, the nationalist trade-union
organizations constitute an impressive striking power. In
the towns, the trade unionists can bring to a standstill, or
at any rate slow down at any given moment, the colonialist
economy. Since the European settlement is often confined
to the towns, the psychological effects of demonstrations
on that settlement are considerable: there is no electricity,
no gas, the dust bins are left unemptied, and goods rot
on the quays.
   These little islands of the mother country which the
towns constitute in the colonial structure are deeply con­
scious of trade-union action; the fortress of colonialism


which the capital represents staggers under their blows.
But the "interior"—the mass of country dwellers—knows
nothing of this conflict.
   Thus we see that there is a lack of proportion from the
national point of view between the importance of the
trade unions and the rest of the nation. After independ­
ence, the workers who have joined the unions get the
impression that they are living in a vacuum. The limited
objective that they set themselves turns out to be, at the
very moment that it is attained, extremely precarious,
having regard to the immensity of the task of national
reconstruction. When faced with the national middle class
whose connections with the government are often closely
linked, the trade-union leaders discover that they can no
longer limit themselves to working-class agitation. Isolated
by their very nature from the country people, and inca­
pable of giving directions once outside the suburbs, the
unions become more and more political in their attitude.
In fact, the unions become candidates for governmental
power. They try by every means to corner the middle
classes: they protest against the maintenance of foreign
bases on the national territory, they denounce trade agree­
ments, and they oppose the national government's foreign
policy. The workers, now that they have their "independ­
ence," do not know where to go from there. For the day
after independence is declared the trade unions realize that
if their social demands were to be expressed, they would
scandalize the rest of the nation: for the workers are in
fact the most favored section of the population, and
represent the most comfortably off fraction of the people.
Any movement starting off to fight for the bettering of
living conditions for the dockers and workmen would not
only be very unpopular, but would also run the risk of
provoking the hostility of the disinherited rural popula-


tion. The trade unions, to whom all trade-union activity is
forbidden, merely mark time.
   This unhealthy state of affairs simply shows the objec­
tive necessity of a social program which will appeal to
the nation as a whole. Suddenly the unions discover that
the back-country too ought to be enlightened and organ­
ized. But since at no time have they taken care to establish
working links between themselves and the mass of the
peasants, and since this peasantry precisely constitutes the
only spontaneously revolutionary force of the country, the
trade unions will give proof of their inefficiency and find
out for themselves the anachronistic nature of their pro­
grams.
   The trade-union leaders, steeped in working-class politi­
cal action, automatically go from there to the preparation
of a coup (Ttiat. But here again the back-country is left
out; this is a limited settling of accounts only, between
the national middle class and the union workers. The na­
tional middle class taking up the old traditions of colo­
nialism, makes a show of its military and police forces,
while the unions organize mass meetings and mobilize
tens of thousands of members. The peasants confronted
with this national middle class and these workers, who
after all can eat their fill, look on, shrugging their shoul­
ders; and they shrug their shoulders because they know
very well that both sides look on them as a makeweight.
The unions, the parties, or the government in a kind of
immoral Machiavellian fashion all make use of the peasant
masses as a blind, inert tactical force: brute force, as it
were.
   On the other hand, in certain circumstances the coun­
try people are going to intervene in decisive fashion both
in the struggle for national freedom and in the way that
the future nation marks out for itself. This phenomenon


takes on a fundamental importance for underdeveloped
countries; this is why we propose to study it in detail.
   W e have seen that inside the nationalist parties, the will
to break colonialism is linked with another quite different
will: that of coming to a friendly agreement with it.
Within these parties, the two processes will sometimes
continue side by side. In the first place, when the intel­
lectual elements have carried out a prolonged analysis of
the true nature of colonialism and of the international
situation, they will begin to criticize their party's lack of
ideology and the poverty of its tactics and strategy. They
begin to question their leaders ceaselessly on crucial
points: " W h a t is nationalism? W h a t sense do you give to
this word? W h a t is its meaning? Independence for what?
And in the first place, how do you propose to achieve it?"
They ask these questions, and at the same time, require
that the problems of methodology should be vigorously
tackled. They are ready to suggest that electoral resources
should be supplemented by "all other means." After the
first skirmishes, the official leaders speedily dispose of this
effervescence which they are quick to label as childishness.
But since these demands are not simply effervescence, nor
the sign of immaturity, the revolutionary elements which
subscribe to them will rapidly be isolated. The official
leaders, draped in their years of experience, will pitilessly
disown these "adventurers and anarchists."
   The party machine shows itself opposed to any innova­
tion. The revolutionary minority finds itself alone, con­
fronted with leaders who are terrified and worried by the
idea that they could be swept away by a maelstrom whose
nature, force, or direction they cannot even imagine. The
second process concerns the main leaders, or their seconds
in command, who were marked out for police repression
under the colonialists. It must be emphasized that these


 men have come to the head of the party by their untiring
work, their spirit of sacrifice, and a most exemplary patri­
 otism. Such men, who have worked their way up from the
bottom, are often unskilled workers, seasonal laborers, or
 even sometimes chronically unemployed. For them the
fact of militating in a national party is not simply taking
part in politics; it is choosing the only means whereby
 they can pass from the status of an animal to that of a
human being. Such men, hampered by the excessive legal-
ism of the party, will show within the limits of the activi­
ties for which they are responsible a spirit of initiative,
courage, and a sense of the importance of the struggle
which mark them out almost automatically as targets for
colonialist repression. Arrested, condemned, tortured,
finally amnestied, they use their time in prison to clarify
their ideas and strengthen their determination. Through
hunger strikes and the violent brotherhood of the prisons'
quicklime they live on, hoping for their freedom, looking
on it as an opportunity to start an armed struggle. But at
one and the same time outside the prison walls colonial­
ism, attacked from all sides, is making advances to the
nationalist moderates.
   So we can observe the process whereby the rupture
occurs between the illegal and legal tendencies in the
party. The illegal minority is made to feel that they are
undesirables and are shunned by the people that matter.
The legal members of their party come to their aid with
great precaution, but already there is a rift between the
two tendencies. The illegalists, therefore, will get into
touch with the intellectual elements whose attitude they
were able to understand a few years back; and an under­
ground party, an offshoot of the legal party, will be the
result of this meeting. But the repression of these way­
ward elements intensifies as the legal party draws nearer


to colonialism and attempts to modify it "from the in­
side." The illegal minority thus finds itself in a historical
blind alley.
   Boycotted by the towns, these men first settle in the
outskirts of the suburbs. But the police network traps
them and forces them to leave the towns for good, and
to quit the scenes of political action. They fall back to­
ward the countryside and the mountains, toward the
peasant people. From the beginning, the peasantry closes
in around them, and protects them from being pursued by
the police. The militant nationalist who decides to throw
in his lot with the country people instead of playing at
hide-and-seek with the police in urban centers will lose
nothing. The peasant's cloak will wrap him around with
a gentleness and firmness that he never suspected. These
men, who are in fact exiled to the backwoods, who are
cut off from the urban background against which they had
defined their ideas of the nation and of the political fight,
these men have in fact become "Maquisards." Since they
are obliged to move about the whole time in order to
escape from the police, often at night so as not to attract
attention, they will have good reason to wander through
their country and to get to know i t The cafes are forgot­
ten; so are the arguments about the next elections or the
spitefulness of some policeman or other. Their ears hear
the true voice of the country, and their eyes take in the
great and infinite poverty of their people. They realize the
precious time that has been wasted in useless commen­
taries upon the colonial regime. They finally come to
understand that the changeover will not be a reform, nor
a bettering of things. They come to understand, with a
sort of bewilderment that will from henceforth never quite
leave them, that political action in the towns will always
be powerless to modify or overthrow the colonial regime.
   These men get used to talking to the peasants. They


 discover that the mass of the country people have never
 ceased to think of the problem of their liberation except in
 terms of violence, in terms of taking back the land from
 the foreigners, in terms of national struggle, and of armed
insurrection. It is all very simple. These men discover a
coherent people who go on living, as it were, statically, but
who keep their moral values and their devotion to the na­
tion intact. They discover a people that is generous, ready
to sacrifice themselves completely, an impatient people,
with a stony pride. It is understandable that the meeting
between these militants with the police on their track and
these mettlesome masses of people, who are rebels by
instinct, can produce an explosive mixture of unusual
potentiality. The men coming from the towns learn their
lessons in the hard school of the people; and at the same
time these men open classes for the people in military and
political education. The people furbish up their weap­
ons; but in fact the classes do not last long, for the masses
come to know once again the strength of their own
muscles, and push the leaders on to prompt action. The
armed struggle has begun.
   The rising disconcerts the political parties. Their doc­
trine, in fact, has always affirmed the uselessness of a trial
of force, and their very existence is a constant condem­
nation of all rebellion. Secretly, certain political parties
share the optimism of the settlers, and congratulate them­
selves on being well away from this act of madness which,
it's said, will be put down with bloodshed. But once the
match is lit, the blaze spreads like wildfire through the
whole country. The armored cars and the airplanes do not
win through with unqualified success. Faced with the full
extent of the trouble, colonialism begins to reflect on the
matter. At the very core of the oppressing nation voices
are raised, and listened to, which draw attention to the
gravity of the situation.


   As for the people, they join in the new rhythm of the
nation, in their mud huts and in their dreams. Under their
breath and from their hearts' core they sing endless songs
of praise to the glorious fighters. The tide of rebellion has
already flooded the whole nation. Now it is the parties'
turn to be isolated.
   The leaders of the rising, however, realize that some day
or another the rebellion must come to include the towns.
This awareness is not fortuitous; it is the crowning point
of the dialectic which reigns over the development of an
armed struggle for national liberation. Although the coun­
try districts represent inexhaustible reserves of popular
energy, and groups of armed men ensure that insecurity is
rife there, colonialism does not doubt the strength of its
system. It does not feel that it is endangered fundamen­
tally. The rebel leaders therefore decide to bring the war
into the enemy's camp, that is to say into his grandiose,
peaceful cities.
   The organizing of the rising in the centers of population
sets the leaders some difficult problems. We have seen that
the greater part of the leaders, born or brought up in the
towns, have fled from their normal background because
they were wanted by the colonialist police and were in
general unappreciated by the cautious, reasonable adminis­
trators of the political parties. Their retreat into the coun­
try was both a flight from persecution and a sign of their
distrust for the old political structure. The natural receiv­
ing stations in the towns for these leaders are well-known
nationalists who are in the thick of the political parties.
But we have seen that their recent history was precisely
an offshoot from these timid, nervous officials who spend
their time in ceaseless lamentation over the misdeeds of
colonialism.
   Moreover, the first overtures which the men of the
Maquis make toward their former friends—precisely those


whom they consider to be the most toward the Left—will
confirm their fears and will take away even the wish to
see their old companions again. In fact the rebellion,
which began in the country districts, will filter into the
towns through that fraction of the peasant population
which is blocked on the outer fringe of the urban centers,
that fraction which has not yet succeeded in finding a
bone to gnaw in the colonial system. The men whom the
growing population of the country districts and colonial
expropriation have brought to desert their family holdings
circle tirelessly around the different towns, hoping that one
day or another they will be allowed inside. It is within this
mass of humanity, this people of the shanty towns, at the
 core of the lumpenproletariat, that the rebellion will find
its urban spearhead. For the lumpenproletariat, that horde
of starving men, uprooted from their tribe and from their
clan, constitutes one of the most spontaneous and the
 most radically revolutionary forces of a colonized people.
    In Kenya, in the years preceding the Mau-Mau revolt, it
 was noticeable how the British colonial authorities multi­
 plied intimidatory measures against the lumpenproletariat.
 The police forces and the missionaries coordinated their
 efforts, in the years 1950-51, in order to make a suitable
 response to the enormous influx of young Kenyans coming
 from the country districts and the forests, who when they
 did not manage to find a market for their labor took to
 stealing, debauchery, and alcoholism. Juvenile delinquency
 in the colonized countries is the direct result of the exist­
 ence of a lumpenproletariat. In parallel fashion, in the
 Congo, Draconian measures were taken from 1957 on­
 ward to send back to the countryside the "young hooli­
 gans" who were disturbing the social order. Resettlement
  camps were opened and put under the charge of evangeli­
  cal missions, protected, of course, by the Belgian army.
     The constitution of a lumpenproletariat is a phenome-
 130 / The Wretched       of the Earth

non which obeys its own logic, and neither the brimming
activity of the missionaries nor the decrees of the central
government can check its growth. This lumpenproletariat
is like a horde of rats; you may kick them and throw stones
at them, but despite your efforts they'll go on gnawing at
the roots of the tree.
   The shantytown sanctions the native's biological de­
cision to invade, at whatever cost and if necessary by the
most cryptic methods, the enemy fortress. The lumpenpro-
letariat, once it is constituted, brings all its forces to en­
danger the "security" of the town, and is the sign of the
irrevocable decay, the gangrene ever present at the heart
of colonial domination. So the pimps, the hooligans, the
unemployed, and the petty criminals, urged on from be­
hind, throw themselves into the struggle for liberation like
stout working men. These classless idlers will by militant
and decisive action discover the path that leads to nation­
hood. They won't become reformed characters to please
colonial society, fitting in with the morality of its rulers;
quite on the contrary, they take for granted the impos­
sibility of their entering the city save by hand grenades and
revolvers. These workless less-than-men are rehabilitated in
their own eyes and in the eyes of history. The prostitutes
too, and the maids who are paid two pounds a month, all
the hopeless dregs of humanity, all who turn in circles
between suicide and madness, will recover their balance,
once more go forward, and march proudly in the great
procession of the awakened nation.
  The nationalist parties do not understand this new
phenomenon which precipitates their disintegration. The
outbreak of the rebellion in the towns changes the nature
of the struggle. Whereas before the colonialist troops were
entirely concerned with the country districts, we now
see them falling back in haste on the towns in order to en­
sure the safety of the town population and their property.


The forces of repression spread out; danger is present
everywhere; now it's the very soil of the nation, the whole
of the colony, which goes into a trance. The armed groups
of peasants look on while the mailed fist loses its grip. The
rising in the towns is like an unhoped-for gas balloon.
   The leaders of the rising who see an ardent and enthusi­
astic people striking decisive blows at the colonialist ma­
chine are strengthened in their mistrust of traditional
policy. Every success confirms their hostility toward what
in future they will describe as mouthwash, wordspinning,
blather, and fruitless agitation. They feel a positive hatred
for the "politics" of demagogy, and that is why in the be­
ginning we observe a veritable triumph for the cult of
spontaneity.
    The many peasant risings which have their roots in the
country districts bear witness wherever they occur to the
ubiquitous and usually solidly massed presence of the new
nation. Every native who takes up arms is a part of the
nation which from henceforward will spring to life. Such
peasant revolts endanger the colonial regime; they mo­
bilize its troops, making them spread out, and threaten at
 every turn to crush them. They hold one doctrine only: to
 act in such a way that the nation may exist. There is no
 program; there are no speeches or resolutions, and no poli­
 tical trends. The problem is clear: the foreigners must go;
 so let us form a common front against the oppressor and
 let us strengthen our hands by armed combat.
    So long as the uncertainty of colonialism continues, the
 national cause goes on progressing, and becomes the cause
  of each and all. The plans for liberation are sketched out;
 already they include the whole country. During this period
  spontaneity is king, and initiative is localized. On every
  hill a government in miniature is formed and takes over
  power. Everywhere—in the valleys and in the forests, in
  the jungle and in the villages—we find a national au-


thority. Each man or woman brings the nation to life by
his or her action, and is pledged to ensure its triumph in
their locality. We are dealing with a strategy of immediacy
which is both radical and totalitarian: the aim and the
program of each locally constituted group is local libera­
tion. If the-nation is everywhere, then she is here. One step
further, and only here is she to be found. Tactics are mis­
taken for strategy. The art of politics is simply transformed
into the art of war; the political militant is the rebel. To
fight the war and to take part in politics: the two things
become one and the same.
   This people that has lost its birthright, that is used to
living in the narrow circle of feuds and rivalries, will now
proceed in an atmosphere of solemnity to cleanse and
purify the face of the nation as it appears in the various
localities. In a veritable collective ecstasy, families which
have always been traditional enemies decide to rub out old
scores and to forgive and forget. There are numerous re­
conciliations. Long-buried but unforgettable hatreds are
brought to light once more, so that they may more surely
be rooted out. The taking on of nationhood involves a
growth of awareness. The national unity is first the unity
of a group, the disappearance of old quarrels and the final
liquidation of unspoken grievances. At the same time, for­
giveness and purification include those natives who by
their activities and by their complicity with the occupier
have dishonored their country. On the other hand, traitors
and those who have sold out to the enemy will be judged
and punished. In undertaking this onward march, the
people legislates, finds itself, and wills itself to sovereignty.
In every corner that is thus awakened from colonial slum­
ber, life is lived at an impossibly high temperature. There
is a permanent outpouring in all the villages of spectacular
generosity, of disarming kindness, and willingness, which
cannot ever be doubted, to die for the "cause." All this is


evocative of a confraternity, a church, and a mystical body
of belief at one and the same time. No native can remain
unmoved by this new rhythm which leads the nation on.
Messengers are despatched to neighboring tribes. They
constitute the first system of intercommunication in the
rebellion, and bring movement and cadence to districts
which are still motionless. Even tribes whose stubborn
rivalry is well known now disarm with joyful tears and
pledge help and succour to each other. Marching shoulder
to shoulder in the armed struggle these men join with
those who yesterday were their enemies. The circle
of the nation widens and fresh ambushes to entrap the
enemy hail the entry of new tribes upon the scene. Each
village finds that it is itself both an absolute agent of revo­
lution, and also a link in the chain of action. Solidarity
between tribes and between villages, national solidarity,
is in the first place expressed by the increasing blows struck
at the enemy. Every new group which is formed, each
fresh salvo that bursts out is an indication that each is on
the enemy's track, and that each is prepared to meet him.
    This solidarity will be much more clearly shown during
the second period, which is characterized by the putting
into operation of the enemy offensive. The colonial forces,
once the explosion has taken place, regroup and reor­
 ganize, inaugurating methods of warfare which cor­
respond to the nature of the rising. This offensive will
call in question the ideal, Utopian atmosphere of the first
period. The enemy attacks, and concentrates large forces
 on certain definite points. The local group is quickly over­
 run, all the more so because it tends to seek the forefront
 of the battle. The optimism which reigned in the first
period makes the local group fearless, or rather careless. It
 is persuaded that its own mountain peak is the nation, and
 because of this it refuses to abandon it, or to beat a retreat.
 But the losses are serious, and doubts spring up and begin


to weigh heavily upon the rebels. The group faces a local
attack as if it were a decisive test. It behaves as if the fate
of the whole country was literally at stake, here and now.
   But we should make it quite clear that this spontaneous
impetuosity which is determined to settle the fate of the
colonial system immediately is condemned, in so far as it
is a doctrine of instantaneity, to self-repudiation. For the
most everyday, practical realism takes the place of yester­
day's effusion, and substitutes itself for the illusion of
eternity. The hard lesson of facts, the bodies mown down
by machine guns: these call forth a complete reinterpreta-
tion of events. The simple instinct to survive engenders a
less rigid, more mobile attitude. This modification in
fighting technique characterized the first months of the
war of liberation of the people of Angola. We may re­
member that on March 15, 1961, a group of two or three
thousand Angolan peasants threw themselves against the
Portuguese positions. Men, women, and children, armed
and unarmed, afire with courage and enthusiasm, then
flung themselves in successive waves of compact masses
upon the districts where the settler, the soldier, and the
Portuguese flag held sway. Villages and airports were en­
circled and subjected to frequent attacks, but it must be
added that thousands of Angolans were mown down by
colonialist machine guns. It did not take long for the
leaders of the Angolan rising to realize that they must find
some other methods if they really wanted to free their
country. So during the last few months* the Angolan
leader Holden Roberto has reorganized the National
 Angolan Army, using the experience gained in various
 other wars of liberation, and employing guerilla tech­
 niques.
  The fact is that in guerilla warfare the struggle no longer

  * This was written in 1961.—Trans.


concerns the place where you are, but the place where
you are going. Each fighter carries his warring country
between his bare toes. The national army of liberation is
not an army which engages once and for all with the
enemy; it is rather an army which goes from village to
village, falling back on the forests, and dancing for joy
when in the valley below there comes into view the white
column of dust that the enemy columns kick up. The
tribes go into action, and the various groups move about,
changing their ground. The people of the north move
toward the west; the people of the plains go up into the
mountains. There is absolutely no strategically privileged
position. The enemy thinks he is pursuing us; but we
always manage to harry his rearguard, striking back at him
at the very moment when he thinks he has annihilated us.
From now on, it is we who pursue him; in spite of all his
technical advantages and his superior artillery power the
enemy gives the impression that he is floundering and
getting bogged down. And as for us, we sing, we go on
singing.
   Meantime, however, the leaders of the rising realize that
the various groups must be enlightened; that they must be
educated and indoctrinated, and that an army and a
central authority must be created. The scattering of the
nation, which is the manifestation of a nation in arms,
needs to be corrected and to become a thing of the past.
Those leaders who have fled from the useless political
activity of the towns rediscover politics, no longer as a way
of lulling people to sleep nor as a means of mystification,
but as the only method of intensifying the struggle and of
preparing the people to undertake the governing of their
country clearly and lucidly. The leaders of the rebellion
come to see that even very large-scale peasant risings need
to be controlled and directed into certain channels. These
leaders are led to renounce the movement in so far as it


 can be termed a peasant revolt, and to transform it into a
 revolutionary war. They discover that the success of the
 struggle presupposes clear objectives, a definite meth­
 odology and above all the need for the mass of the people
 to realize that their unorganized efforts can only be a
 temporary dynamic. You can hold out for three days—
 maybe even for three months—on the strength of the ad­
 mixture of sheer resentment contained in the mass of the
 people; but you won't win a national war, you'll never
 overthrow the terrible enemy machine, and you won't
 change human beings if you forget to raise the standard of
 consciousness of the rank-and-file. Neither stubborn cour­
age nor fine slogans are enough.
    Moreover as it develops the war of liberation can be
counted upon to strike a decisive blow at the faith of the
leaders. The enemy, in fact, changes his tactics. At oppor­
tune moments he combines his policy of brutal repression
with spectacular gestures of friendship, maneuvers calcu­
lated to sow division, and "psychological action." Here and
there he tries with success to revive tribal feuds, using
agents provocateurs and practicing what might be called
counter-subversion. Colonialism will use two types of
natives to gain its ends; and the first of these are the tradi­
tional collaborators—chiefs, caids, and witch doctors. The
mass of the peasantry is steeped, as we have seen, in a
changeless, ever-recurring life without incident; and they
continue to revere their religious leaders who are de­
scended from ancient families. The tribe follows, as one
man, the way marked out for it by its traditional chief.
Colonialism secures for itself the services of these con­
fidential agents by pensioning them off at a ransom price.
   Colonialism will also find in the lumpenproletariat a
considerable space for maneuvering. For this reason any
movement for freedom ought to give its fullest attention
to this lumpenproletariat. The peasant masses will always


answer the call to rebellion, but if the rebellion's leaders
think it will be able to develop without taking the masses
into consideration, the lumpenproletariat will throw itself
into the battle and will take part in the conflict—but this
time on the side of the oppressor. And the oppressor, who
never loses a chance of setting the niggers against each
other, will be extremely skillful in using that ignorance and
incomprehension which are the weaknesses of the lumpen-
proletariat. If this available reserve of human effort is not
immediately organized by the forces of rebellion, it will
find itself fighting as hired soldiers side by side with the
colonial troops. In Algeria, it is the lumpenproletariat
which furnished the harkis and the messalists*; in Angola,
it supplied the road openers who nowadays precede the
Portuguese armed columns; in the Congo, we find once
more the lumpenproletariat in regional manifestations in
Kasai and Katanga, while at Leopoldville the Congo's ene­
mies made use of it to organize "spontaneous" mass meet­
ings against Lumumba.
   The enemy is aware of ideological weaknesses, for he
analyzes the forces of rebellion and studies more and more
carefully the aggregate enemy which makes up a colonial
people; he is also aware of the spiritual instability of cer­
tain layers of the population. The enemy discovers the
existence, side by side with the disciplined and well-organ­
ized advance guard of rebellion, of a mass of men whose
participation is constantly at the mercy of their being for
too long accustomed to physiological wretchedness, hu­
miliation, and irresponsibility. The enemy is ready to pay
a high price for the services of this mass. He will create
spontaneity with bayonets and exemplary floggings. Dol­
lars and Belgian francs pour into the Congo, while in
Madagascar levies against Hova increase and in Algeria

   Algerians enlisted in the French army.—Trans.


native recruits, who are in fact hostages, are enlisted in
the French forces. The leaders of the rebellion literally see
the nation capsizing. Whole tribes join up as harkis, and,
using the modern weapons that they have been given, go
on the warpath and invade the territory of the neighboring
tribe, which for this occasion has been labeled as na­
tionalist. That unanimity in battle, so fruitful and gran­
diose in the first days of the rebellion, undergoes a change.
National unity crumbles away; the rising is at a decisive
turning of the way. Now the political education of the
masses is seen to be a historic necessity.
   That spectacular volunteer movement which meant to
lead the colonized people to supreme sovereignty at one
fell swoop, that certainty which you had that all portions
of the nation would be carried along with you at the
same speed and led onward by the same light, that
strength which gave you hope: all now are seen in the
light of experience to be symptoms of a very great weak­
ness. While the native thought that he could pass without
transition from the status of a colonized person to that of
a self-governing citizen of an independent nation, while
he grasped at the mirage of his muscles' own immediacy,
he made no real progress along the road to knowledge. His
consciousness remain rudimentary. W e have seen that the
native enters passionately into the fight, above all if that
fight is an armed one. The peasants threw themselves into
the rebellion with all the more enthusiasm in that they
had never stopped clutching at a way of life which was in
practice anti-colonial. From all eternity, by means of mani­
fold tricks and through a system of checks and balances
reminiscent of a conjurer's most successful sleight-of-hand,
the country people had more or less kept their individu­
ality free from colonial impositions. They even believed
that colonialism was not the victor. The peasant's pride,
his hesitation to go down into the towns and to mingle


with the world that the foreigner had built, his perpetual
shrinking back at the approach of the agents of colonial
administration: all these reactions signified that to the
dual world of the settler he opposed his own duality.
   Racial feeling, as opposed to racial prejudice, and that
determination to fight for one's life which characterizes
the native's reply to oppression are obviously good enough
reasons for joining in the fight. But you do not carry on a
war, nor suffer brutal and widespread repression, nor look
on while all other members of your family are wiped out in
order to make racialism or hatred triumph. Racialism and
hatred and resentment—"a legitimate desire for revenge"—
cannot sustain a war of liberation. Those lightning flashes
of consciousness which fling the body into stormy paths or
which throw it into an almost pathological trance where
the face of the other beckons me on to giddiness, where
my blood calls for the blood of the other, where by sheer
inertia my death calls for the death of the other—that in­
tense emotion of the first few hours fails to pieces if it is
left to feed on its own substance. It is true that the never-
ending exactions of the colonial forces reintroduce emo­
tional elements into the struggle, and give the militant
fresh motives for hating and new reasons to go off hunting
for a settler to shoot. But the leader realizes, day in and day
out, that hatred alone cannot draw up a program. You will
only risk the defeat of your own ends if you depend on the
enemy (who of course will always manage to commit as
many crimes as possible) to widen the gap, and to throw
the whole people on the side of the rebellion. At all events
as we have noticed the enemy tries to win the support of
certain sectors of the population, of certain districts, and
of certain chiefs. As the struggle is carried on, instructions
are issued to the settlers and to the police forces; their be­
havior takes on a different complexion: it becomes more
"human." They even go as far as to call a native "Mister"
 140 / The Wretched      of the Earth

when they have dealings with him. Attentions and acts of
courtesy come to be the rule. The native is in fact made to
feel that things are changing.
   The native, who did not take up arms simply because he
was dying of hunger and because he saw his own social
forms disintegrating before his eyes, but also because the
settler considered him to be an animal, and treated him as
such, reacts very favorably to such measures. Hatred is dis­
armed by these psychological windfalls. Technologists and
sociologists shed their light on colonialist maneuvers, and
studies on the various "complexes" pour forth: the frus­
tration complex, the belligerency complex, and the colo-
nizability complex. The native is promoted; they try to
disarm him with their psychology, and of course they
throw in a few shillings too. And these miserable methods,
this eyewash administered drop by drop, even meet with
some success. The native is so starved for anything, any­
thing at all that will turn him into a human being, any
bone of humanity flung to him, that his hunger is in-
coercible, and these poor scraps of charity may, here and
there, overwhelm him. His consciousness is so precarious
and dim that it is affected by the slightest spark of kindli­
ness. Now it is that the first great undifferentiated thirst
for light is continually threatened by mystification. The
violent, total demands which lit up the sky now become
modest, and withdraw into themselves. The springing wolf
which wanted to devour everything at sight, and the rising
gust of wind which was to have brought about a real rev­
olution run the risk of becoming quite unrecognizable if
the struggle continues: and continue it does. The native
may at any moment let himself be disarmed by some
concession or another,
   The discovery of this instability inherent in the native
is a frightening experience for the leaders of the rebellion.
At first they are completely bewildered; then they are


made to realize by this new drift of things that explanation
is very necessary, and that they must stop the native con­
sciousness from getting bogged down. For the war goes on;
and the enemy organizes, reinforces his position, and
comes to guess the native's strategy. The struggle for na­
tional liberation does not consist in spanning the gap at
one stride; the drama has to be played out in all its diffi­
culty every day, and the sufferings engendered far out-
measure any endured during the colonial period. Down in
the towns the settlers seem to have changed. Our people
are happier; they are respected. Day after day goes by; the
native who is taking part in the struggle and the people
who ought to go on giving him their help must not waver.
They must not imagine that the end is already won. When
 the real objectives of the fight are shown to them, they
 must not think that they are impossible to attain. Once
again, things must be explained to them; the people must
 see where they are going, and how they are to get there.
 The war is not a single battle, but rather a series of local
 engagements; and to tell the truth, none of these are de­
 cisive.
     So we must be sparing of our strength, and not throw
 everything into the scales once and for all. Colonialism has
 greater and wealthier resources than the native. The war
 goes on; the enemy holds his own; the final settling of ac­
  counts will not be today, nor yet tomorrow, for the truth
  is that the settlement was begun on the very first day of
  the war, and it will be ended not because there are no
  more enemies left to kill, but quite simply because the
  enemy, for various reasons, will come to realize that his
  interest lies in ending the struggle and in recognizing the
  sovereignty of the colonized people. The objectives of the
  struggle ought not to be chosen without discrimination,
   as they were in the first days of the struggle. If care is not
   taken, the people may begin to question the prolongation


of the war at any moment that the enemy grants some
 concession. They are so used to the settler's scorn and to
his declared intention to maintain his oppression at what­
 ever cost that the slightest suggestion of any generous
gesture or of any good will is hailed with astonishment and
delight, and the native bursts into a hymn of praise. It
must be clearly explained to the rebel that he must on no
account be blindfolded by the enemy's concessions. These
concessions are no more than sops; they have no bearing
on the essential question; and from the native's point of
view, we may lay down that a concession has nothing to
do with the essentials if it does not affect the real nature
of the colonial regime.
   For, as a matter of fact, the more brutal manifestations
of the presence of the occupying power may perfectly well
disappear. Indeed, such a spectacular disappearance turns
out to be both a saving of expense to the colonial power
and a positive way of preventing its forces being spread out
over a wide area. But such a disappearance will be paid for
at a high price: the price of a much stricter control of the
country's future destiny. Historic examples can be quoted
to help the people to see that the masquerade of giving
concessions, and even the mere acceptance of the principle
of concessions at any price, have been bartered by not a
few countries for a servitude that is less blatant but much
more complete. The people and all their leaders ought to
know that historical law which lays down that certain
concessions are the cloak for a tighter rein. But when
there has been no work of clarification, it is astonishing
with what complacency the leaders of certain political
parties enter into undefined compromises with the former
colonialist. The native must realize that colonialism never
gives anything away for nothing. Whatever the native -may
gain through political or armed struggle is not the result
of the kindliness or good will of the settler; it simply


shows that he cannot put off granting concessions any
longer. Moreover, the native ought to realize that it is not
colonialism that grants such concessions, but he himself
that extorts them. When the British government decides
to bestow a few more seats in the National Assembly of
Kenya upon the African population, it needs plenty of
effrontery or else a complete ignorance of facts to main­
tain that the British government has made a concession.
Is it not obvious that it is the Kenyan people who have
made the concession? The colonized peoples, the peoples
who have been robbed, must lose the habits of mind which
have characterized them up to now. If need be the native
can accept a compromise with colonialism, but never a
surrender of principle.
   All this taking stock of the situation, this enlightening
of consciousness, and this advance in the knowledge of
the history of societies are only possible within the frame­
work of an organization, and inside the structure of a peo­
ple. Such an organization is set afoot by the use of revolu­
tionary elements coming from the towns at the beginning
of the rising, together with those rebels who go down into
the country as the fight goes on. It is this core which con­
stitutes the embryonic political organization of the rebel­
lion. But on the other hand the peasants, who are all the
time adding to their knowledge in the light of experience,
will come to show themselves capable of directing the
people's struggle. Between the nation on a wartime footing
and its leaders there is established a mutual current of
enlightenment and enrichment. Traditional institutions
are reinforced, deepened, and sometimes literally trans­
formed. The tribunals which settle disputes, the djemmas
and the village assemblies turn into revolutional tribunals
and political and military committees. In each fighting
group and in every village hosts of political commissioners
spring up, and the people, who are beginning to splinter


 upon the reefs of misunderstanding, will be shown their
 bearings by these political pilots. Thus the latter will not
 be afraid to tackle problems which if left unclarified would
 contribute to the bewilderment of the people. The rebel
 in arms is in fact vexed to see that many natives go on
 living their lives in the towns as if they were strangers to
 everything taking place in the mountains and as if they
 failed to realize that the essential movement for freedom
 has begun. The towns keep silent, and their continuing
 their daily humdrum life gives the peasant the bitter im­
 pression that a whole sector of the nation is content to
sit on the side line. Such proofs of indifference disgust the
peasants and strengthen their tendency to condemn the
townsfolk as a whole. The political educator ought to lead
them to modify this attitude by getting them to under­
stand that certain fractions of the population have partic­
ular interests and that these do not always coincide with
the national interest. The people will thus come to under­
stand that national independence sheds light upon many
facts which are sometimes divergent and antagonistic.
Such a taking stock of the situation at this precise moment
of the struggle is decisive, for it allows the people to pass
from total, indiscriminating nationalism to social and eco­
nomic awareness. The people who at the beginning of the
struggle had adopted the primitive Manicheism of the
settler—Blacks and Whites, Arabs and Christians—realize
as they go along that it sometimes happens that you get
Blacks who are whiter than the Whites and that the
fact of having a national flag and the hope of an inde­
pendent nation does not always tempt certain strata of
the population to give up their interests or privileges. The
people come to realize that natives like themselves do not
lose sight of the main chance, but quite on the contrary
seem to make use of the war in order to strengthen their
material situation and their growing power. Certain na-


tives continue to profiteer and exploit the war, making
their gains at the expense of the people, who as usual are
prepared to sacrifice everything, and water their native
soil with their blood. The militant who faces the colonial­
ist war machine with the bare minimum of arms realizes
that while he is breaking down colonial oppression he is
building up automatically yet another system of exploita­
tion. This discovery is unpleasant, bitter, and sickening:
and yet everything seemed to be so simple before: the bad
people were on one side, and the good on the other. The
clear, unreal, idyllic light of the beginning is followed by
a semi-darkness that bewilders the senses. The people find
out that the iniquitous fact of exploitation can wear a
black face, or an Arab one; and they raise the cry of
"Treason!" But the cry is mistaken; and the mistake must
be corrected. The treason is not national, it is social. The
people must be taught to cry "Stop thief!" In their weary
road toward rational knowledge the people must also give
up their too-simple conception of their overlords. The
species is breaking up under their very eyes. As they look
around them, they notice that certain settlers do not join
in the general guilty hysteria; there are differences in the
same species. Such men, who before were included without
distinction and indiscriminately in the monolithic mass of
the foreigner's presence, actually go so far as to condemn
the colonial war. The scandal explodes when the proto­
types of this division of the species go over to the enemy,
become Negroes or Arabs, and accept suffering, torture,
and death.
    Such examples disarm the general hatred that the native
feels toward the foreign settlement. The native surrounds
 these few men with warm affection, and tends by a kind
of emotional over-valuation to place absolute confidence in
 them. In the mother country, once looked upon as a blood­
 thirsty and implacable stepmother, many voices are raised,


 some those of prominent citizens, in condemnation of the
policy of war that their government is following, advising
 that the national will of the colonized people should be
 taken into consideration. Certain soldiers desert from the
 colonialist ranks; others explicitly refuse to fight against
 the people's liberty and go to prison for the sake of the
right of that people to independence and self-government.
   The settler is not simply the man who must be killed.
Many members of the mass of colonialists reveal them­
selves to be much, much nearer to the national struggle
than certain sons of the nation. The barriers of blood and
race-prejudice are broken down on both sides. In the same
way, not every Negro or Moslem is issued automatically a
hallmark of genuineness; and the gun or the knife is not
inevitably reached for when a settler makes his appearance.
Consciousness slowly dawns upon truths that are only
partial, limited, and unstable. As we may surmise, all this
is very difficult. The task of bringing the people to ma­
turity will be made easier by the thoroughness of the or­
ganization and by the high intellectual level of its leaders.
The force of intellect increases and becomes more elabo­
rate as the struggle goes on, as the enemy increases his
maneuvers and as victories are gained and defeats suffered.
The leaders show their power and authority by criticizing
mistakes, using every appraisal of past conduct to bring
the lesson home, and thus insure fresh conditions for prog­
ress. Each local ebb of the tide will be used to review the
question from the standpoint of all villages and of all
political networks. The rebellion gives proof of its rational
basis and expresses its maturity each time that it uses a
particular case to advance the people's awareness. In de­
fiance of those inside the movement who tend to think
that shades of meaning constitute dangers and drive
wedges into the solid block of popular opinion, the lead­
ers stand firm upon those principles that have been sifted


out in the national struggle, and in the worldwide struggle
of mankind for his freedom. There exists a brutality of
thought and a mistrust of subtlety which are typical of revo­
lutions; but there also exists another kind of brutality
which is astonishingly like the first and which is typically
anti-revolutionary, hazardous, and anarchist. This unmixed
and total brutality, if not immediately combated, in­
variably leads to the defeat of the movement within a few
weeks.
   The nationalist militant who had fled from the town in
disgust at the demagogic and reformist maneuvers of the
leaders there, disappointed by political life, discovers in
real action a new form of political activity which in no
way resembles the old. These politics are the politics of
leaders and organizers living inside history who take the
lead with their brains and their muscles in the fight for
freedom. These politics are national, revolutionary, and
social and these new facts which the native will now come
to know exist only in action. They are the essence of the
fight which explodes the old colonial truths and reveals
unexpected facets, which brings out new meanings and
pinpoints the contradictions camouflaged by these facts.
The people engaged in the struggle who because of it com­
mand and know these facts, go forward, freed from colo­
nialism and forewarned of all attempts at mystification,
inoculated against all national anthems. Violence alone,
violence committed by the people, violence organized and
educated by its leaders, makes it possible for the masses to
understand social truths and gives the key to them. With­
out that struggle, without that knowledge of the practice
 of action, there's nothing but a fancy-dress parade and
 the blare of the trumpets. There's nothing save a mini­
 mum of readaptation, a few reforms at the top, a flag
waving: and down there at the bottom an undivided mass,
 still living in the middle ages, endlessly marking time.
              THE PITFALLS OF
         NATIONAL CONSCIOUSNESS


History teaches us clearly that the battle against colo­
nialism does not run straight away along the lines of na­
tionalism. For a very long time the native devotes his
energies to ending certain definite abuses: forced labor,
corporal punishment, inequality of salaries, limitation of
political rights, etc. This fight for democracy against the
oppression of mankind will slowly leave the confusion of
neo-liberal universalism to emerge, sometimes laboriously,
as a claim to nationhood. It so happens that the unpre-
paredness of the educated classes, the lack of practical
links between them and the mass of the people, their
laziness, and, let it be said, their cowardice at the decisive
moment of the struggle will give rise to tragic mishaps.
   National consciousness, instead of being the all-embrac­
ing crystallization of the innermost hopes of the whole
people, instead of being the immediate and most obvious
result of the mobilization of the people, will be in any case
only an empty shell, a crude and fragile travesty of what
it might have been. The faults that we find in it are quite
sufficient explanation of the facility with which, when
dealing with young and independent nations, the nation is
passed over for the race, and the tribe is preferred to the
                             148


state. These are the cracks in the edifice which show the
process of retrogression, that is so harmful and prejudicial
to national effort and national unity. W e shall see that
such retrograde steps with all the weaknesses and serious
dangers that they entail are the historical result of the in­
capacity of the national middle class to rationalize popu­
lar action, that is to say their incapacity to see into the
reasons for that action.
   This traditional weakness, which is almost congenital to
the national consciousness of underdeveloped countries, is
not solely the result of the mutilation of the colonized
people by the colonial regime. It is also the result of the
intellectual laziness of the national middle class, of its
spiritual penury, and of the profoundly cosmopolitan mold
that its mind is set in.
   The national middle class which takes over power at the
end of the colonial regime is an underdeveloped middle
class. It has practically no economic power, and in any
case it is in no way commensurate with the bourgeoisie of
the mother country which it hopes to replace. In its narcis­
sism, the national middle class is easily convinced that it
can advantageously replace the middle class of the mother
country. But that same independence which literally drives
it into a corner will give rise within its ranks to cata­
strophic reactions, and will oblige it to send out frenzied
appeals for help to the former mother country. The univer­
sity and merchant classes which make up the most
enlightened section of the new state are in fact character­
ized by the smallness of their number and their being con­
centrated in the capital, and the type of activities in which
 they are engaged: business, agriculture, and the liberal
professions. Neither financiers nor industrial magnates are
 to be found within this national middle class. The na­
 tional bourgeoisie of underdeveloped countries is not en­
 gaged in production, nor in invention, nor building, nor
   150 / The Wretched of the Earth

  labor; it is completely canalized into activities of the in­
  termediary type. Its innermost vocation seems to be to
  keep in the running and to be part of the racket. The
  psychology of the national bourgeoisie is that of the
  businessman, not that of a captain of industry; and it is
  only too true that the greed of the settlers and the system
  of embargoes set up by colonialism have hardly left them
  any other choice.
     Under the colonial system, a middle class which ac­
  cumulates capital is an impossible phenomenon. Now,
  precisely, it would seem that the historical vocation of an
  authentic national middle class in an underdeveloped
  country is to repudiate its own nature in so far it as it is
  bourgeois, that is to say in so far as it is the tool of capital­
  ism, and to make itself the willing slave of that revolution­
  ary capital which is the people.
     In an underdeveloped country an authentic national
  middle class ought to consider as its bounden duty to be­
  tray the calling fate has marked out for it, and to put itself
  to school with the people: in other words to put at the
  people's disposal the intellectual and technical capital that
  it has snatched when going through the colonial universi­
  ties. But unhappily we shall see that very often the na­
  tional middle class does not follow this heroic, positive,
  fruitful, and just path; rather, it disappears with its soul
  set at peace into the shocking ways—shocking because
  anti-national—of a traditional bourgeoisie, of a bourgeoisie
  which is stupidly, contemptibly, cynically bourgeois.
S The objective of nationalist parties as from a certain Y^LH
i given period is, we have seen, strictly national. They
I mobilize the people with slogans of independence, and for
| the rest leave it to future events. When such parties are
, questioned on the economic program of the state that they
j are clamoring for, or on the nature of the regime which
I they propose to install, they are incapable of replying, be-


cause, precisely, they are completely ignorant of the econ­
omy of their own country.
   This economy has always developed outside the limits
of their knowledge. They have nothing more than an ap­
proximate, bookish acquaintance with the actual and po­
tential resources of their country's soil and mineral
deposits; and therefore they can only speak of these
resources on a general and abstract plane. After independ­
ence this underdeveloped middle class, reduced in num­
bers and without capital, which refuses to follow the path
of revolution, will fall into deplorable stagnation. It is
unable to give free rein to its genius, which formerly it was
wont to lament, though rather too glibly, was held in check
by colonial domination. The precariousness of its resources
and the paucity of its managerial class force it back for
years into an artisan economy. From its point of view,
which is inevitably a very limited one, a national economy
is an economy based on what may be called local products.
Long speeches will be made about the artisan class. Since
the middle classes find it impossible to set up factories that
would be more profit-earning both for themselves and for
the country as a whole, they will surround the artisan
class with a chauvinistic tenderness in keeping with the
new awareness of national dignity, and which moreover
will bring them in quite a lot of money. This cult of local
products and this incapability to seek out new systems of
management will be equally manifested by the bogging
down of the national middle class in the methods of agri­
 cultural production which were characteristic of the colo­
 nial period.
  The national economy of the period of independence is
not set on a new footing. It is still concerned with the
groundnut harvest, with the cocoa crop and the olive yield.
In the same way there is no change in the marketing of
basic products, and not a single industry is set up in the


country. We go on sending out raw materials; we go on
being Europe's small farmers, who specialize in unfinished
products.
   Yet the national middle class constantly demands the
nationalization of the economy and of the trading sectors.
This is because, from their point of view, nationalization
does not mean placing the whole economy at the service
of the nation and deciding to satisfy the needs of the na­
tion. For them, nationalization does not mean governing
the state with regard to the new social relations whose
growth it has been decided to encourage. To them, na­
tionalization quite simply means the transfer into native
hands of those unfair advantages which are a legacy of the
colonial period.
   Since the middle class has neither sufficient material nor
intellectual resources (by intellectual resources we mean
engineers and technicians), it limits its claims to the tak­
ing over of business offices and commercial houses for­
merly occupied by the settlers. The national bourgeoisie
steps into the shoes of the former European settlement:
doctors, barristers, traders, commercial travelers, general
agents, and transport agents. It considers that the dignity
of the country and its own welfare require that it should
occupy all these posts. From now on it will insist that all
the big foreign companies should pass through its hands,
whether these companies wish to keep on their connec­
tions with the country, or to open it up. The national
middle class discovers its historic mission: that of inter­
mediary.
   Seen through its eyes, its mission has nothing to do with
transforming the nation; it consists, prosaically, of being
the transmission line between the nation and a capitalism,
rampant though camouflaged, which today puts on the
mask of neo-colonialism. The national bourgeoisie will be
quite content with the role of the Western bourgeoisie's


business agent, and it will play its part without any com­
plexes in a most dignified manner. But this same lucrative
role, this cheap-Jack's function, this meanness of outlook
and this absence of all ambition symbolize the incapability
of the national middle class to fulfill its historic role of
bourgeoisie. Here, the dynamic, pioneer aspect, the char­
acteristics of the inventor and of the discoverer of new
worlds which are found in all national bourgeoisies are
lamentably absent. In the colonial countries, the spirit of
indulgence is dominant at the core of the bourgeoisie; and
this is because the national bourgeoisie identifies itself
with the Western bourgeoisie, from whom it has leamt its
lessons. It follows the Western bourgeoisie along its path
of negation and decadence without ever having emulated
it in its first stages of exploration and invention, stages
which are an acquisition of that Western bourgeoisie
whatever the circumstances. In its beginnings, the national
bourgeoisie of the colonial countries identifies itself with
the decadence of the bourgeoisie of the West. We need
not think that it is jumping ahead; it is in fact beginning
at the end. It is already senile before it has come to know
the petulance, the fearlessness, or the will to succeed of
youth.
    The national bourgeoisie will be greatly helped on its
way toward decadence by the Western bourgeoisies, who
 come to it as tourists avid for the exotic, for big game
 hunting, and for casinos. The national bourgeoisie or­
 ganizes centers of rest and relaxation and pleasure resorts
 to meet the wishes of the Western bourgeoisie. Such ac­
 tivity is given the name of tourism, and for the occasion
 will be built up as a national industry. If proof is needed
 of the eventual transformation of certain elements of the
 ex-native bourgeoisie into the organizers of parties for
 their Western opposite numbers, it is worth while having
 a look at what has happened in Latin America. The casi-


nos of Havana and of Mexico, the beaches of Rio, the
little Brazilian and Mexican girls, the half-breed thirteen-
year-olds, the ports of Acapulco and Copacabana—all
these are the stigma of this depravation of the national
middle class. Because it is bereft of ideas, because it lives
to itself and cuts itself off from the people, undermined
by its hereditary incapacity to think in terms of all the
problems of the nation as seen from the point of view of
the whole of that nation, the national middle class will
have nothing better to do than to take on the role of
manager for Western enterprise, and it will in practice
set up its country as the brothel of Europe.
   Once again we must keep before us the unfortunate ex­
ample of certain Latin American republics. The banking
magnates, the technocrats, and the big businessmen of the
United States have only to step onto a plane and they
are wafted into subtropical climes, there for a space of a
week or ten days to luxuriate in the delicious depravities
which their "reserves" hold for them.
    The behavior of the national landed proprietors is prac­
tically identical with that of the middle classes of the
towns. The big farmers have, as soon as independence is
proclaimed, demanded the nationalization of agricultural
production. Through manifold scheming practices they
manage to make a clean sweep of the farms formerly
owned by settlers, thus reinforcing their hold on the dis­
trict. But they do not try to introduce new agricultural
methods, nor to farm more intensively, nor to integrate
 their farming systems into a genuinely national economy.
    In fact, the landed proprietors will insist that the state
 should give them a hundred times more facilities and
 privileges than were enjoyed by the foreign settlers in
 former times. The exploitation of agricultural workers will
 be intensified and made legitimate. Using two or three
 slogans, these new colonists will demand an enormous


amount of work from the agricultural laborers, in the
name of the national effort of course. There will be no
modernization of agriculture, no planning for develop­
ment, and no initiative; for initiative throws these people
into a panic since it implies a minimum of risk, and com­
pletely upsets the hesitant, prudent, landed bourgeoisie,
which gradually slips more and more into the lines laid
down by colonialism. In the districts where this is the
case, the only efforts made to better things are due to the
government; it orders them, encourages them, and finances
them. The landed bourgeoisie refuses to take the slightest
risk, and remains opposed to any venture and to any
hazard. It has no intention of building upon sand; it de­
mands solid investments and quick returns. The enormous
profits which it pockets, enormous if we take into account
the national revenue, are never reinvested. The money-in-
the-stocking mentality is dominant in the psychology of
these landed proprietors. Sometimes, especially in the years
immediately following independence, the bourgeoisie does
not hesitate to invest in foreign banks the profits that it
makes out of its native soil. On the other hand large
sums are spent on display: on cars, country houses, and
on all those things which have been justly described by
economists as characterizing an underdeveloped bourgeoi­
 sie.
   We have said that the native bourgeoisie which comes
to power uses its class aggressiveness to corner the posi­
tions formerly kept for foreigners. On the morrow of
independence, in fact, it violently attacks colonial per­
sonalities: barristers, traders, landed proprietors, doctors,
and higher civil servants. It will fight to the bitter end
against these people "who insult our dignity as a nation."
It waves aloft the notion of the nationalization and Afri­
canization of the ruling classes. The fact is that such action
will become more and more tinged by racism, until the


bourgeoisie bluntly puts the problem to the government
by saying " W e must have these posts." They will not stop
their snarling until they have taken over everyone.
   The working class of the towns, the masses of unem­
ployed, the small artisans and craftsmen for their part line
up behind this nationalist attitude; but in all justice let
it be said, they only follow in the steps of their bourgeoi­
sie. If the national bourgeoisie goes into competition with
the Europeans, the artisans and craftsmen start a fight
against non-national Africans. In the Ivory Coast, the
anti-Dahoman and anti-Voltaic troubles are in fact racial
riots. The Dahoman and Voltaic peoples, who control the
greater part of the petty trade, are, once independence is
declared, the object of hostile manifestations on the part
of the people of the Ivory Coast. From nationalism we
have passed to ultra-nationalism, to chauvinism, and
finally to racism. These foreigners are called on to leave;
their shops are burned, their street stalls are wrecked, and
in fact the government of the Ivory Coast commands
them to go, thus giving their nationals satisfaction. In
Senegal it is the anti-Soudanese demonstrations which
called forth these words from Mr. Mamadou Dia:

   The truth is that the Senegalese people have only adopted
the Mali mystique through attachment to its leaders. Their
adhesion to the Mali has no other significance than that of
a fresh act of faith in the political policy of the latter. The
Senegalese territory was no less real, in fact it was all the more
so in that the presence of the Soudanese in Dakar was too
obviously manifested for it to be forgotten. It is this fact
which explains that, far from being regretted, the break-up
of the Federation has been greeted with relief by the mass of
the people and nowhere was a hand raised to maintain it.*

  While certain sections of the Senegalese people jump

   * Mamadou Dia, Nations africaines et solidarity mondial, p. 140.


at the chance which is afforded them by their own leaders
to get rid of the Soudanese, who hamper them in com­
mercial matters or in administrative posts, the Congolese,
who stood by hardly daring to believe in the mass exodus
of the Belgians, decide to bring pressure to bear on the
Senegalese who have settled in Leopoldville and Elisabeth-
ville and to get them to leave.
   As we see it, the mechanism is identical in the two sets
of circumstances. If the Europeans get in the way of the
intellectuals and business bourgeoisie of the young nation,
for the mass of the people in the towns competition is
represented principally by Africans of another nation. On
the Ivory Coast these competitors are the Dahomans; in
Ghana they are the Nigerians; in Senegal, they are the
Soudanese.
   When the bourgeoisie's demands for a ruling class made
up exclusively of Negroes or Arabs do not spring from an
authentic movement of nationalization but merely cor­
respond to an anxiety to place in the bourgeoisie's hands
the power held hitherto by the foreigner, the masses on
their level present the same demands, confining however
the notion of Negro or Arab within certain territorial
limits. Between resounding assertions of the unity of the
continent and this behavior of the masses which has its
inspiration in their leaders, many different attitudes may
be traced. W e observe a permanent seesaw between
African unity, which fades quicker and quicker into the
mists of oblivion, and a heartbreaking return to chauvin­
ism in its most bitter and detestable form.
   On the Senegalese side, the leaders who have been the
main theoreticians of African unity, and who several times
over have sacrificed their local political organizations and
their personal positions to this idea, are, though in all good
faith, undeniably responsible. Their mistake—our mistake—
has been, under pretext of fighting "Balkanization," not to


have taken into consideration the pre-colonial fact of terri-
torialism. Our mistake has been not to have paid enough at­
tention in our analyses to this phenomenon, which is the fruit
of colonialism if you like, but also a sociological fact which
no theory of unity, be it ever so laudable or attractive, can
abolish. We have allowed ourselves to be seduced by a mirage:
that of the structure which is the most pleasing to our minds;
and, mistaking our ideal for reality, we have believed it
enough to condemn territorialism, and its natural sequel,
micro-nationalism, for us to get the better of them, and to
assure the success of our chimerical undertaking.*

   From the chauvinism of the Senegalese to the tribalism
of the Yolofs is not a big step. For in fact, everywhere
that the national bourgeoisie has failed to break through
to the people as a whole, to enlighten them, and to con­
sider all problems in the first place with regard to them—a
failure due to the bourgeoisie's attitude of mistrust and to
the haziness of its political tenets—everywhere that na­
tional bourgeoisie has shown itself incapable of extending
its vision of the world sufficiently, we observe a falling
back toward old tribal attitudes, and, furious and sick at
heart, we perceive that race feeling in its most exacerbated
form is triumphing. Since the sole motto of the bourgeoi­
sie is "Replace the foreigner," and because it hastens in
every walk of life to secure justice for itself and to take
over the posts that the foreigner has vacated, the "small
people" of the nation—taxi drivers, cake sellers, and boot­
blacks—will be equally quick to insist that the Dahomans
go home to their own country, or will even go further and
demand that the Foulbis and the Peuhls return to their
jungle or their mountains.
   It is from this viewpoint that we must interpret the
fact that in young, independent countries, here and there
federalism triumphs. W e know that colonial domination
  * Mamadou Dia, op. cit.


has marked certain regions out for privilege. T h e colony's
economy is not integrated into that of the nation as a
whole. It is still organized in order to complete the
economy of the different mother countries. Colonialism
hardly ever exploits the whole of a country. It contents
itself with bringing to light the natural resources, which
it extracts, and exports to meet the needs of the mother
country's industries, thereby allowing certain sectors of
the colony to become relatively rich. But the rest of the
colony follows its path of underdevelopment and poverty,
or at all events sinks into it more deeply.
   Immediately after independence, the nationals who live
in the more prosperous regions realize their good luck,
and show a primary and profound reaction in refusing to
feed the other nationals. The districts which are rich in
groundnuts', in cocoa, and in diamonds come to the fore­
front, and dominate the empty panorama which the rest
of the nation presents. The nationals of these rich regions
look upon the others with hatred, and find in them envy
 and covetousness, and homicidal impulses. Old rivalries
which were there before colonialism, old interracial hatreds
 come to the surface. The Balubas refuse to feed the
 Luluas; Katanga forms itself into a state; and Albert Kal-
 ondji gets himself crowned king of South Kasai.
    African unity, that vague formula, yet one to which
 the men and women of Africa were passionately attached,
 and whose operative value served to bring immense pres­
 sure to bear on colonialism, African unity takes off the
 mask, and crumbles into regionalism inside the hollow
 shell of nationality itself. The national bourgeoisie, since
 it is strung up to defend its immediate interests, and sees
 no further than the end of its nose, reveals itself in­
 capable of simply bringing national unity into being, or
 of building up the nation on a stable and productive
 basis. The national front which has forced colonialism
 160 / The Wretched       of the Earth

to withdraw cracks up, and wastes the victory it has
gained.
   This merciless fight engaged upon by races and tribes,
and this aggressive anxiety to occupy the posts left vacant
by the departure of the foreigner, will equally give rise
to religious rivalries. In the country districts and the bush,
minor confraternities, local religions, and maraboutic cults
will show a new vitality and will once more take up their
round of excommunications. In the big towns, on the level
of the administrative classes, we will observe the coming
to grips of the two great revealed religions, Islam and
Catholicism.
   Colonialism, which had been shaken to its very founda­
tions by the birth of African unity, recovers its balance
and tries now to break that will to unity by using all the
movement's weaknesses. Colonialism will set the African
peoples moving by revealing to them the existence of
"spiritual" rivalries. In Senegal, it is the newspaper New
Africa which week by week distills hatred of Islam and
of the Arabs. The Lebanese, in whose hands is the greater
part of the small trading enterprises on the western sea­
board, are marked out for national obloquy. The mis­
sionaries find it opportune to remind the masses that long
before the advent of European colonialism the great
African empires were disrupted by the Arab invasion.
There is no hesitation in saying that it was the Arab oc­
cupation which paved the way for European colonialism;
Arab imperialism is commonly spoken of, and the cultural
imperialism of Islam is condemned. Moslems are usually
kept out of the more important posts. In other regions the
reverse is the case, and it is the native Christians who are
considered as conscious, objective enemies of national in­
dependence.
   Colonialism pulls every string shamelessly, and is only
too content to set at loggerheads those Africans who only


yesterday were leagued against the settlers. The idea of a
Saint Bartholomew takes shape in certain minds, and the
advocates of colonialism laugh to themselves derisively
when they hear magnificent declarations about African
unity. Inside a single nation, religion splits up the people
into different spiritual communities, all of them kept up
and stiffened by colonialism and its instruments. Totally
unexpected events break out here and there. In regions
where Catholicism or Protestantism predominates, we
see the Moslem minorities flinging themselves with unac­
customed ardor into their devotions. The Islamic feast-
days are revived, and the Moslem religion defends itself
inch by inch against the violent absolutism of the Cath­
olic faith. Ministers of state are heard to say for the
benefit of certain individuals that if they are not content
they have only to go to Cairo. Sometimes American
Protestantism transplants its anti-Catholic prejudices into
African soil, and keeps up tribal rivalries through religion.
    Taking the continent as a whole, this religious tension
may be responsible for the revival of the commonest racial
feeling. Africa is divided into Black and White, and the
names that are substituted—Africa South of the Sahara,
Africa North of the Sahara—do not manage to hide this
latent racism. Here, it is affirmed that White Africa has
a thousand-year-old tradition of culture; that she is Medi­
terranean, that she is a continuation of Europe, and that
she shares in Greco-Latin civilization. Black Africa is
looked on as a region that is inert, brutal, uncivilized, in
a word, savage. There, all day long you may hear un­
pleasant remarks about veiled women, polygamy, and the
supposed disdain the Arabs have for the feminine sex.
All such remarks are reminiscent in their aggressiveness
 of those that are so often heard coming from the settler's
 lips. The national bourgeoisie of each of these two great
 regions, which has totally assimilated colonialist thought


in its most corrupt form, takes over from the Europeans
and establishes in the continent a racial philosophy which
is extremely harmful for the future of Africa. By its lazi­
ness and will to imitation, it promotes the ingrafting and
stiffening of racism which was characteristic of the colonial
era. Thus it is by no means astonishing to hear in a coun­
try that calls itself African remarks which are neither
more nor less than racist, and to observe the existence of
paternalist behavior which gives you the bitter impres­
sion that you are in Paris, Brussels, or London.
    In certain regions of Africa, driveling paternalism with
regard to the blacks and the loathsome idea derived from
Western culture that the black man is impervious to logic
and the sciences reign in all their nakedness. Sometimes
it may be ascertained that the black minorities are
hemmed in by a kind of semi-slavery which renders
legitimate that species of wariness, or in other words mis­
trust, which the countries of Black Africa feel with regard
 to the countries of White Africa. It is all too common
that a citizen of Black Africa hears himself called a
"Negro" by the children when walking in the streets of
 a big town in White Africa, or finds that civil servants
address him in pidgin English.
    Yes, unfortunately it is not unknown that students from
 Black Africa who attend secondary schools north of the
 Sahara hear their schoolfellows asking if in their country
 there are houses, if they know what electricity is, or if
 they practice cannibalism in their families. Yes, un­
 fortunately it is not unknown that in certain regions north
 of the Sahara Africans coming from countries south of
 the Sahara meet nationals who implore them to take them
 "anywhere at all on condition we meet Negroes." In paral­
 lel fashion, in certain young states of Black Africa mem­
 bers of parliament, or even ministers, maintain without a
 trace of humor that the danger is not at all of a reoccupa-


tion of their country by colonialism but of an eventual
invasion by "those vandals of Arabs coming from the
North."
   As we see it, the bankruptcy of the bourgeoisie is not
apparent in the economic field only. They have come to
power in the name of a narrow nationalism and represent­
ing a race; they will prove themselves incapable of
triumphantly putting into practice a program with even
a minimum humanist content, in spite of fine-sounding
declarations which are devoid of meaning since the speak­
ers bandy about in irresponsible fashion phrases that come
straight out of European treatises on morals and political
philosophy. When the bourgeoisie is strong, when it can
arrange everything and everybody to serve its power, it
does not hesitate to affirm positively certain democratic
ideas which claim to be universally applicable. There must
be very exceptional circumstances if such a bourgeoisie,
solidly based economically, is forced into denying its own
humanist ideology. The Western bourgeoisie, though
fundamentally racist, most often manages to mask this
racism by a multiplicity of nuances which allow it to
preserve intact its proclamation of mankind's outstanding
dignity.
   The Western bourgeoisie has prepared enough fences
and railings to have no real fear of the competition of
those whom it exploits and holds in contempt. Western
bourgeois racial prejudice as regards the nigger and the
Arab is a racism of contempt; it is a racism which min­
imizes what it hates. Bourgeois ideology, however, which
is the proclamation of an essential equality between men,
manages to appear logical in its own eyes by inviting the
sub-men to become human, and to take as their proto­
type Western humanity as incarnated in the Western
bourgeoisie.
   The racial prejudice of the young national bourgeoisie


is a racism of defense, based on fear. Essentially it is no
different from vulgar tribalism, or the rivalries between
septs or confraternities. W e may understand why keen­
witted international observers have hardly taken seriously
the great flights of oratory about African unity, for it is true
that there are so many cracks in that unity visible to the
naked eye that it is only reasonable to insist that all these
contradictions ought to be resolved before the day of unity
can come.
   The peoples of Africa have only recently come to know
themselves. They have decided, in the name of the whole
continent, to weigh in strongly against the colonial re­
gime. Now the nationalist bourgeoisies, who in region
after region hasten to make their own fortunes and to set
up a national system of exploitation, do their utmost to
put obstacles in the path of this "Utopia." The national
bourgeoisies, who are quite clear as to what their objec­
tives are, have decided to bar the way to that unity, to
that coordinated effort on the part of two hundred and
fifty million men to triumph over stupidity, hunger, and
inhumanity at one and the same time. This is why we
must understand that African unity can only be achieved
through the upward thrust of the people, and under the
leadership of the people, that is to say, in defiance of the
interests of the bourgeoisie.
   As regards internal affairs and in the sphere of institu­
tions, the national bourgeoisie will give equal proof of
its incapacity. In a certain number of underdeveloped
countries the parliamentary game is faked from the begin­
ning. Powerless economically, unable to bring about the
existence of coherent social relations, and standing on the
principle of its domination as a class, the bourgeoisie
chooses the solution that seems to it the easiest, that of
the single party. It does not yet have the quiet conscience
and the calm that economic power and the control of the
            The Pitfalls of National Consciousness       j 165

state machine alone can give. It does not create a state
that reassures the ordinary citizen, but rather one that
rouses his anxiety.
   The state, which by its strength and discretion ought
to inspire confidence and disarm and lull everybody to
sleep, on the contrary seeks to impose itself in spectacular
fashion. It makes a display, it jostles people and bullies
them, thus intimating to the citizen that he is in continual
danger. The single party is the modern form of the dic­
tatorship of the bourgeoisie, unmasked, unpainted, un­
scrupulous, and cynical.
   It is true that such a dictatorship does not go very far.
It cannot halt the processes of its own contradictions.
Since the bourgeoisie has not the economic means to en­
sure its domination and to throw a few crumbs to the rest
of the country; since, moreover, it is preoccupied with
filling its pockets as rapidly as possible but also as prosaic­
ally as possible, the country sinks all the more deeply into
stagnation. And in order to hide this stagnation and to
mark this regression, to reassure itself and to give itself
something to boast about, the bourgeoisie can find noth­
ing better to do than to erect grandiose buildings in the
capital and to lay out money on what are called prestige
expenses.
   The national bourgeoisie turns its back more and more
on the interior and on the real facts of its undeveloped
country, and tends to look toward the former mother
country and the foreign capitalists who count on its oblig­
ing compliance. As it does not share its profits with the
people, and in no way allows them to enjoy any of the
dues that are paid to it by the big foreign companies, it
will discover the need for a popular leader to whom will
 fall the dual role of stabilizing the regime and of per­
petuating the domination of the bourgeoisie. The bour­
 geois dictatorship of underdeveloped countries draws its


 strength from the existence of a leader. W e know that in
 the well-developed countries the bourgeois dictatorship is
 the result of the economic power of the bourgeoisie. In
 the underdeveloped countries on the contrary the leader
 stands for moral power, in whose shelter the thin and
poverty-stricken bourgeoisie of the young nation decides
to get rich.
    The people who for years on end have seen this leader
and heard him speak, who from a distance in a kind of
dream have followed his contests with the colonial power,
spontaneously put their trust in this patriot. Before in­
dependence, the leader generally embodies the aspirations
of the people for independence, political liberty, and na­
tional dignity. But as soon as independence is declared,
far from embodying in concrete form the needs of the
people in what touches bread, land, and the restoration
of the country to the sacred hands of the people, the
leader will reveal his inner purpose: to become the gen­
eral president of that company of profiteers impatient for
their returns which constitutes the national bourgeoisie.
   In spite of his frequently honest conduct and his sincere
declarations, the leader as seen objectively is the fierce
defender of these interests, today combined, of the na­
tional bourgeoisie and the ex-colonial companies. His
honesty, which is his soul's true bent, crumbles away lit­
tle by little. His contact with the masses is so unreal that
he comes to believe that his autliority is hated and that
the services that he has rendered his country are being
called in question. The leader judges the ingratitude of
the masses harshly, and every day that passes ranges him­
self a little more resolutely on the side of the exploiters.
He therefore knowingly becomes the aider and abettor
of the young bourgeoisie which is plunging into the mire
of corruption and pleasure.
   The economic channels of the young state sink back


inevitably into neo-colonialist lines. The national econ­
omy, formerly protected, is today literally controlled. The
budget is balanced through loans and gifts, while every
three or four months the chief ministers themselves or
else their governmental delegations come to the erstwhile
mother countries or elsewhere, fishing for capital.
   The former colonial power increases its demands, ac­
cumulates concessions and guarantees and takes fewer and
fewer pains to mask the hold it has over the national gov­
ernment. The people stagnate deplorably in unbearable
poverty; slowly they awaken to the unutterable treason of
their leaders. This awakening is all the more acute in that
the bourgeoisie is incapable of learning its lesson. The
distribution of wealth that it effects is not spread out
between a great many sectors; it is not ranged among
different levels, nor does it set up a hierarchy of half­
tones. The new caste is an affront all the more disgusting
in that the immense majority, nine-tenths of the popula­
tion, continue to die of starvation. The scandalous en­
richment, speedy and pitiless, of this caste is accom­
panied by a decisive awakening on the part of the people,
and a growing awareness that promises stormy days to
 come. The bourgeois caste, that section of the nation
which annexes for its own profit all the wealth of the
 country, by a kind of unexpected logic will pass disparag­
 ing judgments upon the other Negroes and the other Arabs
 that more often than not are reminiscent of the racist
 doctrines of the former representatives of the colonial
 power. At one and the same time the poverty of the
 people, the immoderate money-making of the bourgeois
 caste, and its widespread scorn for the rest of the nation
 will harden thought and action.
  But such threats will lead to the reaffirmation of au­
thority and the appearance of dictatorship. The leader, who
has behind him a lifetime of political action and devoted


patriotism, constitutes a screen between the people and the
rapacious bourgeoisie since he stands surety for the ven­
tures of that caste and closes his eyes to their insolence,
their mediocrity, and their fundamental immorality. He
acts as a braking-power on the awakening consciousness
of the people. He comes to the aid of the bourgeois caste
and hides his maneuvers from the people, thus becoming
the most eager worker in the task of mystifying and be­
wildering the masses. Every time he speaks to the people
he calls to mind his often heroic life, the struggles he has
led in the name of the people and the victories that in
their name he has achieved, thereby intimating clearly to
the masses that they ought to go on putting their confi­
dence in him. There are plenty of examples of African
patriots who have introduced into the cautious political
advance of their elders a decisive style characterized by its
nationalist outlook. These men came from the backwoods,
and they proclaimed, to the scandal of the dominating
power and the shame of the nationals of the capital, that
they came from the backwoods and that they spoke in
the name of the Negroes. These men, who have sung the
praises of their race, who have taken upon themselves the
whole burden of the past, complete with cannibalism and
degeneracy, find themselves today, alas, at the head of a
team of administrators which turns its back on the jungle
and which proclaims that the vocation of the people is
to obey, to go on obeying, and to be obedient till the end
of time.
  The leader pacifies the people. For years on end after
independence has been won, we see him, incapable of
urging on the people to a concrete task, unable really to
open the future to them or of flinging them into the path
of national reconstruction, that is to say, of their own
reconstruction; we see him reassessing the history of in­
dependence and recalling the sacred unity of the strug-


gle for liberation. The leader, because he refuses to
break up the national bourgeoisie, asks the people to fall
back into the past and to become drunk on the re­
membrance of the epoch which led up to independence.
The leader, seen objectively, brings the people to a halt
and persists in either expelling them from history or
preventing them from taking root in it. During the strug­
gle for liberation the leader awakened the people and
promised them a forward march, heroic and unmitigated.
Today, he uses every means to put them to sleep, and
three or four times a year asks them to remember the
colonial period and to look back on the long way they have
come since then.
   Now it must be said that the masses show themselves
totally incapable of appreciating the long way they have
come. The peasant who goes on scratching out a living
from the soil, and the unemployed man who never finds
employment do not manage, in spite of public holidays
and flags, new and brightly colored though they may be,
to convince themselves that anything has really changed
in their lives. The bourgeoisie who are in power vainly in­
crease the number of processions; the masses have no
illusions. They are hungry; and the police officers, though
they are now Africans, do not serve to reassure them par­
ticularly. The masses begin to sulk; they turn away from
this nation in which they have been given no place and
begin to lose interest in it.
   From time to time, however, the leader makes an effort;
he speaks on the radio or makes a tour of the country to
pacify the people, to calm them and bemuse them. The
leader is all the more necessary in that there is no party.
During the period of the struggle for independence there
was one right enough, a party led by the present leader.
But since then this party has sadly disintegrated; nothing
is left but the shell of a party, the name, the emblem, and
 170 / The Wretched       of the Earth

the motto. The living party, which ought to make pos­
sible the free exchange of ideas which have been elabo­
rated according to the real needs of the mass of the
people, has been transformed into a trade union of in­
dividual interests. Since the proclamation of independence
the party no longer helps the people to set out its de­
mands, to become more aware of its needs and better able
to establish its power. Today, the party's mission is to
deliver to the people the instructions which issue from
the summit. There no longer exists the fruitful give-and-
take from the bottom to the top and from the top to the
bottom which creates and guarantees democracy in a
party. Quite on the contrary, the party has made itself
into a screen between the masses and the leaders. There
is no longer any party life, for the branches which were
set up during the colonial period are today completely
demobilized.
   The militant champs on his bit. Now it is that the at­
titude taken up by certain militants during the struggle
for liberation is seen to be justified, for the fact is that in
the thick of the fight more than a few militants asked the
leaders to formulate a dogma, to set out their objectives,
and to draw up a program. But under the pretext of safe­
guarding national unity, the leaders categorically refused
to attempt such a task. The only worthwhile dogma, it
was repeatedly stated, is the union of the nation against
colonialism. And on they went, armed with an im­
petuous slogan which stood for principles, while their
only ideological activity took the form of a series of
variants on the theme of the right of peoples to self-
determination, borne on the wind of history which would
inevitably sweep away colonialism. When the militants
asked whether the wind of history couldn't be a little
more clearly analyzed, the leaders gave them instead hope
and trust, the necessity of decolonialization and its in-


evitability, and more to that effect.
    After independence, the party sinks into an extra­
 ordinary lethargy. The militants are only called upon
when so-called popular manifestations are afoot, or inter­
national conferences, or independence celebrations. The
local party leaders are given administrative posts, the party
becomes an administration, and the militants disappear
into the crowd and take the empty title of citizen. Now
that they have fulfilled their historical mission of leading
the bourgeoisie to power, they are firmly invited to retire
so that the bourgeoisie may carry out its mission in peace
and quiet. But we have seen that the national bourgeoisie
of underdeveloped countries is incapable of carrying out
any mission whatever. After a few years, the break-up of
the party becomes obvious, and any observer, even the
most superficial, can notice that the party, today the
skeleton of its former self, only serves to immobilize the
people. The party, which during the battle had drawn to
itself the whole nation, is falling to pieces. The intellec­
tuals who on the eve of independence rallied to the party,
now make it clear by their attitude that they gave their
support with no other end in view than to secure their
slices of the cake of independence. The party is becoming
a means of private advancement.
   There exists inside the new regime, however, an in­
equality in the acquisition of wealth and in monopoliza­
tion. Some have a double source of income and demon­
strate that they are specialized in opportunism. Privileges
multiply and corruption triumphs, while morality declines.
Today the vultures are too numerous and too voracious
in proportion to the lean spoils of the national wealth.
The party, a true instrument of power in the hands of
the bourgeoisie, reinforces the machine, and ensures that
the people are hemmed in and immobilized. The party
helps the government to hold the people down. It be-


comes more and more clearly anti-democratic, an imple­
ment of coercion. The party is objectively, sometimes
subjectively, the accomplice of the merchant bourgeoisie.
In the same way that the national bourgeoisie conjures
away its phase of construction in order to throw itself
into the enjoyment of its wealth, in parallel fashion in
the institutional sphere it jumps the parliamentary phase
and chooses a dictatorship of the national-socialist type.
W e know today that this fascism at high interest which
has triumphed for half a century in Latin America is the
dialectic result of states which were semi-colonial during
the period of independence.
   In these poor, underdeveloped countries, where the rule
is that the greatest wealth is surrounded by the greatest
poverty, the army and the police constitute the pillars of
the regime; an army and a police force (another rule
which must not be forgotten) which are advised by for­
eign experts. The strength of the police force and the
power of the army are proportionate to the stagnation in
which the rest of the nation is sunk. By dint of yearly
loans, concessions are snatched up by foreigners; scandals
are numerous, ministers grow rich, their wives doll them­
selves up, the members of parliament feather their nests
and there is not a soul down to the simple policeman or
the customs officer who does not join in the great proces­
sion of corruption.
   The opposition becomes more aggressive and the people
at once catch on to its propaganda. From now on their
hostility to the bourgeoisie is plainly visible. This young
bourgeoisie which appears to be afflicted with precocious
senility takes no heed of the advice showered upon it, and
reveals itself incapable of understanding that it would be
in its interest to draw a veil, even if only the flimsiest kind,
over its exploitation. It is the most Christian newspaper,


The African Weekly, published in Brazzaville, which ad­
dresses the princes of the regime thus:

  You who are in good positions, you and your wives, today
you enjoy many comforts; perhaps a good education, a fine
house, good contacts, and many missions on which you are
delegated which open new horizons to you. But all your
wealth forms a hard shell which prevents your seeing the
poverty that surrounds you. Take care.
   This warning coming from The African "Weekly and
addressed to the henchmen of Monsieur Youlou has, we
may imagine, nothing revolutionary about it. W h a t The
African Weekly wants to point out to the starvers of the
Congolese people is that God will punish their conduct.
It continues: "If there is no room in your heart for con­
sideration toward those who are beneath you, there will
be no room for you in God's house."
   It is clear that the national bourgeoisie hardly worries
at all about such an indictment. With its wave lengths
tuned in to Europe, it continues firmly and resolutely to
make the most of the situation. The enormous profits
which it derives from the exploitation of the people are
exported to foreign countries. The young national bour­
geoisie is often more suspicious of the regime that it has
set up than are the foreign companies. The national bour­
geoisie refuses to invest in its own country and behaves
toward the state that protects and nurtures it with, it
must be remarked, astonishing ingratitude. It acquires
foreign securities in the European markets, and goes off
to spend the weekend in Paris or Hamburg. The behavior
of the national bourgeoisie of certain underdeveloped
countries is reminiscent of the members of a gang, who
after every holdup hide their share in the loot from the
other members who are their accomplices and prudently


start thinking about their retirement. Such behavior shows
that more or less consciously the national bourgeoisie is
playing to lose if the game goes on too long. They guess
that the present situation will not last indefinitely but
they intend to make the most of it. Such exploitation and
such contempt for the state, however, inevitably gives rise
to discontent among the mass of the people. It is in these
conditions that the regime becomes harsher. In the ab­
sence of a parliament it is the army that becomes the
arbiter: but sooner or later it will realize its power and
will hold over the government's head the threat of a
manifesto.
    As we see it, the national bourgeoisie of certain underde­
veloped countries has learned nothing from books. If they
had looked closer at the Latin American countries they
doubtless would have recognized the dangers which
 threaten them. W e may thus conclude that this bour­
 geoisie in miniature that thrusts itself into the forefront
 is condemned to mark time, accomplishing nothing. In
 underdeveloped countries the bourgeois phase is impos­
 sibly arid. Certainly, there is a police dictatorship and a
 profiteering caste, but the construction of an elaborate
 bourgeois society seems to be condemned to failure. The
 ranks of decked-out profiteers whose grasping hands scrape
 up the bank notes from a poverty-stricken country will
 sooner or later be men of straw in the hands of the army,
 cleverly handled by foreign experts. In this way the former
 mother country practices indirect government, both by
 the bourgeoisie that it upholds and also by the national
 army led by its experts, an army that pins the people
 down, immobilizing and terrorizing them.
    The observations that we have been able to make about
 the national bourgeoisie bring us to a conclusion which
 should cause no surprise. In underdeveloped countries, the
 bourgeoisie should not be allowed to find the conditions


 necessary for its existence and its growth. In other words,
 the combined effort of the masses led by a party and of
 intellectuals who are highly conscious and armed with rev­
 olutionary principles ought to bar the way to this useless
and harmful middle class.
   The theoretical question that for the last fifty years has
been raised whenever the history of underdeveloped coun­
tries is under discussion—whether or not the bourgeois
phase can be skipped—ought to be answered in the field
of revolutionary action, and not by logic. The bourgeois
phase in underdeveloped countries can only justify itself
in so far as the national bourgeoisie has sufficient eco­
nomic and technical strength to build up a bourgeois
society, to create the conditions necessary for the develop­
ment of a large-scale proletariat, to mechanize agriculture,
and finally to make possible the existence of an authentic
national culture.
   A bourgeoisie similar to that which developed in Europe
is able to elaborate an ideology and at the same time
strengthen its own power. Such a bourgeoisie, dynamic,
educated, and secular has fully succeeded in its undertak­
ing of the accumulation of capital and has given to the
nation a minimum of prosperity. In underdeveloped coun­
tries, we have seen that no true bourgeoisie exists; there
is only a sort of little greedy caste, avid and voracious,
with the mind of a huckster, only too glad to accept the
dividends that the former colonial power hands out to it.
This get-rich-quick middle class shows itself incapable of
great ideas or of inventiveness. It remembers what it has
read in European textbooks and imperceptibly it becomes
not even the replica of Europe, but its caricature.
   The struggle against the bourgeoisie of underdeveloped
countries is far from being a theoretical one. It is not
concerned with making out its condemnation as laid down
by the judgment of history. The national bourgeoisie of


underdeveloped countries must not be opposed because it
threatens to slow down the total, harmonious develop­
ment of the nation. It must simply be stoutly opposed
because, literally, it is good for nothing. This bourgeoisie,
expressing its mediocrity in its profits, its achievements,
and in its thought tries to hide this mediocrity by build­
ings which have prestige value at the individual level, by
chromium-plating on big American cars, by holidays on
the Riviera and weekends in neon-lit nightclubs.
   This bourgeoisie which turns its back more and more
 on the people as a whole does not even succeed in
extracting spectacular concessions from the West, such
as investments which would be of value for the country's
economy or the setting up of certain industries. On the
contrary, assembly plants spring up and consecrate the
type of neo-colonialist industrialization in which the
country's economy flounders. Thus it must not be said
that the national bourgeoisie retards the country's evo­
lution, that it makes it lose time or that it threatens to
lead the nation up blind alleys. In fact, the bourgeois
phase in the history of underdeveloped countries is a com­
pletely useless phase. When this caste has vanished,
devoured by its own contradictions, it will be seen that
nothing new has happened since independence was
proclaimed, and that everything must be started again
from scratch. The changeover will not take place at the
level of the structures set up by the bourgeoisie during its
reign, since that caste has done nothing more than take
over unchanged the legacy of the economy, the thought,
and the institutions left by the colonialists.
   It is all the easier to neutralize this bourgeois class in
that, as we have seen, it is numerically, intellectually, and
economically weak. In the colonized territories, the bour­
geois caste draws its strength after independence chiefly
from agreements reached with the former colonial power.


 The national bourgeoisie has all the more opportunity to
 take over from the oppressor since it has been given time
 for a leisurely tete-a-tete with the ex-colonial power. But
 deep-rooted contradictions undermine the ranks of that
 bourgeoisie; it is this that gives the observer an impres­
 sion of instability. There is not as yet a homogeneity of
 caste. Many intellectuals, for example, condemn this re­
 gime based on the domination of the few. In underde­
 veloped countries, there are certain members of the elite,
 intellectuals and civil servants, who are sincere, who feel
 the necessity for a planned economy, the outlawing of
profiteers, and the strict prohibition of attempts at mys­
 tification. In addition, such men fight in a certain meas­
 ure for the mass participation of the people in the order­
ing of public affairs.
    In those underdeveloped countries which accede to
independence, there almost always exists a small number
of honest intellectuals, who have no very precise ideas
about politics, but who instinctively distrust the race for
positions and pensions which is symptomatic of the early
days of independence in colonized countries. The personal
situation of these men (breadwinners of large families) or
their background (hard struggles and a strictly moral up­
bringing) explains their manifest contempt for profiteers
and schemers. W e must know how to use these men in
the decisive battle that we mean to engage upon which
will lead to a healthier outlook for the nation. Closing the
road to the national bourgeoisie is, certainly, the means
whereby the vicissitudes of newfound independence may
be avoided, and with them the decline of morals, the in­
stalling of corruption within the country, economic regres­
sion, and the immediate disaster of an anti-democratic
regime depending on force and intimidation. But it is also
the only means toward progress.
    W h a t holds up the taking of a decision by the pro-


 foundly democratic elements of the young nation and
 adds to their timidity is the apparent strength of the
bourgeoisie. In newly independent underdeveloped coun­
 tries, the whole of the ruling class swarms into the towns
 built by colonialism. The absence of any analysis of the
 total population induces onlookers to think that there
 exists a powerful and perfectly organized bourgeoisie. In
 fact, we know today that the bourgeoisie in underde­
veloped countries is non-existent. What creates a bour­
 geoisie is not the bourgeois spirit, nor its taste or man­
 ners, nor even its aspirations. The bourgeoisie is above
 all the direct product of precise economic conditions.
    Now, in the colonies, the economic conditions are con­
 ditions of a foreign bourgeoisie. Through its agents, it is
 the bourgeoisie of the mother country that we find present
 in the colonial towns. The bourgeoisie in the colonies is,
before independence, a Western bourgeoisie, a true branch
of the bourgeoisie of the mother country, that derives its
legitimacy, its force, and its stability from the bourgeoisie
of the homeland. During the period of unrest that pre­
cedes independence, certain native elements, intellectuals,
and traders, who live in the midst of that imported bour­
geoisie, try to identify themselves with it. A permanent
wish for identification with the bourgeois representatives
of the mother country is to be found among the native
intellectuals and merchants.
    This native bourgeoisie, which has adopted un­
reservedly and with enthusiasm the ways of thinking
characteristic of the mother country, which has become
wonderfully detached from its own thought and has based
its consciousness upon foundations which are typically
foreign, will realize, with its mouth watering, that it lacks
something essential to a bourgeoisie: money. The bour­
geoisie of an underdeveloped country is a bourgeoisie in
spirit only. It is not its economic strength, nor the dy-


namism of its leaders, nor the breadth of its ideas that en­
sures its peculiar quality as bourgeoisie. Consequently it re­
mains at the beginning and for a long time afterward a
bourgeoisie of the civil service. It is the positions that it
holds in the new national administration which will give it
strength and serenity. If the government gives it enough
time and opportunity, this bourgeoisie will manage to put
away enough money to stiffen its domination. But it will
always reveal itself as incapable of giving birth to an au­
thentic bourgeois society with all the economic and in­
dustrial consequences which this entails.
   From the beginning the national bourgeoisie directs its
efforts toward activities of the intermediary type. The
basis of its strength is found in its aptitude for trade and
small business enterprises, and in securing commissions. It
is not its money that works, but its business acumen. It
does not go in for investments and it cannot achieve that
accumulation of capital necessary to the birth and blos­
soming of an authentic bourgeoisie. At that rate it would
take centuries to set on foot an embryonic industrial revo­
lution, and in any case it would find the way barred by the
relentless opposition of the former mother country, which
will have taken all precautions when setting up neo-colo-
nialist trade conventions.
   If the government wants to bring the country out of its
stagnation and set it well on the road toward development
and progress, it must first and foremost nationalize the
middleman's trading sector. The bourgeoisie, who wish to
see both the triumph of the spirit of money-making and
the enjoyment of consumer goods, and at the same time
the triumph of their contemptuous attitude toward the
mass of the people and the scandalous aspect of profit-
making (should not we rather call it robbery?), in fact in­
vest largely in this sector. The intermediary market which
formerly was dominated by the settlers will be invaded by
 180 / The Wretched of the Earth

the young national bourgeoisie. In a colonial economy the
intermediary sector is by far the most important. If you
want to progresSj you must decide in the first few hours to
nationalize this sector. But it is clear that such a nationali­
zation ought not to take on a rigidly state-controlled
aspect. It is not a question of placing at the head of these
services citizens who have had no political education.
Every time such a procedure has been adopted it has been
seen that the government has in fact contributed to the
triumph of a dictatorship of civil servants who had been
set in the mold of the former mother country, and who
quickly showed themselves incapable of thinking in terms
of the nation as a whole. These civil servants very soon
began to sabotage the national economy and to throw its
structure out of joint; under them, corruption, prevarica­
tion, the diversion of stocks, and the black market came to
stay. Nationalizing the intermediary sector means organ­
izing wholesale and retail cooperatives on a democratic
basis; it also means decentralizing these cooperatives by
getting the mass of the people interested in the ordering
of public affairs. You will not be able to do all this unless
you give the people some political education. Previously,
it was realized that this key problem should be clarified
once and for all. Today, it is true that the principle of
the political education of the masses is generally sub­
scribed to in underdeveloped countries. But it does not
seem that this primordial task is really taken to heart.
When people stress the need to educate the people polit­
ically, they decide to point out at the same time that they
want to be supported by the people in the action that they
are taking. A government which declares that it wishes to
educate the people politically thus expresses its desire to
govern with the people and for the people. It ought not
to speak a language destined to camouflage a bourgeois
administration. In the capitalist countries, the bourgeois


 governments have long since left this infantile stage of
 authority behind. To put it bluntly, they govern with the
 help of their laws, their economic strength, and their
 police. Now that their power is firmly established they
 no longer need to lose time in striking demagogic atti­
 tudes. They govern in their own interests, and they have
 the courage of their own strength. They have created legit­
 imacy, and they are strong in their own right.
   The bourgeois caste in newly independent countries has
 not yet the cynicism nor the unruffled calm which is
founded on the strength of long-established bourgeoisies.
 From this springs the fact that it shows a certain anxiety to
hide its real convictions, to sidetrack, and in short to set
itself up as a popular force. But the inclusion of the
masses in politics does not consist in mobilizing three or
four times a year ten thousand or a hundred thousand men
and women. These mass meetings and spectacular gather­
ings are akin to the old tactics that date from before inde­
pendence, whereby you exhibited your forces in order to
prove to yourself and to others that you had the people
behind you. The political education of the masses proposes
not to treat the masses as children but to make adults of
them.
   This brings us to consider the role of the political party
in an underdeveloped country. W e have seen in the pre­
ceding pages that very often simple souls, who moreover
belong to the newly born bourgeoisie, never stop repeat­
ing that in an underdeveloped country the direction of
affairs by a strong authority, in other words a dictatorship,
is a necessity. With this in view the party is given the task
of supervising the masses. The party plays understudy to
the administration and the police, and controls the masses,
not in order to make sure that they really participate in
the business of governing the nation, but in order to re­
mind them constantly that the government expects from


them obedience and discipline. That famous dictatorship,
whose supporters believe that it is called for by the his­
torical process and consider it an indispensable prelude to
the dawn of independence, in fact symbolizes the decision
of the bourgeois caste to govern the underdeveloped coun­
try first with the help of the people, but soon against
them. The progressive transformation of the party into an
information service is the indication that the government
holds itself more and more on the defensive. The inco­
herent mass of the people is seen as a blind force that
must be continually held in check either by mystification
or by the fear inspired by the police force. The party acts
as a barometer and as an information service. The militant
 is turned into an informer. He is entrusted with punitive
 expeditions against the villages. The embryo opposition
 parties are liquidated by beatings and stonings. The oppo­
 sition candidates see their houses set on fire. The police
 increase their provocations. In these conditions, you may
 be sure, the party is unchallenged and 99.99% of the votes
 are cast for the government candidate. We should add
 that in Africa a certain number of governments actually
 behave in this way. All the opposition parties, which more­
 over are usually progressive and would therefore tend to
 work for the greater influence of the masses in the con­
 duct of public matters, and who desire that the proud,
 money-making bourgeoisie should be brought to heel, have
 been by dint of baton charges and prisons condemned first
 to silence and then to a clandestine existence.
    The political party in many parts of Africa which are
 today independent is puffed up in a most dangerous way.
 In the presence of a member of the party, the people are
 silent, behave like a flock of sheep, and publish panegyrics
 in praise of the government or the leader. But in the street
 when evening comes, away from the village, in the caf£s
 or by the river, the bitter disappointment of the people,


 their despair but also their unceasing anger makes itself
heard. The party, instead of welcoming the expression of
 popular discontent, instead of taking for its fundamental
purpose the free flow of ideas from the people up to the
government, forms a screen, and forbids such ideas. The
party leaders behave like common sergeant-majors, fre­
 quently reminding the people of the need for "silence in
the ranks." This party which used to call itself the servant
of the people, which used to claim that it worked for the
full expression of the people's will, as soon as the colonial
power puts the country into its control hastens to send the
people back to their caves. As far as national unity is con­
cerned the party will also make many mistakes, as for
example when the so-called national party behaves as a
party based on ethnic differences. It becomes, in fact, the
tribe which makes itself into a party. This party which of
its own will proclaims that it is a national party, and which
claims to speak in the name of the totality of the people,
secretly, sometimes even openly, organizes an authentic
ethnic dictatorship. We no longer see the rise of a bour­
geois dictatorship, but a tribal dictatorship. The ministers,
the members of the cabinet, the ambassadors and local
commissioners are chosen from the same ethnological
group as the leader, sometimes directly from his own
family. Such regimes of the family sort seem to go back to
the old laws of inbreeding, and not anger but shame
is felt when we are faced with such stupidity, such an
imposture, such intellectual and spiritual poverty. These
heads of the government are the true traitors in Africa,
for they sell their country to the most terrifying of all its
enemies: stupidity. This tribalizing of the central au­
thority, it is certain, encourages regionalist ideas and sepa­
ratism. All the decentralizing tendencies spring up again
and triumph, and the nation falls to pieces, broken in bits.
The leader, who once used to call for "African unity" and


 who thought of his own little family, wakes up one day to
 find himself saddled with five tribes, who also want to
 have their own ambassadors and ministers; and irrespon­
  sible as ever, still unaware and still despicable, he de­
  nounces their "treason."
     We have more than once drawn attention to the baleful
  influence frequently wielded by the leader. This is due to
  the fact that the party in certain districts is organized like
  a gang, with the toughest person in it as its head. The
  ascendency of such a leader and his power over others is
  often mentioned, and people have no hesitation in declar­
  ing, in a tone of slightly admiring complicity, that he
  strikes terror into his nearest collaborators. In order to
  avoid these many pitfalls an unceasing battle must be
  waged, a battle to prevent the party from ever becoming
  a willing tool in the hands of a leader. "Leader": the word
  comes from the English verb "to lead," but a frequent
 French translation is "to drive." The driver, the shepherd
  of the people, no longer exists today. The people are no
  longer a herd; they do not need to be driven. If the leader
 drives me on, I want him to realize that at the same time
 I show him the way; the nation ought not to be something
 bossed by a Grand Panjandrum. We may understand the
 panic caused in government circles each time one of these
 leaders falls ill; they are obsessed by the question of who
 is to succeed him. What will happen to the country if the
 leader disappears? The ruling classes who have abdicated
 in favor of the leader, irresponsible, oblivious of every­
 thing and essentially preoccupied with the pleasures of
their everyday life, their cocktail parties, their journeys
paid for by government money, the profits they can make
out of various schemes—from time to time these people
discover the spiritual wasteland at the heart of the nation.
    A country that really wishes to answer the questions
that history puts to it, that wants to develop not only its


 towns but also the brains of its inhabitants, such a country
 must possess a trustworthy political party. The party is
 not a tool in the hands of the government. Quite on the
 contrary, the party is a tool in the hands of the people; it
 is they who decide on the policy that the government car­
 ries out. The party is not, and ought never to be, the only
 political bureau where all the members of the government
 and the chief dignitaries of the regime may meet freely to­
 gether. Only too frequently the political bureau, unfortu­
 nately, consists of all the party and its members who reside
permanently in the capital. In an underdeveloped country,
 the leading members of the party ought to avoid the capi­
 tal as if it had the plague. They ought, with some few
 exceptions, to live in the country districts. The central­
ization of all activity in the city ought to be avoided. No
excuse of administrative discipline should be taken as
legitimizing that excrescence of a capital which is already
overpopulated and overdeveloped with regard to nine-
tenths of the country. The party should be decentralized
in the extreme. It is the only way to bring life to regions
which are dead, those regions which are not yet awakened
to life.
    In practice, there will be at least one member of the
political bureau in each area and he will deliberately not
be appointed as head of that area. He will have no ad­
ministrative powers. The regional member of the political
bureau is not expected to hold the highest rank in the
regional administrative organization. He ought not auto­
matically to belong to the regional administrative body.
For the people, the party is not an authority, but an
organism through which they as the people exercise their
authority and express their will. The less there is of con­
fusion and duality of powers, the more the party will play
its part of guide and the more surely it will constitute for
the people a decisive guarantee. If the party is mingled


with the government, the fact of being a party militant
means that you take the short cut to gain private ends, to
hold a post in the government, step up the ladder, get pro­
motion and make a career for yourself.
   In an underdeveloped country, the setting up of dy­
namic district officials stops the process whereby the towns
become top-heavy and the incoherent rush toward the
cities of the mass of country people. The setting up early
in the days of independence of regional organizations and
officials who have full authority to do everything in their
power to awaken such a region, to bring life to it, and to
hasten the growth of consciousness in it is a necessity
from which there is no escape for a country that wishes to
progress. Otherwise, the government big-wigs and the party
officials group themselves around the leader. The govern­
ment services swell to huge proportions, not because they
are developing and specializing, but because new-found
cousins and fresh militants are looking for jobs and hope
to edge themselves into the government machine. And
the dream of every citizen is to get up to the capital, and
to have his share of the cake. The local districts are de­
serted; the mass of the country people with no one to
lead them, uneducated and unsupported, turn their backs
on their poorly labored fields and flock toward the outer
ring of suburbs, thus swelling out of all proportion the
ranks of the lumpenproletariat.
   The moment for a fresh national crisis is not far off. To
avoid it, we think that a quite different policy should be
followed: that the interior, the back country, ought to be
the most privileged part of the country. Moreover, in the
last resort, there is nothing inconvenient in the govern­
ment choosing its seat elsewhere than in the capital. The
capital must be deconsecrated; the outcast masses must be
shown that we have decided to work for them. It is with
this idea in mind that the government of Brazil tried to


 found Brazilia. The dead city of Rio de Janeiro was an
insult to the Brazilian people. But, unfortunately, Brazilia
is just another new capital, as monstrous as the first. The
only advantage of this achievement is that, today, there
exists a road through the bush to it.
   No, there is no serious reason which can be opposed to
the choice of another capital, or to the moving of the
government as a whole toward one of the most under­
populated regions. The capital of underdeveloped coun­
tries is a commercial notion inherited from the colonial
period. But we who are citizens of the underdeveloped
countries, we ought to seek every occasion for contacts
with the rural masses. We must create a national policy,
in other words a policy for the masses. We ought never to
lose contact with the people which has battled for its in­
dependence and for the concrete betterment of its exist­
ence.
   The native civil servants and technicians ought not to
bury themselves in diagrams and statistics, but rather in
the hearts of the people. They ought not to bristle up every
time there is question of a move to be made to the
"interior." We should no longer see the young women of
the country threaten their husbands with divorce if they
do not manage to avoid being appointed to a rural post.
For these reasons, the political bureau of the party ought
to treat these forgotten districts in a very privileged man­
ner; and the life of the capital, an altogether artificial life
which is stuck onto the real, national life like a foreign
body, ought to take up the least space possible in the life
of the nation, which is sacred and fundamental. In an
underdeveloped country, the party ought to be organized in
such fashion that it is not simply content with having
contacts with the masses. The party should be the direct
expression of the masses. The party is not an administra­
tion responsible for transmitting government orders; it is


the energetic spokesman and the incorruptible defender of
the masses. In order to arrive at this conception of the
party, we must above all rid ourselves of the very West­
ern, very bourgeois and therefore contemptuous attitude
that the masses are incapable of governing themselves. In
fact, experience proves that the masses understand per­
fectly the most complicated problems. One of the greatest
services that the Algerian revolution will have rendered to
the intellectuals of Algeria will be to have placed them in
contact with the people, to have allowed them to see the
 extreme, ineffable poverty of the people, at the same
 time allowing them to watch the awakening of the peo­
ple's intelligence and the onward progress of their con­
sciousness. The Algerian people, that mass of starving
 illiterates, those men and women plunged for centuries in
the most appalling obscurity have held out against tanks
and airplanes, against napalm and "psychological services,"
but above all against corruption and brainwashing, against
traitors and against the "national" armies of General Bel-
lounis. This people has held out in spite of hesitant or
feeble individuals, and in spite of would-be dictators. This
people has held out because for seven years its struggle
has opened up for it vistas that it never dreamed existed.
Today, arms factories are working in the midst of the
mountains several yards underground; today, the people's
tribunals are functioning at every level, and local planning
commissions are organizing the division of large-scale hold­
ings, and working out the Algeria of tomorrow. An iso­
lated individual may obstinately refuse to understand a
problem, but the group or the village understands with
disconcerting rapidity. It is true that if care is taken to
use only a language that is understood by graduates in law
and economics, you can easily prove that the masses have
to be managed from above. But if you speak the language
of everyday, if you are not obsessed by the perverse desire


to spread confusion and to rid yourself of the people, then
you will realize that the masses are quick to seize every
shade of meaning and to learn all the tricks of the trade.
If recourse is had to technical language, this signifies that
it has been decided to consider the masses as uninitiated.
Such a language is hard put to it to hide the lecturers' wish
to cheat the people and to leave them out of things. The
business of obscuring language is a mask behind which
stands out the much greater business of plunder. The
people's property and the people's sovereignty are to be
stripped from them at one and the same time. Everything
can be explained to the people, on the single condition
that you really want them to understand. And if you think
that you don't need them, and that on the contrary they
may hinder the smooth running of the many limited lia­
bility companies whose aim it is to make the people even
poorer, then the problem is quite clear.
   For if you think that you can manage a country without
letting the people interfere, if you think that the people
upset the game by their mere presence, whether they slow
it down or whether by their natural ignorance they
sabotage it, then you must have no hesitation: you must
keep the people out. Now, it so happens that when the
people are invited to partake in the management of the
country, they do not slow the movement down but on
the contrary they speed it up. W e Algerians have had the
occasion and the good fortune during the course of this
war to handle a fair number of questions. In certain coun­
try districts, the politico-military leaders of the revolution
found themselves in fact confronted with situations which
called for radical solutions. W e shall look at some of these
situations.
   During the years 1956-57, French colonialism had
marked off certain zones as forbidden, and within these
zones people's movements were strictly controlled. Thus
 190 / The Wretched of the Earth

the peasants could no longer go freely to the towns and
buy provisions. During this period, the grocers made huge
profits. The prices of tea, coffee, sugar, tobacco, and salt
soared. The black market flourished blatantly. The peas­
ants who could not pay in money mortgaged their crops,
in other words their land, or else lopped off field after field
of their fathers' farms and during the second phase worked
them for the grocer. As soon as the political commissioners
realized the danger of the situation they reacted immedi­
ately. Thus a rational system of provisioning was insti­
tuted: the grocer who went to the town was obliged to
buy from nationalist wholesalers who handed him an in­
voice which clearly showed the prices of the goods. When
the retailer got back to the village, before doing anything
else he had to go to the political commissioner who
checked the invoice, decided on the margin of profit and
fixed the price at which the various goods should be sold.
However, the retailer soon discovered a new trick, and
after three or four days declared that his stocks had run
out. In fact, he went on with his business of selling on the
black market on the sly. The reaction of the politico-
military authorities was thoroughgoing. Heavy penaliza­
tions were decided on, and the fines collected were put
into the village funds and used for social purposes or to
pay for public works in the general interest. Sometimes it
was decided to shut down the shop for a while. Then if
there was a repetition of black marketeering, the business
was at once confiscated and a managing committee elected
to carry it on, which paid a monthly allowance to the
former owner.
   Taking these experiences as a starting point, the func­
tioning of the main laws of economics was explained to
the people, with concrete examples. The accumulation of
capital ceased to be a theory and became a very real and
immediate mode of behavior. The people understood how


 that once a man was in trade, he could become rich and
increase his turnover. Then and then only did the peasants
 tell the tale of how the grocer gave them loans at exorbi­
tant interest, and others recalled how he evicted them
 from their land and how from owners they became labor­
ers. The more the people understand, the more watchful
they become, and the more they come to realize that
finally everything depends on them and their salvation lies
in their own cohesion, in the true understanding of their
interests, and in knowing who their enemies are. The peo­
ple come to understand that wealth is not the fruit of
labor but the result of organized, protected robbery. Rich
people are no longer respectable people; they are nothing
more than flesh-eating animals, jackals, and vultures which
wallow in the people's blood. Wi*-h another end in view
the political commissioners have had to decide that no­
body will work for anyone else any longer. The land be­
longs to those that till it. This is a principle which has
through explanation become a fundamental law of the
Algerian revolution. The peasants who used to employ
agricultural laborers have been obliged to give a share of
the land to their former employees.
    So it may been seen that production per acre trebled, in
spite of the many raids by the French, in spite of bom­
bardments from the air, and the difficulty of getting
manures. The fellahs who at harvest time were able to
judge and weigh the crops thus obtained wanted to know
whence came such a phenomenon; and they were quick
to understand that the idea of work is not as simple as all
that, that slavery is opposed to work, and that work pre­
supposes liberty, responsibility, and consciousness.
   In those districts where we have been able to carry out
successfully these interesting experiments, where we have
watched man being created by revolutionary beginnings,
the peasants have very clearly caught hold of the idea that


the more intelligence you bring to your work, the more
pleasure you will have in it. W e have been able to make
the masses understand that work is not simply the output
of energy, nor the functioning of certain muscles, but
that people work more by using their brains and their
hearts than with only their muscles and their sweat. In the
same way in these liberated districts which are at the same
time excluded from the old trade routes we have had to
modify production, which formerly looked only toward
the towns and toward export. W e have organized produc­
tion to meet consumers' needs for the people and for the
units of the national army of liberation. W e have quad­
rupled the production of lentils and organized the manu­
facture of charcoal. Green vegetables and charcoal have
been sent through the mountains from the north to the
south, whereas the southern districts send meat to the
north. This coordination was decided upon by the FLN
and it was they who set up the system of communications.
W e did not have any technicians or planners coming from
big Western universities; but in these liberated regions, the
daily ration went up to the hitherto unheard-of figure of
3,200 calories. The people were not content with coming
triumphant out of this test. They started asking themselves
theoretical questions: for example, why did certain dis­
tricts never see an orange before the war of liberation,
while thousands of tons are exported every year abroad?
Why were grapes unknown to a great many Algerians
whereas the European peoples enjoyed them by the mil­
lion? Today, the people have a very clear notion of what
belongs to them. The Algerian people today know that
they are the sole owners of the soil and mineral wealth of
their country. And if some individuals do not understand
the unrelenting refusal of the FLN to tolerate any en­
croachment on this right of ownership, and its fierce
refusal to allow any compromise on principles, they must


 one and all remember that the Algerian people is today
 an adult people, responsible and fully conscious of its
 responsibilities. In short, the Algerians are men of
 property.
    If we have taken the example of Algeria to illustrate our
 subject, it is not at all with the intention of glorifying our
 own people, but simply to show the important part played
 by the war in leading them toward consciousness of them­
selves. It is clear that other peoples have come to the same
 conclusion in different ways. We know for sure today that
 in Algeria the test of force was inevitable; but other coun­
 tries through political action and through the work of
 clarification undertaken by a party have led their people to
 the same results. In Algeria, we have realized that the
 masses are equal to the problems which confront them.
 In an underdeveloped country, experience proves that the
 important thing is not that three hundred people form a
 plan and decide upon carrying it out, but that the whole
 people plan and decide even if it takes them twice or
 three times as long. The fact is that the time taken up
by explaining, the time 'lost" in treating the worker as a
human being, will be caught up in the execution of the
plan. People must know where they are going, and why.
The politician should not ignore the fact that the future
remains a closed book so long as the consciousness of the
people remains imperfect, elementary, and cloudy. We
African politicians must have very clear ideas on the situa­
tion of our people. But this clarity of ideas must be pro­
foundly dialectical. The awakening of the whole people
will not come about all at once; the people's work in the
building of the nation will not immediately take on its full
dimensions: first because the means of communication
and transmission are only beginning to be developed;
secondly because the yardstick of time must no longer be
that of the moment or up till the next harvest, but must


become that of the rest of the world, and lastly because
the spirit of discouragement which has been deeply rooted
in people's minds by colonial domination is still very
near the surface. But we must not overlook the fact that
victory over those weaknesses which are the heritage of
the material and spiritual domination of the country by
another is a necessity from which no government will be
able to escape. Let us take the example of work under the
colonial regime. The settler never stopped complaining
that the native is slow. Today, in certain countries which
have become independent, we hear the ruling classes tak­
ing up the same cry. The fact is that the settler wanted the
native to be enthusiastic. By a sort of process of mystifica­
tion which constitutes the most sublime type of separation
from reality, he wanted to persuade the slave that the land
that he worked belonged to him, that the mines where he
lost his health were owned by him. The settler was singu­
larly forgetful of the fact that he was growing rich through
the death throes of the slave. In fact what the settler was
saying to the native was "Kill yourself that I may become
rich." Today, we must behave in a different fashion. We
ought not to say to the people: "Kill yourselves that the
country may become rich." If we want to increase the na­
tional revenue, and decrease the importing of certain
products which are useless, or even harmful, if we want to
increase agricultural production and overcome illiteracy,
we must explain what we are about. The people must un­
derstand what is at stake. Public business ought to be the
business of the public. So the necessity of creating a large
number of well-informed nuclei at the bottom crops up
again. Too often, in fact, we are content to establish na­
tional organizations at the top and always in the capital:
the Women's Union, the Young People's Federation,
Trade Unions, etc. But if one takes the trouble to investi­
gate what is behind the office in the capital, if you go into


 the inner room where the reports ought to be, you will be
shocked by the emptiness, the blank spaces, and the bluff.
 There must be a basis; there must be cells that supply con­
 tent and life. The masses should be able to meet together,
 discuss, propose, and receive directions. The citizens should
be able to speak, to express themselves, and to put forward
 new ideas. The branch meeting and the committee meet­
ing are liturgical acts. They are privileged occasions given
to a human being to listen and to speak. At each meeting,
the brain increases its means of participation and the eye
discovers a landscape more and more in keeping with
human dignity.
   The large proportion of young people in the under­
developed countries raises specific problems for the gov­
ernment, which must be tackled with lucidity. The young
people of the towns, idle and often illiterate, are a prey to
all sorts of disintegrating influences. It is to the youth of
an underdeveloped country that the industrialized coun­
tries most often offer their pastimes. Normally, there is a
certain homogeneity between the mental and material
level of the members of any given society and the pleasures
which that society creates for itself. But in underdeveloped
countries, young people have at their disposition leisure
occupations designed for the youth of capitalist countries:
detective novels, penny-in-the-slot machines, sexy photo­
graphs, pornographic literature, films banned to those un­
der sixteen, and above all alcohol. In the West, the family
circle, the effects of education, and the relatively high
standard of living of the working classes provide a more or
less efficient protection against the harmful action of these
pastimes. But in an African country, where mental de­
velopment is uneven, where the violent collision of two
worlds has considerably shaken old traditions and thrown
the universe of the perceptions out of focus, the impres­
sionability and sensibility of the young African are at the


mercy of the various assaults made upon them by the very
nature of Western culture. His family very often proves
itself incapable of showing stability and homogeneity when
faced with such attacks.
   In this domain, the government's duty is to act as a
filter and a stabilizer. But the youth commissioners in un­
derdeveloped countries often make the mistake of imagin­
ing their role to be that of youth commissioners in fully
developed countries. They speak of strengthening the soul,
of developing the body, and of facilitating the growth of
sportsmanlike qualities. It is our opinion that they should
beware of these conceptions. The young people of an un­
derdeveloped country are above all idle: occupations must
be found for them. For this reason the youth commis­
sioners ought for practical purposes to be attached to the
Ministry of Labor. The Ministry of Labor, which is a
prime necessity in an underdeveloped country, functions
 in collaboration with the Ministry of Planning, which is
another necessary institution in underdeveloped countries.
 The youth of Africa ought not to be sent to sports stadi­
 ums but into the fields and into the schools. The stadium
 ought not to be a show place erected in the towns, but a
 bit of open ground in the midst of the fields that the
 young people must reclaim, cultivate, and give to the na­
 tion. The capitalist conception of sport is fundamentally
 different from that which should exist in an underdevel­
 oped country. The African politician should not be pre­
occupied with turning out sportsmen, but with turning out
 fully conscious men, who play games as well. If games are
 not integrated into the national life, that is to say in the
 building of the nation, and if you turn out national sports­
 men and not fully conscious men, you will very quickly
 see sport rotted by professionalism and commercialism.
 Sport should not be a pastime or a distraction for the
 bourgeoisie of the towns. The greatest task before us is


to understand at each moment what is happening in our
country. W e ought not to cultivate the exceptional or to
seek for a hero, who is another form of leader. W e ought
to uplift the people; we must develop their brains, fill
them with ideas, change them and make them into hu­
man beings.
   We once more come up against that obsession of ours
—which we would like to see shared by all African poli­
ticians—about the need for effort to be well informed, for
work which is enlightened and freed from its historic intel-
tellectual darkness. To hold a responsible position in an
underdeveloped country is to know that in the end every­
thing depends on the education of the masses, on the
raising of the level of thought, and on what we are too
quick to call "political teaching."
   In fact, we often believe with criminal superficiality
that to educate the masses politically is to deliver a long
political harangue from time to time. W e think that it is
enough that the leader or one of his lieutenants should
speak in a pompous tone about the principal events of the
day for them to have fulfilled this bounden duty to edu­
cate the masses politically. Now, political education means
opening their minds, awakening them, and allowing the
birth of their intelligence; as Cesaire said, it is "to invent
souls." To educate the masses politically does not mean,
cannot mean, making a political speech. W h a t it means is
to try, relentlessly and passionately, to teach the masses
that everything depends on them; that if we stagnate it is
their responsibility, and that if we go forward it is due to
them too, that there is no such thing as a demiurge, that
there is no famous man who will take the responsibility for
everything, but that the demiurge is the people themselves
and the magic hands are finally only the hands of the
people. In order to put all this into practice, in order really
to incarnate the people, we repeat that there must be


decentralization in the extreme. The movement from the
top to the bottom and from the bottom to the top should
be a fixed principle, not through concern for formalism
but because simply to respect this principle is the guaran­
tee of salvation. It is from the base that forces mount up
which supply the summit with its dynamic, and make
it possible dialectically for it to leap ahead. Once again
we Algerians have been quick to understand these facts,
for no member of the government at the head of any
recognized state has had the chance of availing himself
of such a mission of salvation. For it is the rank-and-file
who are fighting in Algeria, and the rank-and-file know
well that without their daily struggle, hard and heroic as
it is, the summit would collapse; and in the same way
those at the bottom know that without a head and with­
out leadership the base would split apart in incoherence
and anarchy. The summit only draws its worth and its
strength from the existence of the people at war. Literally,
it is the people who freely create a summit for themselves,
and not the summit that tolerates the people.
   The masses should know that the government and the
party are at their service. A deserving people, in other
words a people conscious of its dignity, is a people that
never forgets these facts. During the colonial occupation
the people were told that they must give their lives so
that dignity might triumph. But the African peoples
quickly came to understand that it was not only the oc­
cupying power that threatened their dignity. The African
peoples were quick to realize that dignity and sovereignty
were exact equivalents, and in fact, a free people living
in dignity is a sovereign people. It is no use demonstrating
that the African peoples are childish or weak. A govern­
ment or a party gets the people it deserves and sooner or
later a people gets the government it deserves.
   Practical experience in certain regions confirms this


point of view. It sometimes happens at meetings that
militants use sweeping, dogmatic formulas. The prefer­
ence for this short cut, in which spontaneity and over-
simple sinking of differences dangerously combine to
defeat intellectual elaboration, frequently triumphs. When
we meet this shirking of responsibility in a militant it is
not enough to tell him he is wrong. W e must make him
ready for responsibility, encourage him to follow up his
chain of reasoning, and make him realize the true nature,
often shocking, inhuman, and in the long run sterile, of
such oversimplification.
   Nobody, neither leader nor rank-and-filer, can hold
back the truth. The search for truth in local attitudes is
a collective affair. Some are richer in experience, and
elaborate their thought more rapidly, and in the past have
been able to establish a greater number of mental links.
But they ought to avoid riding roughshod over the people,
for the success of the decision which is adopted depends
upon the coordinated, conscious effort of the whole of
the people. No one can get out of the situation scot free.
Everyone will be butchered or tortured; and in the frame­
work of the independent nation everyone will go hungry
and everyone will suffer in the slump. The collective
struggle presupposes collective responsibility at the base
and collegiate responsibility at the top. Yes, everybody will
have to be compromised in the fight for the common good.
No one has clean hands; there are no innocents and no
onlookers. W e all have dirty hands; we are all soiling them
in the swamps of our country and in the terrifying emp­
tiness of our brains. Every onlooker is either a coward or
a traitor.
   The duty of those at the head of the movement is to
have the masses behind them. Allegiance presupposes
awareness and understanding of the mission which has to
be fulfilled; in short, an intellectual position, however


embryonic. We must not voodoo -the people, nor dissolve
them in emotion and confusion. Only those underde­
veloped countries led by revolutionary elite who have come
up from the people can today allow the entry of the
masses upon the scene of history. But, we must repeat, it
is absolutely necessary to oppose vigorously and definitively
the birth of a national bourgeoisie and a privileged caste.
To educate the masses politically is to make the totality
of the nation a reality to each citizen. It is to make the
history of the nation part of the personal experience of
each of its citizens. As president Sekou Tour6 aptly re­
marked in his message to the second congress of African
writers:
In the realm of thought, man may claim to be the brain of
the world; but in real life where every action affects spiritual
and physical existence, the world is always the brain of man­
kind; for it is at this level that you will find the sum total of
the powers and units of thought, and the dynamic forces of
development and improvement; and it is there that energies
are merged and the sum of man's intellectual values is finally
added together.

   Individual experience, because it is national and be­
cause it is a link in the chain of national existence, ceases
to be individual, limited, and shrunken and is enabled to
open out into the truth of the nation and of the world.
In the same way that during the period of armed struggle
each fighter held the fortune of the nation in his hand, so
during the period of national construction each citizen
ought to continue in his real, everyday activity to as­
sociate himself with the whole of the nation, to incarnate
the continuous dialectical truth of the nation and to will
the triumph of man in his completeness here and now.
If the building of a bridge does not enrich the awareness
of those who work on it, then that bridge ought not to
01

be built and the citizens can go on swimming across the
river or going by boat. The bridge should not be "para­
chuted down" from above; it should not be imposed by a
 deus ex machina upon the social scene; on the contrary
it should come from the muscles and the brains of the
citizens. Certainly, there may well be need of engineers
and architects, sometimes completely foreign engineers
and architects; but the local party leaders should be al­
ways present, so that the new techniques can make their
way into the cerebral desert of the citizen, so that the
 bridge in whole and in part can be taken up and con­
 ceived, and the responsibility for it assumed by the
 citizen. In this way, and in this way only, everything is
possible.
    A government which calls itself a national government
ought to take responsibility for the totality of the nation;
and in an underdeveloped country the young people rep­
resent one of the most important sectors. The level of
consciousness of young people must be raised; they need
enlightenment. If the work of explanation had been car­
ried on among the youth of the nation, and if the Young
People's National Union had carried out its task of in­
tegrating them into the nation, those mistakes would have
been avoided which have threatened or already under­
mined the future of the Latin American republics. The
army is not always a school of war; more often, it is a
school of civic and political education. The soldier of an
adult nation is not a simple mercenary but a citizen who
by means of arms defends the nation. That is why it is
of fundamental importance that the soldier should know
that he is in the service of his country and not in the service
of his commanding officer, however great that officer's
prestige may be. We must take advantage of the national
military and civil service in order to raise the level of the
national consciousness, and to detribalize and unite the
 20

nation. In an underdeveloped country every effort is made
to mobilize men and women as quickly as possible; it must
guard against the danger of perpetuating the feudal tradi­
tion which holds sacred the superiority of the masculine
element over the feminine. Women will have exactly the
same place as men, not in the clauses of the constitution
but in the life of every day: in the factory, at school, and
in the parliament. If in the Western countries men are
shut up in barracks, that is not to say that this is always
the best procedure. Recruits need not necessarily be
militarized. The national service may be civil or military,
and in any case it is advisable that every able-bodied citi­
zen can at any moment take his place in a fighting unit
for the defense of national and social liberties.
   It should be possible to carry out large-scale undertakings
in the public interest by using recruited labor. This is a
marvelous way of stirring up inert districts and of making
known to a greater number of citizens the needs of their
country. Care must be taken to avoid turning the army
into an autonomous body which sooner or later, finding
itself idle and without any definite mission, will "go into
politics" and threaten the government. Drawing-room
generals, by dint of haunting the corridors of government
departments, come to dream of manifestoes. The only way
to avoid this menace is to educate the army politically, in
other words to nationalize it. In the same way another
urgent task is to increase the militia. In case of war, it is
the whole nation which fights and works. It should not
include any professional soldiers, and the number of per­
manent officers should be reduced to a minimum. This is
in the first place because officers are very often chosen
from the university class, who would be much more use­
ful elsewhere; an engineer is a thousand times more in­
dispensable to his country than an officer; and secondly,
because the crystallization of the caste spirit must be
0B

avoided. We have seen in the preceding pages that nation­
alism, that magnificent song that made the people rise
against their oppressors, stops short, falters, and dies away
 on the day that independence is proclaimed. Nationalism
 is not a political doctrine, nor a program. If you really
wish your country to avoid regression, or at best halts and
 uncertainties, a rapid step must be taken from national
consciousness to political and social consciousness. The
nation does not exist in a program which has been worked
out by revolutionary leaders and taken up with full under­
standing and enthusiasm by the masses. The nation's ef­
fort must constantly be adjusted into the general back­
ground of underdeveloped countries. The battle line
against hunger, against ignorance, against poverty, and
against unawareness ought to be ever present in the mus­
cles and the intelligences of men and women. The work
of the masses and their will to overcome the evils which
have for centuries excluded them from the mental achieve­
ments of the past ought to be grafted onto the work and
will of all underdeveloped peoples. On the level of under­
developed humanity there is a kind of collective effort, a
sort of common destiny. The news which interests the
Third World does not deal with King Baudouin's mar­
riage nor the scandals of the Italian ruling class. What we
want to hear about are the experiments carried out by the
Argentinians or the Burmese in their efforts to overcome
illiteracy or the dictatorial tendencies of their leaders. It
is these things which strengthen us, teach us, and increase
our efficiency ten times over. As we see it, a program is
necessary for a government which really wants to free the
people politically and socially. There must be an economic
program; there must also be a doctrine concerning the
division of wealth and social relations. In fact, there must
be an idea of man and of the future of humanity; that is
to say that no demagogic formula and no collusion with
 20

the former occupying power can take the place of a pro­
gram. The new peoples, unawakened at first but soon be­
coming more and more clearminded, will make strong
demands for this progTam. The African people and in­
deed all underdeveloped peoples, contrary to common
belief, very quickly build up a social and political cons­
ciousness. What can be dangerous is when they reach the
stage of social consciousness before the stage of nation­
alism. If this happens, we find in underdeveloped coun­
tries fierce demands for social justice which paradoxically
are allied with often primitive tribalism. The underde­
veloped peoples behave like starving creatures; this means
that the end is very near for those who are having a good
time in Africa. Their government will not be able to
prolong its own existence indefinitely. A bourgeoisie that
provides nationalism alone as food for the masses fails in
its mission and gets caught up in a whole series of mis­
haps. But if nationalism is not made explicit, if it is not
enriched and deepened by a very rapid transformation
into a consciousness of social and political needs, in other
words into humanism, it leads up a blind alley. The bour­
geois leaders of underdeveloped countries imprison na­
tional consciousness in sterile formalism. It is only when
men and women are included on a vast scale in enlight­
ened and fruitful work that form and body are given to
that consciousness. Then the flag and the palace where
sits the government cease to be the symbols of the nation.
The nation deserts these brightly lit, empty shells and
takes shelter in the country, where it is given life and
dynamic power. The living expression of the nation is the
moving consciousness of the whole of the people; it is
the coherent, enlightened action of men and women. The
collective building up of a destiny is the assumption of
responsibility on the historical scale. Otherwise there is
anarchy, repression, and the resurgence of tribal parties
05

and federalism. The national government, if it wants to
be national, ought to govern by the people and for the
people, for the outcasts and by the outcasts. No leader,
however valuable he may be, can substitute himself for
the popular will; and the national government, before
concerning itself about international prestige, ought first
to give back their dignity to all citizens, fill their minds
and feast their eyes with human things, and create a
prospect that is human because conscious and sovereign
men dwell therein.
              ON NATIONAL CULTURE


   To take part in the African revolution it is not enough
to write a revolutionary song; you must fashion the revo-
lution with the people. And if you fashion it with the
people, the songs will come by themselves, and of them-
selves.
   In order to achieve real action, you must yourself be a
living part of Africa and of her thought; you must be an
element of that popular energy which is entirely called
forth for the freeing, the progress, and the happiness of
Africa. There is no place outside that fight for the artist
or for the intellectual who is not himself concerned with
and completely at one with the people in the great battle
of Africa and of suffering humanity—Sekou Toure.*

   Each generation must out of relative obscurity discover
its mission, fulfill it, or betray it. In underdeveloped coun­
tries the preceding generations have both resisted the
work or erosion carried by colonialism and also helped
on the maturing of the struggles of today. We must rid
ourselves of the habit, now that we are in the thick of
   * "The political leader as the representative of a culture." Address
to the second Congress of Black Writers and Artists, Rome, 1959.
                                 206
07

the fight, of minimizing the action of our fathers or of
feigning incomprehension when considering their silence
and passivity. They fought as well as they could, with the
arms that they possessed then; and if the echoes of their
struggle have not resounded in the international arena,
we must realize that the reason for this silence lies less
in their lack of heroism than in the fundamentally
different international situation of our time. It needed
more than one native to say "We've had enough"; more
than one peasant rising crushed, more than one demon­
stration put down before we could today hold our own,
certain in our victory. As for we who have decided to break
the back of colonialism, our historic mission is to sanction
all revolts, all desperate actions, all those abortive attempts
drowned in rivers of blood.
   In this chapter we shall analyze the problem, which is
felt to be fundamental, of the legitimacy of the claims of
a nation. It must be recognized that the political party
which mobilizes the people hardly touches on this prob­
lem of legitimacy. The political parties start from living
reality and it is in the name of this reality, in the name
of the stark facts which weigh down the present and the
future of men and women, that they fix their line of ac­
tion. The political party may well speak in moving terms
of the nation, but what it is concerned with is that the
people who are listening understand the need to take
part in the fight if, quite simply, they wish to continue to
exist.
   Today we know that in the first phase of the national
struggle colonialism tries to disarm national demands by
putting forward economic doctrines. As soon as the first
demands are set out, colonialism pretends to consider
them, recognizing with ostentatious humility that the ter­
ritory is suffering from serious underdevelopment which
necessitates a great economic and social effort. And, in
 20

fact, it so happens that certain spectacular measures
(centers of work for the unemployed which are opened
here and there, for example) delay the crystallization of
national consciousness for a few years. But, sooner or
later, colonialism sees that it is not within its powers to
put into practice a project of economic and social
reforms which will satisfy the aspirations of the colonized
people. Even where food supplies are concerned, colonial­
ism gives proof of its inherent incapability. The colonialist
state quickly discovers that if it wishes to disarm the
nationalist parties on strictly economic questions then it
will have to do in the colonies exactly what it has refused
to do in its own country. It is not mere chance that al­
most everywhere today there flourishes the doctrine of
Cartierism.
   The disillusioned bitterness we find in Carrier when up
against the obstinate determination of France to link to
herself peoples which she must feed while so many
French people live in want shows up the impossible
situation in which colonialism finds itself when the
colonial system is called upon to transform itself into an
unselfish program of aid and assistance. It is why, once
again, there is no use in wasting time repeating that
hunger with dignity is preferable to bread eaten in
slavery. On the contrary, we must become convinced that
colonialism is incapable of procuring for the colonized
peoples the material conditions which might make them
forget their concern for dignity. Once colonialism has
realized where its tactics of social reform are leading, we
see it falling back on its old reflexes, reinforcing police
effectives, bringing up troops, and setting a reign of
terror which is better adapted to its interests and its
psychology.
   Inside the political parties, and most often in offshoots
from these parties, cultured individuals of the colonized
09

race make their appearance. For these individuals, the
demand for a national culture and the affirmation of the
existence of such a culture represent a special battlefield.
While the politicians situate their action in actual
present-day events, men of culture take their stand in the
field of history. Confronted with the native intellectual
who decides to make an aggressive response to the colonial­
ist theory of pre-colonial barbarism, colonialism will react
only slightly, and still less because the ideas developed by
the young colonized intelligentsia are widely professed by
specialists in the mother country. It is in fact a common­
place to state that for several decades large numbers of
research workers have, in the main, rehabilitated the
African, Mexican, and Peruvian civilizations. T h e passion
with which native intellectuals defend the existence of
 their national culture may be a source of amazement; but
those who condemn this exaggerated passion are strangely
apt to forget that their own psyche and their own selves
 are conveniently sheltered behind a French or German
 culture which has given full proof of its existence and
which is uncontested.
    I am ready to concede that on the plane of factual
 being the past existence of an Aztec civilization does not
 change anything very much in the diet of the Mexican
 peasant of today. I admit that all the proofs of a wonder­
 ful Songhai civilization will not change the fact that
 today the Songhais are underfed and illiterate, thrown
 between sky and water with empty heads and empty eyes,
  But it has been remarked several times that this pas­
  sionate search for a national culture which existed before
  the colonial era finds its legitimate reason in the anxiety
  shared by native intellectuals to shrink away from that
  Western culture in which they all risk being swamped.
  Because they realize they are in danger of losing their
  lives and thus becoming lost to their people, these men,


hotheaded and with anger in their hearts, relentlessly de­
termine to renew contact once more with the oldest and
most pre-colonial springs of life of their people.
   Let us go further. Perhaps this passionate research and
this anger are kept up or at least directed by the secret
hope of discovering beyond the misery of today, beyond
self-contempt, resignation, and abjuration, some very
beautiful and splendid era whose existence rehabilitates
us both in regard to ourselves and in regard to others. I
have said that I have decided to go further. Perhaps un­
consciously, the native intellectuals, since they could not
stand wonderstruck before the history of today's barbarity,
decided to back further and to delve deeper down; and,
let us make no mistake, it was with the greatest delight
that they discovered that there was nothing to be ashamed
of in the past, but rather dignity, glory, and solemnity.
The claim to a national culture in the past does not only
rehabilitate that nation and serve as a justification for
the hope of a future national culture. In the sphere of
psycho-affective equilibrium it is responsible for an im­
portant change in the native. Perhaps we have not suffi­
ciently demonstrated that colonialism is not simply con­
tent to impose its rule upon the present and the future
of a dominated country. Colonialism is not satisfied
merely with holding a people in its grip and emptying
the native's brain of all form and content. By a kind of
perverted logic, it turns to the past of the oppressed peo­
ple, and distorts, disfigures, and destrovs it. TTr's work of
devaluing pre-colonial history takes on a dialectical signif­
icance today.
   When we consider the efforts made to carry out the
cultural estrangement so characteristic of the colonial
epoch, we realize that nothing has been left to chance
and that the total result looked for by colonial domina­
tion was indeed to convince the natives that colonialism


came to lighten their darkness. The effect consciously
sought by colonialism was to drive into the natives' heads
the idea that if the settlers were to leave, they would at
once fall back into barbarism, degradation, and bestiality.
   On the unconscious plane, colonialism therefore did
not seek to be considered by the native as a gentle," loving
mother who protects her child from a hostile environ­
ment, but rather as a mother who unceasingly restrains
her fundamentally perverse offspring from managing to
commit suicide and from giving free rein to its evil in­
stincts. The colonial mother protects her child from itself,
from its ego, and from its physiology, its biology, and its
own unhappiness which is its very essence.
   In such a situation the claims of the native intellectual
are not a luxury but a necessity in any coherent program.
The native intellectual who takes up arms to defend his
nation's legitimacy and who wants to bring proofs to
bear out that legitimacy, who is willing to strip himself
naked to study the history of his body, is obliged to dis­
sect the heart of his people.
   Such an examination is not specifically national. The
native intellectual who decides to give battle to colonial
lies fights on the field of the whole continent. The past
is given back its value. Culture, extracted from the past
to be displayed in all its splendor, is not necessarily that
of his own country. Colonialism, which has not bothered
to put too fine a point on its efforts, has never ceased to
maintain that the Nergo is a savage; and for the colonist,
the Negro was neither an Angolan nor a Nigerian, for
he simply spoke of "the Negro." For colonialism, this
vast continent was the haunt of savages, a country riddled
with superstitions and fanaticism, destined for contempt,
weighed down by the curse of God, a country of cannibals
—in short, the Negro's country. Colonialism's condemna­
tion is continental in its scope. The contention by


colonialism that the darkest night of humanity lay over
pre-colonial history concerns the whole of the African
continent. The efforts of the native to rehabilitate him­
self and to escape from the claws of colonialism are logi­
cally inscribed from the same point of view as that of
colonialism. The native intellectual who has gone far
beyond the domains of Western culture and who has got
it into his head to proclaim the existence of another cul­
ture never does so in the name of Angola or of Dahomey.
The culture which is affirmed is African culture. The
Negro, never so much a Negro as since he has been domi­
nated by the whites, when he decides to prove that he
has a culture and to behave like a cultured person, comes
to realize that history points out a well-defined path to
him: he must demonstrate that a Negro culture exists.
   And it is only too true that those who are most respons­
ible for this racialization of thought, or at least for the first
movement toward that thought, are and remain those
Europeans who have never ceased to set up white culture
to fill the gap left by the absence of other cultures. Colo­
nialism did not dream of wasting its time in denying the
existence of one national culture after another. Therefore
the reply of the colonized peoples will be straight away
continental in its breadth. In Africa, the native literature
of the last twenty years is not a national literature but a
Negro literature. The concept of negritude, for example,
was the emotional if not the logical antithesis of that
insult which the white man flung at humanity. This rush
of negritude against the white man's contempt showed
itself in certain spheres to be the one idea capable of lift­
ing interdictions and anathemas. Because the New Gui-
nean or Kenyan intellectuals found themselves above all
up against a general ostracism and delivered to the com­
bined contempt of their overlords, their reaction was to
sing praises in admiration of each other. The uncondi-


tional affirmation of African culture has succeeded the
unconditional affirmation of European culture. On the
whole, the poets of negritude oppose the idea of an old
Europe to a young Africa, tiresome reasoning to lyricism,
oppressive logic to high-stepping nature, and on one side
stiffness, ceremony, etiquette, and scepticism, while on
the other frankness, liveliness, liberty, and—why not?—
luxuriance: but also irresponsibility.
    The poets of negritude will not stop at the limits of
the continent. From America, black voices will take up
the hymn with fuller unison. The "black world" will see
the light and Busia from Ghana, Birago Diop from Sene­
gal, Hampate Ba from the Soudan, and Saint-Clair Drake
from Chicago will not hesitate to assert the existence of
common ties and a motive power that is identical.
    The example of the Arab world might equally well be
 quoted here. W e know that the majority of Arab terri­
tories have been under colonial domination. Colonialism
has made the same effort in these regions to plant deep
 in the minds of the native population the idea that before
 the advent of colonialism their history was one which
 was dominated by barbarism. The struggle for national
 liberty has been accompanied by a cultural phenomenon
 known by the name of the awakening of Islam. The pas­
 sion with which contemporary Arab writers remind their
 people of the great pages of their history is a reply to the
 lies told by the occupying power. The great names of
 Arabic literature and the great past of Arab civilization
 have been brandished about with the same ardor as those
 of the African civilizations. T h e Arab leaders have tried
  to return to the famous Dar El Islam which shone so
  brightly from the twelfth to the fourteenth century.
     Today, in the political sphere, the Arab League is giv­
  ing palpable form to this will to take up again the heritage
  of the past and to bring it to culmination. Today, Arab


doctors and Arab poets speak to each other across the
frontiers, and strive to create a new Arab culture and a
new Arab civilization. It is in the name of Arabism that
these men join together, and that they try to think to­
gether. Everywhere, however, in the Arab world, national
feeling has preserved even under colonial domination a
liveliness that we fail to find in Africa. At the same time
that spontaneous communion of each with all, present in
the African movement, is not to be found in the Arab
League. On the contrary, paradoxically, everyone tries to
sing the praises of the achievements of his nation. The
cultural process is freed from the indifferentiation which
characterized it in the African world, but the Arabs do
not always manage to stand aside in order to achieve their
aims. The living culture is not national but Arab. The
problem is not as yet to secure a national culture, not as
yet to lay hold of a movement differentiated by nations,
but to assume an African or Arabic culture when con­
fronted by the all-embracing condemnation pronounced
by the dominating power. In the African world, as in the
Arab, we see that the claims of the man of culture in a
colonized country are all-embracing, continental, and in
the case of the Arabs, worldwide.
   This historical necessity in which the men of African
culture find themselves to racialize their claims and to
speak more of African culture than of national culture
will tend to lead them up a blind alley. Let us take for
example the case of the African Cultural Society. This
society had been created by African intellectuals who
wished to get to know each other and to compare their
experiences and the results of their respective research
work. The aim of this society was therefore to affirm the
existence of an African culture, to evaluate this culture
on the plane of distinct nations, and to reveal the in­
ternal motive forces of each of their national cultures. But


at the same time this society fulfilled another need: the
need to exist side by side with the European Cultural So­
ciety, which threatened to transform itself into a Universal
Cultural Society. There was therefore at the bottom of this
decision the anxiety to be present at the universal trysting
place fully armed, with a culture springing from the very
heart of the African continent. Now, this Society will very
quickly show its inability to shoulder these different
tasks, and will limit itself to exhibitionist demonstrations,
while the habitual behavior of the members of this So­
ciety will be confined to showing Europeans that such a
thing as African culture exists, and opposing their ideas
to those of ostentatious and narcissistic Europeans. W e
have shown that such an attitude is normal and draws its
legitimacy from the lies propagated by men of Western
culture, but the degradation of the aims of this Society will
become more marked with the elaboration of the concept
of negritude. The African Society will become the cul­
tural society of the black world and will come to include
the Negro dispersion, that is to say the tens of thousands
of black people spread over the American continents.
   The Negroes who live in the United States and in Cen­
tral or Latin America in fact experience the need to at­
tach themselves to a cultural matrix. Their problem is not
 fundamentally different from that of the Africans. The
whites of America did not mete out to them any different
 treatment from that of the whites who ruled over the Afri­
 cans. W e have seen that the whites were used to putting all
 Negroes in the same bag. During the first congress of the
 African Cultural Society which was held in Paris in 1956,
 the American Negroes of their own accord considered their
 problems from the same standpoint as those of their
 African brothers. Cultured Africans, speaking of African
 civilizations, decreed that there should be a reasonable
 status within the state for those who had formerly been


 slaves. But little by little the American Negroes realized
 that the essential problems confronting them were not
 the same as those that confronted the African Negroes.
 The Negroes of Chicago only resemble the Nigerians or
 the Tanganyikans in so far as they were all defined in rela­
 tion to the whites. But once the first comparisons had
been made and subjective feelings were assuaged, the
American Negroes realized that the objective problems
were fundamentally heterogeneous. The test cases of civil
liberty whereby both whites and blacks in America try
to drive back racial discrimination have very little in com­
mon in their principles and objectives with the heroic
fight of the Angolan people against the detestable Portu­
guese colonialism. Thus, during the second congress of
the African Cultural Society the American Negroes de­
cided to create an American society for people of black
cultures.
   Negritude therefore finds its first limitation in the
phenomena which take account of the formation of the
historical character of men. Negro and African-Negro
culture broke up into different entities because the men
who wished to incarnate these cultures realized that every
culture is first and foremost national, and that the prob­
lems which kept Richard Wright or Langston Hughes on
the alert were fundamentally different from those which
might confront Leopold Senghor or Jomo Kenyatta. In
the same way certain Arab states, though they had
chanted the marvelous hymn of Arab renaissance, had
nevertheless to realize that their geographical position and
the economic ties of their region were stronger even than
the past that they wished to revive. Thus we find today
the Arab states organically linked once more with societies
which are Mediterranean in their culture. The fact is that
these states are submitted to modern pressure and to new
channels of trade while the network of trade relations


which was dominant during the great period of Arab his­
tory has disappeared. But above all there is the fact that
the political regimes of certain Arab states are so different,
and so far away from each other in their conceptions, that
even a cultural meeting between these states is meaning­
less.
   Thus we see that the cultural problem as it sometimes
exists in colonized countries runs the risk of giving rise
to serious ambiguities. The lack of culture of the Negroes,
as proclaimed by colonialism, and the inherent barbarity
of the Arabs ought logically to lead to the exaltation of
cultural manifestations which are not simply national but
continental, and extremely racial. In Africa, the move­
ment of men of culture is a movement toward the Negro-
African culture or the Arab-Moslem culture. It is not
specifically toward a national culture. Culture is becom­
ing more and more cut off from the events of today. It
finds its refuge beside a hearth that glows with passionate
emotion, and from there makes its way by realistic paths
which are the only means by which it may be made fruit­
ful, homogeneous, and consistent.
   If the action of the native intellectual is limited his­
torically, there remains nevertheless the fact that it con­
tributes greatly to upholding and justifying the action of
politicians. It is true that the attitude of the native in­
tellectual sometimes takes on the aspect of a cult or of a
religion. But if we really wish to analyze this attitude cor­
rectly we will come to see that it is symptomatic of the
intellectual's realization of the danger that he is running
in cutting his last moorings and of breaking adrift from
his people. This stated belief in a national culture is in
fact an ardent, despairing turning toward anything that
will afford him secure anchorage. In order to ensure his
salvation and to escape from the supremacy of the white
man's culture the native feels the need to turn backward


toward his unknown roots and to lose himself at whatever
cost in his own barbarous people. Because he feels he is
becoming estranged, that is to say because he feels that
he is the living haunt of contradictions which run the
risk of becoming insurmountable, the native tears himself
away from the swamp that may suck him down and
accepts everything, decides to take all for granted and
confirms everything even though he may lose body and
soul. The native finds that he is expected to answer for
everything, and to all comers. He not only turns himself
into the defender of his people's past; he is willing to be
counted as one of them, and henceforward he is even ca­
pable of laughing at his past cowardice.
   This tearing away, painful and difficult though it may
be, is however necessary. If it is not accomplished there
will be serious psycho-affective injuries and the result will
be individuals without an anchor, without a horizon,
colorless, stateless, rootless—a race of angels. It will be
also quite normal to hear certain natives declare, "I speak
as a Senegalese and as a Frenchman . . ." "I speak as an
Algerian and as a Frenchman . . ." The intellectual who
is Arab and French, or Nigerian and English, when he
comes up against the need to take on two nationalities,
chooses, if he wants to remain true to himself, the nega­
tion of one of these determinations. But most often, since
they cannot or will not make a choice, such intellectuals
gather together all the historical determining factors
which have conditioned them and take up a fundamen­
tally "universal standpoint."
    This is because the native intellectual has thrown him­
self greedily upon Western culture. Like adopted children
who only stop investigating the new family framework at
 the moment when a minimum nucleus of security crys­
 tallizes in their psyche, the native intellectual will try to
 make European culture his own. He will not be content


to get to know Rabelais and Diderot, Shakespeare and
Edgar Allen Poe; he will bind them to his intelligence as
closely as possible:
         La dame n'Stait pas seule
         Elle avait un mari
         Un mari tres comme il faut
         Qui citait Racine et Corneille
         Et Voltaire et Rousseau
         Et le Pere Hugo et le jeune Musset
         Et Gide et Valery
         Et tant d'autres encore.*
   But at the moment when the nationalist parties are
mobilizing the people in the name of national indepen­
dence, the native intellectual sometimes spurns these ac­
quisitions which he suddenly feels make him a stranger in
his own land. It is always easier to proclaim rejection
than actually to reject. The intellectual who through the
medium of culture has filtered into Western civilization,
who has managed to become part of the body of Euro­
pean culture—in other words who has exchanged his own
culture for another—will come to realize that the cultural
matrix, which now he wishes to assume since he is anxious
to appear original, can hardly supply any figureheads
which will bear comparison with those, so many in num­
ber and so great in prestige, of the occupying power's
civilization. History, of course, though nevertheless writ­
ten by the Westerners and to serve their purposes, will be
able to evaluate from time to time certain periods of the
African past. But, standing face to face with his country
at the present time, and observing clearly and objectively
the events of today throughout the continent which he
   * The lady was not alone; she had a most respectable husband,
who knew how to quote Racine and Comeille, Voltaire and Rous­
seau, Victor Hugo and Musset, Gide, Valery and as many more
again. (Rene Depestre: "Face a la Nuit.")


wants to make his own, the intellectual is terrified by the
void, the degradation, and the savagery he sees there. Now
he feels that he must get away from the white culture.
He must seek his culture elsewhere, anywhere at all; and
if he fails to find the substance of culture of the same
grandeur and scope as displayed by the ruling power, the
native intellectual will very often fall back upon emo­
tional attitudes and will develop a psychology which is
dominated by exceptional sensitivity and susceptibility.
This withdrawal, which is due in the first instance to a
begging of the question in his internal behavior mecha­
nism and his own character, brings out, above all, a reflex
and contradiction which is muscular.
   This is sufficient explanation of the style of those native
intellectuals who decide to give expression to this phase
of consciousness which is in the process of being liberated.
It is a harsh style, full of images, for the image is the
drawbridge which allows unconscious energies to be scat­
tered on the surrounding meadows. It is a vigorous style,
alive with rhythms, struck through and through with
bursting life; it is full of color, too, bronzed, sunbaked,
and violent. This style, which in its time astonished the
peoples of the West, has nothing racial about it, in spite
of frequent statements to the contrary; it expresses above
all a hand-to-hand struggle and it reveals the need that
man has to liberate himself from a part of his being
which already contained the seeds of decay. Whether the
fight is painful, quick, or inevitable, muscular action must
substitute itself for concepts.
   If in the world of poetry this movement reaches unac­
customed heights, the fact remains that in the real world
the intellectual often follows up a blind alley. When at
the height of his intercourse with his people, whatever
 they were or whatever they are, the intellectual decides


to come down into the common paths of real life, he only
brings back from his adventuring formulas which are
sterile in the extreme. He sets a high value on the cus­
toms, traditions, and the appearances of his people; but
his inevitable, painful experience only seems to be a banal
search for exoticism. The sari becomes sacred, and shoes
that come from Paris or Italy are left off in favor of pam-
pooties, while suddenly the language of the ruling power
is felt to burn your lips. Finding your fellow countrymen
sometimes means in this phase to will to be a nigger, not
a nigger like all other niggers but a real nigger, a Negro
 cur, just the sort of nigger that the white man wants you
 to be. Going back to your own people means to become
 a dirty wog, to go native as much as you can, to become
 unrecognizable, and to cut off those wings that before
 you had allowed to grow.
     The native intellectual decides to make an inventory of
 the bad habits drawn from the colonial world, and hastens
 to remind everyone of the good old customs of the people,
 that people which he has decided contains all truth and
 goodness. The scandalized attitude with which the settlers
 who live in the colonial territory greet this new departure
  only serves to strengthen the native's decision. When
  the colonialists, who had tasted the sweets of their vic­
  tory over these assimilated people, realize that these men
  whom they considered as saved souls are beginning to
  fall back into the ways of niggers, the whole system
  totters. Every native won over, every native who had taken
  the pledge not only marks a failure for the colonial struc­
  ture when he decides to lose himself and to go back to
   his own side, but also stands as a symbol for the useless-
   ness and the shallowness of all the work that has been
   accomplished. Each native who goes back over the line is
   a radical condemnation of the methods and of the regime;


and the native intellectual finds in the scandal he gives
rise to a justification and an encouragement to persevere
in the path he has chosen.
   If we wanted to trace in the works of native writers
the different phases which characterize this evolution we
would find spread out before us a panorama on three
levels. In the first phase, the native intellectual gives proof
that he has assimilated the culture of the occupying
power. His writings correspond point by point with those
of his opposite numbers in the mother country. His in­
spiration is European and we can easily link up these
works with definite trends in the literature of the mother
country. This is the period of unqualified assimilation.
W e find in this literature coming from the colonies the
Parnassians, the Symbolists, and the Surrealists.
   In the second phase we find the native is disturbed; he
decides to remember what he is. This period of creative
work approximately corresponds to that immersion which
we have just described. But since the native is not a part
of his people, since he only has exterior relations with
his people, he is content to recall their life only. Past hap­
penings of the byegone days of his chlidhood will be
brought up out of the depths of his memory; old legends
will be reinterpreted in the light of a borrowed estheticism
and of a conception of the world which was discovered
under other skies.
   Sometimes this literature of just-before-the-battle is
dominated by humor and by allegory; but often too it is
symptomatic of a period of distress and difficulty, where
death is experienced, and disgust too. W e spew ourselves
up; but already underneath laughter can be heard.
   Finally in the third phase, which is called the fighting
phase, the native, after having tried to lose himself in
 the people and with the people, will on the contrary
shake the people. Instead of according the people's


lethargy an honored place in his esteem, he turns himself
into an awakener of the people; hence comes a fighting
literature, a revolutionary literature, and a national litera­
ture. During this phase a great many men and women
who up till then would never have thought of producing
a literary work, now that they find themselves in excep­
tional circumstances—in prison, with the Maquis, or on
the eve of their execution—feel the need to speak to their
nation, to compose the sentence which expresses the heart
of the people, and to become the mouthpiece of a new
reality in action.
   The native intellectual nevertheless sooner or later will
realize that you do not show proof of your nation from
its culture but that you substantiate its existence in the
fight which the people wage against the forces of occupa­
tion. No colonial system draws its justification from the
fact that the territories it dominates are culturally non­
existent. You will never make colonialism blush for shame
by spreading out little-known cultural treasures under its
eyes. At the very moment when the native intellectual is
anxiously trying to create a cultural work he fails to realize
that he is utilizing techniques and language which are
borrowed from the stranger in his country. He contents
himself with stamping these instruments with a hallmark
which he wishes to be national, but which is strangely
reminiscent of exoticism. The native intellectual who
comes back to his people by way of cultural achievements
behaves in fact like a foreigner. Sometimes he has no
hesitation in using a dialect in order to show his will to
be as near as possible to the people; but the ideas that
he expresses and the preoccupations he is taken up with
have no common yardstick to measure the real situation
which the men and the women of his country know. The
culture that the intellectual leans toward is often no more
than a stock of particularisms. H e wishes to attach him-


self to the people; but instead he only catches hold of
their outer garments. And these outer garments are merely
the reflection of a hidden life, teeming and perpetually
in motion. That extremely obvious objectivity which
seems to characterize a people is in fact only the inert,
already forsaken result of frequent, and not always very
coherent, adaptations of a much more fundamental sub­
stance which itself is continually being renewed. The
man of culture, instead of setting out to find this sub­
stance, will let himself be hypnotized by these mummified
fragments which because they are static are in fact sym­
bols of negation and outworn contrivances. Culture has
never the translucidity of custom; it abhors all simplifi­
cation. In its essence it is opposed to custom, for custom
is always the deterioration of culture. The desire to at­
tach oneself to tradition or bring abandoned traditions
to life again does not only mean going against the current
of history but also opposing one's own people. When a
people undertakes an armed struggle or even a political
struggle against a relentless colonialism, the significance
of tradition changes. All that has made up the technique
of passive resistance in the past may, during this phase,
be radically condemned. In an underdeveloped country
during the period of struggle traditions are fundamentally
unstable and are shot through by centrifugal tendencies.
This is why the intellectual often runs the risk of being
out of date. The peoples who have carried on the struggle
are more and more impervious to demagogy; and those
who wish to follow them reveal themselves as nothing
more than common opportunists, in other words, late­
comers.
   In the sphere of plastic arts, for example, the native
artist who wishes at whatever cost to create a national
work of art shuts himself up in a stereotyped reproduc­
tion of details. These artists who have nevertheless


thoroughly studied modern techniques and who have
taken part in the main trends of contemporary painting
and architecture, turn their backs on foreign culture, deny
it, and set out to look for a true national culture, setting
great store on what they consider to be the constant prin­
ciples of national art. But these people forget that the
forms of thought and what it feeds on, together with
modern techniques of information, language, and dress
have dialectically reorganized the people's intelligences
and that the constant principles which acted as safeguards
during the colonial period are now undergoing extremely
radical changes.
   The artist who has decided to illustrate the truths of
the nation turns paradoxically toward the past and away
from actual events. W h a t he ultimately intends to em­
brace are in fact the castoffs of thought, its shells and
corpses, a knowledge which has been stabilized once and
for all. But the native intellectual who wishes to create
an authentic work of art must realize that the truths of
a nation are in the first place its realities. He must go on
until he has found the seething pot out of which the
learning of the future will emerge.
   Before independence, the native painter was insensible
to the national scene. He set a high value on non-figura­
tive art, or more often specialized in still lifes. After
independence his anxiety to rejoin his people will confine
him to the most detailed representation of reality. This
is representative art which has no internal rhythms, an
art which is serene and immobile, evocative not of life
but of death. Enlightened circles are in ecstasies when
confronted with this "inner truth" which is so well ex­
pressed; but we have the right to ask if this truth is in
fact a reality, and if it is not already outworn and denied,
called in question by the epoch through which the people
are treading out their path toward history.


   In the realm of poetry we may establish the same facts.
After the period of assimilation characterized by rhyming
poetry, the poetic tom-tom's rhythms break through. This
is a poetry of revolt; but it is also descriptive and analyti­
cal poetry. The poet ought however to understand that
nothing can replace the reasoned, irrevocable taking up
of arms on the people's side. Let us quote Depestre once
more:

  The lady was not alone;
  She had a husband,
  A husband who knew everything,
  But to tell the truth knew nothing,
  For you can't have culture without making concessions.
  You concede your flesh and blood to it,
  You concede your own self to others;
  By conceding you gain
  Classicism and Romanticism,
  And all that our souls are steeped in.*
   The native poet who is preoccupied with creating a
national work of art and who is determined to describe
his people fails in his aim, for he is not yet ready to make
that fundamental concession that Depestre speaks of. The
French poet Rene Char shows his understanding of the
difficulty when he reminds us that "the poem emerges
out of a subjective imposition and an objective choice. A
poem is the assembling and moving together of determin­
ing original values, in contemporary relation with some­
one that these circumstances bring to the front."t
   Yes, the first duty of the native poet is to see clearly
the people he has chosen as the subject of his work of art.
He cannot go forward resolutely unless he first realizes
the extent of his estrangement from them. W e have

  * Rend Depestre: "Face a la Nuit."
  f Rene Char, Partage Formel.


taken everything from the other side; and the other side
gives us nothing unless by a thousand detours we swing
finally round in their direction, unless by ten thousand
wiles and a hundred thousand tricks they manage to draw
us toward them, to seduce us, and to imprison us. Taking
means in nearly every case being taken: thus it is not
enough to try to free oneself by repeating proclamations
and denials. It is not enough to try to get back to the
people in that past out of which they have already
emerged; rather we must join them in that fluctuating
movement which they are just giving a shape to, and
which, as soon as it has started, will be the signal for
everything to be called in question. Let there be no mis­
take about it; it is to this zone of occult instability where
the people dwell that we must come; and it is there that
our souls are crystallized and that our perceptions and our
lives are transfused with light.
   Keita Fodeba, today Minister of Internal Affairs in the
Republic of Guinea, when he was the director of the
 "African Ballet" did not play any tricks with the reality
which the people of Guinea offered him. He reinterpreted
all the rhythmic images of his country from a revolution­
ary standpoint. But he did more. In his poetic works,
 which are not well known, we find a constant desire to
define accurately the historic moments of the struggle
 and to mark off the field in which were to be unfolded
 the actions and ideas around which the popular will
 would crystallize. Here is a poem by Keita Fodeba which
 is a true invitation to thought, to de-mystification, and
 to battle:

                       AFRICAN DAWN

(Guitar music)
   Dawn was breaking. The little village, which had danced
half the night to the sound of its tom-toms, was waking


slowly. Ragged shepherds playing their flutes were leading
their flocks down into the valley. The girls of the village with
their canaries followed one by one along the winding path
that leads to the fountain. In the marabout's courtyard a
group of children were softly chanting in chorus some verses
from the Koran.
(Guitar music)
   Dawn was breaking—dawn, the fight between night and
day. But the night was exhausted and could fight no more,
and slowly died. A few rays of the sun, the forerunners of this
victory of the day, still hovered on the horizon, pale and
timid, while the last stars gently glided under the mass of
clouds, crimson like the blooming flamboyant flowers.
(Guitar music)
   Dawn was breaking. And down at the end of the vast plain
with its purple contours, the silhouette of a bent man tilling
the ground could be seen, the silhouette of Naman the labor­
er. Each time he lifted his hoe the frightened birds rose, and
flew swiftly away to find the quiet banks of the Djoliba, the
great Niger river. The man's gray cotton trousers, soaked by
the dew, flapped against the grass on either side. Sweating,
unresting, always bent over he worked with his hoe; for the
seed had to be sown before the next rains came.
(Cora music)
   Dawn was breaking, still breaking. The sparrows circled
amongst the leaves announcing the day. On the damp track
leading to the plain a child, carrying his little quiver of arrows
round him like a bandolier, was running breathless toward
Naman. He called out: "Brother Naman, the headman of the
village wants you to come to the council tree."
(Cora music)
  The laborer, surprised by such a message so early in the
morning, laid down his hoe and walked toward the village
which now was shining in the beams of the rising sun. Al-
readv t^e old men of the village were sitting under the tree,
looking more solemn than ever. Beside them a man in uni-


form, a district guard, sat impassively, quietly smoking his
pipe.
(Cora music)
  Naman took his place on the sheepskin. The headman's
spokesman stood up to announce to the assembly the will of
the old men: "The white men have sent a district guard to
ask for a man from the village who will go to the war in their
country. The chief men, after taking counsel together, have
decided to send the young man who is the best representative
of our race, so that he may go and give proof to the white
men of that courage which has always been a feature of our
Manding."
(Guitar music)
  Naman was thus officially marked out, for every evening
the village girls praised his great stature and muscular appear­
ance in musical couplets. Gentle Kadia, his young wife, over­
whelmed by the news, suddenly ceased grinding corn, put the
mortar away under the barn, and without saying a word shut
herself into her hut to weep over her misfortune with stifled
sobs. For death had taken her first husband; and she could
not believe that now the white people had taken Naman from
her, Naman who was the center of all her new-sprung hopes.
(Guitar music)
  The next day, in spite of her tears and lamentations, the
full-toned drumming of the war tom-toms accompanied Na­
man to the village's little harbor where he boarded a trawler
which was going to the district capital. That night, instead of
dancing in the marketplace as they usually did, the village
girls came to keep watch in Naman's outer room, and there
told their tales until morning around a wood fire.
(Guitar music)
   Several months went by without any news of Naman reach­
ing the village. Kadia was so worried that she went to the
cunning fetish-worker from the neighboring village. The vil­
lage elders themselves held a short secret council on the mat­
ter, but nothing came of it.


(Cora music)
   At last one day a letter from Naman came to the village,
to Kadia's address. She was worried as to what was happening
to her husband, and so that same night she came, after hours
of tiring walking, to the capital of the district, where a transla­
tor read the letter to her.
   Naman was in North Africa; Tie was well, and he asked for
news of the harvest, of the feastings, the river, the dances,
the council tree . . . in fact, for news of all the village.
(Balafo music)
  That night the old women of the village honored Kadia
by allowing her to come to the courtyard of the oldest woman
and listen to the talk that went on nightly among them. The
headman of the village, happy to have heard news of Naman,
gave a great banquet to all the beggars of the neighborhood.
(Balafo music)
   Again several months went by and everyone was once more
anxious, for nothing more was heard of Naman. Kadia was
thinking of going again to consult the fetish-worker when she
received a second letter. Naman, after passing through Corsica
and Italy, was now in Germany and was proud of having
been decorated.
(Balafo music)
  But the next time there was only a postcard to say that
Naman had been made prisoner by the Germans. This news
weighed heavily on the village. The old men held council and
decided that henceforward Naman would be allowed to dance
the Douga, that sacred dance of the vultures that no one who
has not performed some outstanding feat is allowed to dance,
that dance of the Mali emperors of which every step is a stage
in the history of the Mali race. Kadia found consolation in
the fact that her husband had been raised to the dignity of a
hero of his country.
(Guitar music)
   Time went by. A year followed another, and Naman was
still in Germany. He did not write any more.


(Guitar music)
    One fine day, the village headman received word from
Dakar that Naman would soon be home. The mutter of the
tom-toms was at once heard. There was dancing and singing
till dawn. The village girls composed new songs for his home­
coming, for the old men who were the devotees of the Douga
spoke no more about that famous dance of the Manding.
(Tom-toms)
  But a month later, Corporal Moussa, a great friend of
Naman's, wrote a tragic letter to Kadia: "Dawn was breaking.
We were at Tiaroye-sur-Mer. In the course of a widespread
dispute between us and our white officers from Dakar, a
bullet struck Naman. He lies in the land of Senegal."
(Guitar music)
   Yes; dawn was breaking. The first rays of the sun hardly
touched the surface of the sea as they gilded its little foam-
flecked waves. Stirred by the breeze, the palm trees gently
bent their trunks down toward the ocean, as if saddened by
the morning's battle. The crows came in noisy flocks to warn
the neighborhood by their cawing of the tragedy that was
staining the dawn at Tiaroye with blood. And in the flaming
blue sky, just above Naman's body, a huge vulture was hover­
ing heavily. It seemed to say to him "Naman! You have not
danced that dance that is named after me. Others will
dance it."
(Cora music)
   If I have chosen to quote this long poem, it is on ac­
count of its unquestioned pedagogical value. Here, things
are clear; it is a precise, forward-looking exposition. The
understanding of the poem is not merely an intellectual
advance, but a political advance. To understand this
poem is to understand the part one has played, to recog­
nize one's advance, and to furbish up one's weapons.
There is not a single colonized person who will not re­
ceive the message that this poem holds. Naman, the hero


 of the battlefields of Europe, Naman who eternally en­
sures the power and perenniality of the mother country,
Naman is machine-gunned by the police force at the very
moment that he comes back to the country of his birth:
and this is S£tif in 1945, this is Fort-le-France, this is Sai­
gon, Dakar, and Lagos. All those niggers, all those wogs
who fought to defend the liberty of France or for British
civilization recognize themselves in this poem by Keita
Fodeba.
   But Keita Fodeba sees further. In colonized countries,
colonialism, after having made use of the natives on the
battlefields, uses them as trained soldiers to put down the
movements of independence. The ex-service associations
are in the colonies one of the most anti-nationalist ele­
ments which exist The poet Keita Fodeba was training
the Minister of Internal Affairs of the Republic of Gui­
nea to frustrate the plots organized by French colonial­
ism. The French secret service intend to use, among
other means, the ex-servicemen to break up the young
independent Guinean state.
   The colonized man who writes for his people ought to
use the past with the intention of opening the future, as
an invitation to action and a basis for hope. But to ensure
that hope and to give it form, he must take part in action
and throw himself body and soul into the national
struggle. You may speak about everything under the sun;
but when you decide to speak of that unique thing in
man's life that is represented by the fact of opening up
new horizons, by bringing light to your own country, and by
raising yourself and your people to their feet, then you
must collaborate on the physical plane.
   The responsibility of the native man of culture is not a
responsibility vis-a-vis his national culture, but a global
responsibility with regard to the totality of the nation,


whose culture merely, after all, represents one aspect of
that nation. The cultured native should not concern him­
self with choosing the level on which he wishes to fight or
the sector where he decides to give battle for his nation.
To fight for national culture means in the first place to
fight for the liberation of the nation, that material key­
stone which makes the building of a culture possible.
There is no other fight for culture which can develop
apart from the popular struggle. To take an example: all
those men and women who are fighting with their bare
hands against French colonialism in Algeria are not by
any means strangers to the national culture of Algeria. The
national Algerian culture is taking on form and content
as the battles are being fought out, in prisons, under the
guillotine, and in every French outpost which is captured
or destroyed.
    We must not therefore be content with delving into the
past of a people in order to find coherent elements which
will counteract colonialism's attempts to falsify and harm.
We must work and fight with the same rhythm as the
people to construct the future and to prepare the ground
where vigorous shoots are already springing up. A national
culture is not a folklore, nor an abstract populism that
believes it can discover the people's true nature. It is not
made up of the inert dregs of gratuitous actions, that is to
say actions which are less and less attached to the ever-
present reality of the people. A national culture is the
whole body of efforts made by a people in the sphere of
thought to describe, justify, and praise the action through
which that people has created itself and keeps itself in
existence. A national culture in underdeveloped countries
should therefore take its place at the very heart of the
 struggle for freedom which these countries are carrying on.
Men of African cultures who are still fighting in the name


of African-Negro culture and who have called many con­
gresses in the name of the unity of that culture should
today realize that all their efforts amount to is to make
comparisons between coins and sarcophagi.
   There is no common destiny to be shared between the
national cultures of Senegal and Guinea; but there is a
common destinv between the Senegalese and Guinean na­
tions which are both dominated by the same French co­
lonialism. If it is wished that the national culture of
Senegal should come to resemble the national culture of
Guinea, it is not enough for the rulers of the two peoples
to decide to consider their problems—whether the prob­
lem of liberation is concerned, or the trade-union question,
or economic difficulties—from similar viewpoints. And
even here there does not seem to be complete identity, for
the rhythm of the people and that of their rulers are not
the same. There can be no two cultures which are com­
pletely identical. To believe that it is possible to create ?
black culture is to forget that niggers are disappearing,
just as those people who brought them into being are see­
ing the breakup of their economic and cultural suprem­
acy.* There will never be such a thing as black culture be­
cause there is not a single politician who feels he has a
vocation to bring black republics into being. The problem
is to get to know the place that these men mean to give
their people, the kind of social relations that they decide
to set up, and the conception that they have of the future

   * At the last school prize giving in Dakar, the president of the
Senegalese Republic, Leopold Senghor, decided to include the study
of the idea of ncgriludc in the curriculum. If this decision was due
to a desire to stndv historical causes, no one can criticize it. But if
on the other hand it was taken in order to create black self-consious-
ness, it is simply a turning of his back upon history which has al­
ready taken cognizance of the disappearance of the majority of
Negroes.


of humanity. It is this that counts; everything else is
mystification, signifying nothing.
   In 1959, the cultured Africans who met at Rome never
stopped talking about unity. But one of the people who
was loudest in the praise of this cultural unity, Jacques
Rabemananjara, is today a minister in the Madagascan
government, and as such has decided, with his govern­
ment, to oppose the Algerian people in the General As­
sembly of the United Nations. Rabemananjara, if he had
been true to himself, ought to have resigned from the
government and denounced those men who claim to in­
carnate the will of the Madagascan people. The ninety
thousand dead of Madagascar have not given Rabema­
nanjara authority to oppose the aspirations of the Algerian
people in the General Assembly of the United Nations.
    It is around the peoples' struggles that African-Negro
 culture takes on substance, and not around songs, poems,
 or folklore. Senghor, who is also a member of the Society
 of African Culture and who has worked with us on the
 question of African culture, is not afraid for his part either
 to give the order to his delegation to support French pro­
 posals on Algeria. Adherence to African-Negro culture and
 to the cultural unity of Africa is arrived at in the first place
 by upholding unconditionally the peoples' struggle for
 freedom. No one can truly wish for the spread of African
 culture if he does not give practical support to the creation
 of the conditions necessary to the existence of that culture;
  in other words, to the liberation of the whole continent.
     I say again that no speech-making and no proclamation
  concerning culture will turn us from our fundamental
  tasks: the liberation of the national territory; a continual
  struggle against colonialism in its new forms; and an ob­
  stinate refusal to enter the charmed circle of mutual ad­
   miration at the summit.




         RECIPROCAL BASES OF NATIONAL CULTURE
               AND THE FIGHT FOR FREEDOM

   Colonial domination, because it is total and tends to
oversimplify, very soon manages to disrupt in spectacular
fashion the cultural life of a conquered people. This cul­
tural obliteration is made possible by the negation of
national reality, by new legal relations introduced by the
occupying power, by the banishment of the natives and
their customs to outlying districts by colonial society, by
expropriation, and by the systematic enslaving of men and
women.
   Three years ago at our first congress I showed that, in
the colonial situation, dynamism is replaced fairly quickly
by a substantification of the attitudes of the colonizing
power. The area of culture is then marked off by fences
and signposts. These are in fact so many defense mecha­
nisms of the most elementary type, comparable for more
than one good reason to the simple instinct for preserva­
tion. The interest of this period for us is that the oppres­
sor does not manage to convince himself of the objective
non-existence of the oppressed nation and its culture.
Every effort is made to bring the colonized person to admit
the inferiority of his culture which has been transformed
into instinctive patterns of behavior, to recognize the un­
reality of his "nation," and, in the the last extreme, the
confused and imperfect character of his own biological
structure.
   Vis-a-vis this state of affairs, the native's reactions are
not unanimous. While the mass of the people maintain
intact traditions which are completely different from those
of the colonial situation, and the artisanal style solidifies
into a formalism which is more and more stereotyped, the


intellectual throws himself in frenzied fashion into the
frantic acquisition of the culture of the occupying power
and takes every opportunity of unfavorably criticizing his
own national culture, or else takes refuge in setting out
and substantiating the claims of that culture in a way that
is passionate but rapidly becomes unproductive.
   The common nature of these two reactions lies in the
fact that they both lead to impossible contradictions.
Whether a turncoat or a substantialist, the native is in­
effectual precisely because the analysis of the colonial
situation is not carried out on strict lines. The colonial
situation calls a halt to national culture in almost every
field. Within the framework of colonial domination there
is not and there will never be such phenomena as new
cultural departures or changes in the national culture.
Here and there valiant attempts are sometimes made to
reanimate the cultural dynamic and to give fresh impulses
to its themes, its forms, and its tonalities. The immediate,
palpable, and obvious interest of such leaps ahead is nil.
But if we follow up the consequences to the very end we
see that preparations are being thus made to brush the
cobwebs off national consciousness, to question oppression,
and to open up the struggle for freedom.
    A national culture under colonial domination is a con­
tested culture whose destruction is sought in systematic
fashion. It very quickly becomes a culture condemned to
secrecy. This idea of a clandestine culture is immediately
seen in the reactions of the occupying power which in­
terprets attachment to traditions as faithfulness to the
spirit of the nation and as a refusal to submit. This per­
 sistence in following forms of cultures which are already
 condemned to extinction is already a demonstration of
 nationality; but it is a demonstration which is a throwback
 to the laws of inertia. There is no taking of the offensive


and no redefining of relationships. There is simply a con­
centration on a hard core of culture which is becoming
more and more shrivelled up, inert, and empty.
   By the time a century or two of exploitation has passed
there comes about a veritable emaciation of the stock of
national culture. It becomes a set of automatic habits,
some traditions of dress, and a few broken-down institu­
tions. Little movement can be discerned in such remnants
of culture; there is no real creativity and no overflowing
life. The poverty of the people, national oppression, and
the inhibition of culture are one and the same thing. After
a century of colonial domination we find a culture which
is rigid in the extreme, or rather what we find are the
dregs of culture, its mineral strata. The withering away of
the reality of the nation and the death pangs of the na­
tional culture are linked to each other in mutual depend­
ence. This is why it is of capital importance to follow the
evolution of these relations during the struggle for national
freedom. The negation of the native's culture, the con­
tempt for any manifestation of culture whether active or
emotional, and the placing outside the pale of all special­
ized branches of organization contribute to breed aggres­
sive patterns of conduct in the native. But these patterns
of conduct are of the reflexive type; they are poorly differ­
entiated, anarchic, and ineffective. Colonial exploitation,
poverty, and endemic famine drive the native more and
more to open, organized revolt. The necessity for an open
and decisive breach is formed progressively and. imper­
ceptibly, and comes to be felt by the great majority of the
people. Those tensions which hitherto were non-existent
come into being. International events, the collapse of
whole sections of colonial empires and the contradictions
inherent in the colonial system strengthen and uphold the
native's combativity while promoting and giving support to
national consciousness.


    These new-found tensions which are present at all stages
in the real nature of colonialism have their repercussions
on the cultural plane. In literature, for example, there is
relative overproduction. From being a reply on a minor
scale to the dominating power, the literature produced by
natives becomes differentiated and makes itself into a will
to particularism. The intelligentsia, which during the
period of repression was essentially a consuming public,
now themselves become producers. This literature at first
chooses to confine itself to the tragic and poetic style; but
later on novels, short stories, and essays are attempted. It
is as if a kind of internal organization or law of expression
existed which wills that poetic expression become less
frequent in proportion as the objectives and the methods
of the struggle for liberation become more precise. Themes
are completely altered; in fact, we find less and less of bit­
ter, hopeless recrimination and less also of that violent,
resounding, florid writing which on the whole serves to
reassure the occupying power. The colonialists have in
former times encouraged these modes of expression and
made their existence possible. Stinging denunciations, the
exposing of distressing conditions and passions which find
 their outlet in expression are in fact assimilated by the
 occupying power in a cathartic process. To aid such proc­
 esses is in a certain sense to avoid their dramatization and
 to clear the atmosphere.
    But such a situation can only be transitory. In fact, the
 progress of national consciousness among the people modi­
 fies and gives precision to the literary utterances of the
 native intellectual. The continued cohesion of the people
 constitutes for the intellectual an invitation to go further
  than his cry of protest. The lament first makes the indict­
  ment; and then it makes an appeal. In the period that
  follows, the words of command are heard. The crystalliza­
  tion of the national consciousness will both disrupt literary


styles and themes, and also create a completely new public.
While at the beginning the native intellectual used to pro­
duce his work to be read exclusively by the oppressor,
whether with the intention of charming him or of de­
nouncing him through ethnic or subjectivist means, now
the native writer progressively takes on the habit of ad­
dressing his own people.
   It is only from that moment that we can speak of a na­
tional literature. Here there is, at the level of literary crea­
tion, the taking up and clarification of themes which are
typically nationalist. This may be properly called a litera­
ture of combat, in the sense that it calls on the whole
people to fight for their existence as a nation. It is a
literature of combat, because it molds the national con­
sciousness, giving it form and contours and flinging open
before it new and boundless horizons; it is a literature of
combat because it assumes responsibility, and because it is
the will to liberty expressed in terms of time and space.
   On another level, the oral tradition—stories, epics, and
songs of the people—which formerly were filed away as
set pieces are now beginning to change. The storytellers
who used to relate inert episodes now bring them alive
and introduce into them modifications which are in­
creasingly fundamental. There is a tendency to bring
conflicts up to date and to modernize the kinds of struggle
which the stories evoke, together with the names of heroes
and the types of weapons. The method of allusion is more
and more widely used. The formula "This all happened
long ago" is substituted with that of "What we are going
to speak of happened somewhere else, but it might well
have happened here today, and it might happen tomor­
row." The example of Algeria is significant in this context.
From 1952-53 on, the storytellers, who were before that
time stereotyped and tedious to listen to, completely over­
turned their traditional methods of storytelling and the


contents of their tales. Their public, which was formerly
scattered, became compact. The epic, with its typified cate­
gories, reappeared; it became an authentic form of enter­
tainment which took on once more a cultural value. Colo­
nialism made no mistake when from 1955 on it pro­
ceeded to arrest these storytellers systematically.
   The contact of the people with the new movement gives
rise to a new rhythm of life and to forgotten muscular
tensions, and develops the imagination. Every time the
storyteller relates a fresh episode to his public, he presides
over a real invocation. The existence of a new type of man
is revealed to the public. The present is no longer turned
in upon itself but spread out for all to see. The storyteller
once more gives free rein to his imagination; he makes in­
novations and he creates a work of art. It even happens
that the characters, which are barely ready for such a
transformation—highway robbers or more or less anti­
social vagabonds—are taken up and remodeled. The
emergence of the imagination and of the creative urge in
the songs and epic stories of a colonized country is worth
following. The storyteller replies to the expectant people
by successive approximations, and makes his way, ap­
parently alone but in fact helped on by his public, toward
the seeking out of new patterns, that is to say national
patterns. Comedy and farce disappear, or lose their attrac­
tion. As for dramatization, it is no longer placed on the
plane of the troubled intellectual and his tormented con­
science. By losing its characteristics of despair and revolt,
 the drama becomes part of the common lot of the people
 and forms part of an action in preparation or already in
progress.
    Where handicrafts are concerned, the forms of expres­
 sion which formerly were the dregs of art, surviving as if in
 a daze, now begin to reach out. Woodwork, for example,
 which formerly turned out certain faces and attitudes by


the million, begins to be differentiated. The inexpressive
or overwrought mask comes to life and the arms tend to be
raised from the body as if to sketch an action. Composi­
tions containing two, three, or five figures appear. The
traditional schools are led on to creative efforts by the ris­
ing avalanche of amateurs or of critics. This new vigor in
this sector of cultural life very often passes unseen; and
yet its contribution to the national effort is of capital im­
portance. By carving figures and faces which are full of
life, and bv taking as his theme a group fixed on the same
pedestal, the artist invites participation in an organized
movement.
   If we study the repercussions of the awakening of na­
tional consciousness in the domains of ceramics and pot­
tery-making, the same observations may be drawn. Formal­
ism is abandoned in the craftsman's work. Jugs, jars, and
trays are modified, at first imperceptibly, then almost
savage'y. The colors, of which formerly there were but
few and which obeyed the traditional rules of harmony,
increase in number and are influenced by the repercussion
of the rising revolution. Certain ochres and blues, which
seemed fn-b-'dden to all eternity in a given cultural area,
now assert themselves without giving rise to scandal. In
the same way the s ylization of the human face, which
according to sociologists is typical of very clearly defined
regions, becomes suddenly completely relative. The special­
ist coming from the home country and the ethnologist are
quick to note these changes. On the whole such changes
are condemned in the name of a rigid code of artistic style
and of a cultural life which grows up at the heart of the
colonial system. The colonialist specialists do not recog­
nize : hese new forms and rush to the help of the traditions
of the indigenous society. It is the colonialists who become
 the defenders of the native style. W e remember perfectly,
and the example took on a certain measure of importance


since the real nature of colonialism was not involved, the
reactions of the white jazz specialists when after the
Second World War new styles such as the be-bop took
definite shape. The fact is that in their eyes jazz should
only be the despairing, broken-down nostalgia of an old
Negro who is trapped between five glasses of whiskey, the
curse of his race, and the racial hatred of the white men.
As soon as the Negro comes to an understanding of him­
self, and understands the rest of the world differently,
when he gives birth to hope and forces back the racist uni­
verse, it is clear that his trumpet sounds more clearly and
his voice less hoarsely. The new fashions in jazz are not
simply born of economic competition. We must without
any doubt see in them one of the consequences of the
defeat, slow but sure, of the southern world of the United
 States. And it is not Utopian to suppose that in fifty years'
 time the type of jazz howl hiccuped by a poor misfortu-
 nate Negro will be upheld only by the whites who believe
 in it as an expression of negritude, and who are faithful
 to this arrested image of a type of relationship.
    We might in the same way seek and find in dancing,
 singing, and traditional rites and ceremonies the same up­
 ward-springing trend, and make out the same changes and
 the same impatience in this field. Well before the political
 or fighting phase of the national movement, an attentive
 spectator can thus feel and see the manifestation of new
 vigor and feel the approaching conflict. He will note un­
 usual forms of expression and themes which are fresh
 and imbued with a power which is no longer that of in­
 vocation but rather of the assembling of the people, a
  summoning together for a precise purpose. Everything
 works together to awaken the native's sensibility and to
  to make unreal and inacceptable the contemplative atti­
  tude, or the acceptance of defeat. The native rebuilds his
  perceptions because he renews the purpose and dynamism


of the craftsmen, of dancing and music, and of literature
and the oral tradition. His world comes to lose its ac­
cursed character. The conditions necessary for the in­
evitable conflict are brought together.
   We have noted the appearance of the movement in
cultural forms and we have seen that this movement and
these new forms are linked to the state of maturity of the
national consciousness. Now, this movement tends more
and more to express itself objectively, in institutions. From
thence comes the need for a national existence, whatever
the cost.
   A frequent mistake, and one which is moreover hardly
justifiable, is to try to find cultural expressions for and to
give new values to native culture within the framework of
colonial domination. This is why we arrive at a proposi­
tion which at first sight seems paradoxical: the fact that
in a colonized country the most elementary, most savage,
and the most undifferentiated nationalism is the most
fervent and efficient means of defending national culture.
For culture is first the expression of a nation, the expres­
sion of its preferences, of its taboos and of its patterns. It
is at every stage of the whole of society that other taboos,
values, and patterns are formed. A national culture is the
sum total of all these appraisals; it is the result of internal
and external tensions exerted over society as a whole and
also at every level of that society. In the colonial situation,
culture, which is doubly deprived of the support of the
nation and of the state, falls away and dies. The condition
for its existence is therefore national liberation and the
renaissance of the state.
   The nation is not only the condition of culture, its
fruitfulness, its continuous renewal, and its deepening. It
is also a necessity. It is the fight for national existence
which sets culture moving and opens to it the doors of
creation. Later on it is the nation which will ensure the


conditions and framework necessary to culture. The na­
tion gathers together the various indispensable elements
necessary for the creation of a culture, those elements
which alone can give it credibility, validity, life, and crea­
tive power. In the same way it is its national character
that will make such a culture open to other cultures and
which will enable it to influence and permeate other cul­
tures. A non-existent culture can hardly be expected to
have bearing on reality, or to influence reality. The first
necessity is the re-establishment of the nation in order to
give life to national culture in the strictly biological sense
of the phrase.
    Thus we have followed the breakup of the old strata of
culture, a shattering which becomes increasingly funda­
mental; and we have noticed, on the eve of the decisive
conflict for national freedom, the renewing of forms of
expression and the rebirth of the imagination. There re­
mains one essential question: what are the relations be­
tween the struggle—whether political or military—and
culture? Is there a suspension of culture during the con­
flict? Is the national struggle an expression of a culture?
Finally, ought one to say that the battle for freedom
however fertile a posteriori with regard to culture is in
itself a negation of culture? In short, is the struggle for
liberation a cultural phenomenon or not?
    W e believe that the conscious and organized undertak­
ing by a colonized people to re-establish the sovereignty
of that nation constitutes the most complete and obvious
cultural manifestation that exists. It is not alone the suc­
cess of the struggle which afterward gives validity and
vigor to culture; culture is not put into cold storage during
the conflict. The struggle itself in its development and in
 its internal progression sends culture along different paths
 and traces out entirely new ones for it. The struggle for
 freedom does not give back to the national culture its


former value and shapes; this struggle which aims at a
fundamentally different set of relations between men
cannot leave intact either the form or the content of the
people's culture. After the conflict there is not only the
disappearance of colonialism but also the disappearance of
the colonized man.
   This new humanity cannot do otherwise than define a
new humanism both for itself and for others. It is pre­
figured in the objectives and methods of the conflict. A
struggle which mobilizes all classes of the people and
which expresses their aims and their impatience, which is
not afraid to count almost exclusively on the people's sup­
port, will of necessity triumph. The value of this type of
conflict is that it supplies the maximum of conditions
necessary for the development and aims of culture. After
national freedom has been obtained in these conditions,
there is no such painful cultural indecision which is found
in certain countries which are newly independent, be­
cause the nation by its manner of coming into being and
in the terms of its existence exerts a fundamental influence
over culture. A nation which is born of the people's con­
certed action and which embodies the real aspirations of
the people while changing the state cannot exist save in
the expression of exceptionally rich forms of culture.
   The natives who are anxious for the culture of their
country rnd who wish to give to it a universal dimension
ought not therefore to place their confidence in the single
principle of inevitable, undifferentiated independence writ­
ten into the consciousness of the people in order to
achieve their task. The liberation of the nation is one
thing; the methods and popular content of the fight are
another. It seems to us that the future of national culture
and its riches are equally also part and parcel of the values
which have ordained the struggle for freedom.
   And now it is time to denounce certain pharisees. Na-


tional claims, it is here and there stated, are a phase that
humanity has left behind. It is the day of great concerted
actions, and retarded nationalists ought in consequence to
set their mistakes aright. W e however consider that the
mistake, which may have very serious consequences, lies in
wishing to skip the national period. If culture is the ex­
pression of national consciousness, I will not hesitate to
affirm that in the case with which we are dealing it is the
national consciousness which is the most elaborate form of
culture.
   The consciousness of self is not the closing of a door to
communication. Philosophic thought teaches us, on the
contrary, that it is its guarantee. National consciousness,
which is not nationalism, is the only thing that will give
us an international dimension. This problem of national
consciousness and of national culture takes on in Africa a
special dimension. The birth of national consciousness in
Africa has a strictly contemporaneous connection with the
African consciousness. The responsibility of the African as
regards national culture is also a responsibility with regard
to African Negro culture. This joint responsibility is not
the fact of a metaphysical principle but the awareness of
a simple rule which wills that every independent nation in
an Africa where colonialism is still entrenched is an en­
 circled nation, a nation which is fragile and in permanent
 danger.
    If man is known by his acts, then we will say that the
 most urgent thing today for the intellectual is to build up
 his nation. If this building up is true, that is to say if it
 interprets the manifest will of the people and reveals the
 eager African peoples, then the building of a nation is of
 necessity accompanied by the discovery and encouragement
 of universalizing values. Far from keeping aloof from other
 nations, therefore, it is national liberation which leads the
 nation to play its part on the stage of history. It is at the


heart of national consciousness that international con­
sciousness lives and grows. And this two-fold emerging is
ultimately only the source of all culture.
                Statement made at the Second Congress
                of Black Artists and Writers, Rome, 1959
               COLONIAL WAR
          AND MENTAL DISORDERS


But the war goes on; and we will have to bind up for
years to come the many, sometimes ineffaceable, wounds
that the colonialist onslaught has inflicted on our people.
   That imperialism which today is fighting against a true
liberation of mankind leaves in its wake here and there
tinctures of decay which we must search out and merci­
lessly expel from our land and our spirits.
   We shall deal here with the problem of mental disorders
which arise from the war of national liberation which the
Algerian people are carrying on.
   Perhaps these notes on psychiatry will be found ill-
timed and singularly out of place in such a book; but we
can do nothing about that.
   We cannot be held responsible that in this war psychia­
tric phenomena entailing disorders affecting behavior and
thought have taken on importance where those who carry
out the "pacification" are concerned, or that these same
disorders are notable among the "pacified" population.
The truth- is that colonialism in its essence was already
taking on the aspect of a fertile purveyor for psychiatric
hospitals. We have since 1954 in various scientific works
drawn the attention of both French and international psy-
                           


chiatrists to the difficulties that arise when seeking to
"cure" a native properly, that is to say, when seeking to
make him thoroughly a part of a social background of the
colonial type.
   Because it is a systematic negation of the other person
and a furious determination to deny the other person all
attributes of humanity, colonialism forces the people it
dominates to ask themselves the question constantly: "In
reality, who am I?"
   The defensive attitudes created by this violent bringing
together of the colonized man and the colonial system
form themselves into a structure which then reveals the
colonized personality. This "sensitivity" is easily under­
stood if we simplv study and are alive to the number and
depth of the injuries inflicted upon a native during a single
day spent amidst the colonial regime. It must in any case
be remembered that a colonized people is not only simply
a dominated people. Under the German occupation the
French remained men; under the French occupation, the
Germans remained men. In Algeria there is not simply the
domination but the decision to the letter not to occupy
anything more than the sum total of the land. The Al­
gerians, the veiled women, the palm trees and the camels
make up the landscape, the natural background to the
human presence of the French.
   Hostile nature, obstinate and fundamentally rebellious,
is in fact represented in the colonies by the bush, by mos­
quitoes, natives, and fever, and colonization is a success
when all this indocile nature has finally been tamed. Rail­
ways across the bush, the draining of swamps and a native
population which is non-existent politically and economi­
cally are in fact one and the same thing.
   In the period of colonization when it is not contested
by armed resistance, when the sum total of harmful nerv­
ous stimuli overstep a certain threshold, the defensive atti-


 tudes of the natives give way and they then find them­
 selves crowding the mental hospitals. There is thus during
 this calm period of successful colonization a regular and
 important mental pathology which is the direct product of
 oppression.
    Today the war of national liberation which has been
 carried on by the Algerian people for the last seven years
 has become a favorable breeding ground for mental dis­
 orders, because so far as the Algerians are concerned it is a
 total war. We shall mention here some Algerian cases
 which have been attended by us and who seem to us to
 be particularly eloquent. We need hardly say that we are
 not concerned with producing a scientific work. We avoid
 all arguments over semiology, nosology, or therapeutics.
 The few technical terms used serve merely as references.
 We must, however, insist on two points. Firstly, as a gen­
 eral rule, clinical psychiatry classifies the different dis­
 turbances shown by our patients under the heading
"reactionary psychoses." In doing this, prominence is given
to the event which has given rise to the disorder, although
in some cases mention is made of the previous history of
the case (the psychological, affective, and biological con­
dition of the patient) and of the type of background from
whence he comes. It seems to us that in the cases here
chosen the events giving rise to the disorder are chiefly the
bloodthirsty and pitiless atmosphere, the generalization of
inhuman practices, and the firm impression that people
have of being caught up in a veritable Apocalypse.*

    * In the unpublished introduction to the first two editions of Van
V de la Revolution Algerienne, we have already pointed out that a
whole generation of Algerians, steeped in wanton, generalized homi­
cide with all the psycho-affective consequences that this entails, will
be the human legacy of France in Algeria. Frenchmen who condemn
the torture in Algeria constantly adopt a point of view which is
strictly French. We do not reproach them for this; we merely point
it out: they wish to protect the consciences of the actual torturers


   Case No. 2 of Series A is a typical reactionary psychosis,
but Case Nos. 1, 2, 4, and 5 of Series B give evidence of a
much more widely spread causality although we cannot
really speak of one particular event giving rise to the
disorders. These are reactionary psychoses, if we want to
use a ready-made label; but here we must give particular
priority to the war: a war which in whole and in part is a
colonial war. After the two great world wars, there is no
lack of publications on the mental pathology of soldiers
taking part in action and civilians who are victims of
evacuations and bombardments. The hitherto unem-
phasized characteristics of certain psychiatric descriptions
here given confirm, if confirmation were necessary, that
this colonial war is singular even in the pathology that it
gives rise to.
   Another idea which is strongly held needs in our opinion
to be re-examined; this is the notion of the relative harm-
lessness of these reactional disorders. It is true that others
have described, but always as exceptional cases, certain
secondary psychoses, that is to say cases where the whole
of the personality is disrupted definitively. It seems to us
that here the rule is rather the frequent malignancy of
these pathological processes. These are disorders which
persist for months on end, making a mass attack against
the ego, and practically always leaving as their sequel a
weakness which is almost visible to the naked eye. Accord­
ing to all available evidence, the future of such patients is

who today have full power to cany on their wort; they wish at the
same time to try to avoid the moral contamination of the young
people of France. As far as we are concerned we are totally in accord
with this attitude. Certain notes here brought together, especially in
Cases 4 and 5 in Series A, are sad illustrations and justifications for
this obsession which haunts French believers in democracy. But oui
purpose is in any case to show that torture, as might well be ex­
pected, upsets most profoundly the personality of the person who is
tortured.


mortgaged. An example will best illustrate our point of
view.
   In one of the African countries which have been in­
dependent for several years we had occasion to receive a
visit from a patriot who had been in the resistance. This
man in his thirties came to ask us for advice and he 1 p. for
around a certain date each year he suffered from pro­
longed insomnia, accompanied by anxiety and suic:dal
obsessions. The critical date was that when on instructions
from his organization he had p^ced a bomb somewhere.
Ten people had been killed as a result.*
   This militant, who never for a single moment t h o ^ h t
of repudiating his past action, realized very clearly the
manner in which he himself had to pay 'he price of
national independence. It is border-line cases such as his
which raise the question of responsibility within the revo­
lutionary framework.
    * The circumstances surrounding the appearance of these disorders
 are interesting for several reasons. Some months after his country's
 independence was declared, he had made the acquaintance of certain
 nationals of the former colonial power, and he had found them very
likeable. These men and women greeted the new independent state
 warmly and paid tribute to the courage of the patriots who had
 fought in the struggle for national freedom. The former militant
therefore had what might be called an attack of vertigo. He won­
dered with a feeling of anguish whether among the victims of the
bomb there had been people like his new acquaintances. It was true
that the cafe' that it was aimed at was a meeting place for notorious
racists; but there was nothing to prevent a quite ordinary passer-by
from going in and having a drink. From the first day that he suf­
fered from vertigo the man tried to avoid thinking of these former
occurrences. But paradoxically, a few days before-the crucial date,
the first symptoms made their appearance. After that, they reap­
peared with great regularity.
   In other words, we are forever pursued by our actions. Their order­
ing, their circumstances, and their motivation may perfectly well
come to be profoundly modified a posteriori. This is merely one of
the snares that history and its various influences sets for us. But can
we escape becoming dizzy? And who can affirm that vertigo does not
haunt the whole of existence?


   The observations noted here cover the period running
from 1954-59. Certain patients were examined in Algeria,
either in hospital centers or as private patients. The others
were cared for by the health divisions of the Army of Na­
tional Liberation.


                          SERIES A

  Five cases are cited here. They are cases of Algerians or
Europeans who had very clear symptoms of mental dis­
orders of the reactionary type.
Case No. 1: Impotence in an Algerian following the rape
   of his wife.
   B— is a man twenty-six years old. He came to see us on
the advice of the Health Service of the FLN for treatment
of insomnia and persistent headaches. A former taxi-driver,
he had worked in the nationalist parties since he was
eighteen. Since 1955 he had been a member of a branch
of the FLN. He had several times used his taxi for the
transport of political pamphlets and also political person­
nel. When the repression increased in ferocity, the FLN
decided to bring the war into the urban centers. B— thus
came to have the task of driving commandos to the
vicinity of attacking points, and quite often waited for
them at those points to bring them back.
   One day however, in the middle of the European part
of the town, after fairly considerable fighting a very large
number of arrests forced him to abandon his taxi, and the
commando unit broke up and scattered. B—, who man­
aged to escape through the enemy lines, took refuge at a
friend's house. Some days later, without having been able
to get back to his home, on the orders of his superiors he
joined the nearest band of Maquis.
   For several months he was without news of his wife and


his little girl of a year and eight months. On the other
hand he learned that the police spent several weeks on end
searching the town. After two years spent in the Maquis
he received a message from his wife in which she asked
him to forget her, for she had been dishonored and he
ought not to think of taking up their life together again.
He was extremely anxious and asked his commander's
leave to go home secretly. This was refused him, but on
the other hand measures were taken for a member of the
FLN to make contact with B—'s wife and parents.
   Two weeks later a detailed report reached the com­
mander of B—'s unit
   His abandoned taxi had been discovered with two ma­
chine-gun magazines in it. Immediately afterward French
soldiers accompanied by policemen went to his house.
Finding he was absent, they took his wife away and kept
her for over a week.
   She was questioned about the company her husband
kept and beaten fairly brutally for two days. But the third
day a French soldier (she was not able to say whether he
was an officer) made the others leave the room and then
raped her. Some time later a second soldier, this time with
others present, raped her, saying to her, "If ever you see
your filthy husband again don't forget to tell him what we
did to you." She remained another week without under­
going any fresh questioning. After this she was escorted
back to her dwelling. When she told her story to her
mother, the latter persuaded her to tell B— everything.
Thus as soon as contact was re-established with her hus­
band, she confessed her dishonor to him. Once the first
shock had passed, and since moreover every minute of his
time was filled by activity, B— was able to overcome his
feelings. For several months he had heard many stories of
Algerian women who had been raped or tortured, and he
had occasion to see the husbands of these violated women;


thus his personal misfortunes and his dignity as an injured
husband remained in the background.
   In 1958, he was entrusted with a mission abroad. When
it was time to rejoin his unit, certain fits of absence of
mind and sleeplessness made his comrades and superiors
anxious about him. His departure was postponed and it
was decided he should have a medical examination. This
was when we saw him. He seemed at once easy to get to
know; a mobile face: perhaps a bit too mobile. Smiles
slightly exaggerated; surface well-being: "I'm really very
well, very well indeed. I'm feeling better now. Give me a
tonic or two, a few vitamins, and I'll build myself up a
bit." A basic anxiety came up to break the surface. He was
at once sent to the hospital.
   From the second day on, the screen of optimism melted
away, and what we saw in front of us was a thoughtful,
depressed man, suffering from loss of appetite, who kept
to his bed. He avoided political discussion and showed a
marked lack of interest in everything to do with the na­
tional struggle. He avoided listening to any news which
had a bearing on the war of liberation. Any approach to his
difficulties was extremely long, but at the end of several
days we were able to reconstruct his story.
   During his stay abroad, he tried to carry through a
sexual affair which was unsuccessful. Thinking that this
was due to fatigue, a normal result of forced marches and
periods of undernourishment, he again tried two weeks
later. Fresh failure. Talked about it to a friend who ad­
vised him to try vitamin B-12. Took this in form of pills;
another attempt, another failure. Moreover, a few seconds
before the act, he had an irresistible impulse to tear up a
photo of his little girl. Such a symbolic liaison might have
caused us to think that unconscious impulsions of an in­
cestuous nature were present. However, several interviews
and a dream, in which the patient saw the rapid rotting


away of a little cat accompanied by unbearably evil smells,
led us to take quite another course. "That girl," he said
to us one day, speaking of his little daughter, "has some­
thing rotten about her." From this period an, his insomnia
became extremely marked, and in spite of fairly large doses
of neuroleptics, a state of anxiety excitation was remarked
which the Service found rather worrying. Then he spoke
to us for the first time about his wife, laughing and saying
to us: "She's tasted the French." It was at that moment
that we reconstructed the whole story. The weaving of
events to form a pattern was made explicit. He told us that
before every sexual attempt, he thought of his wife. All
his confidences appeared to us to be of fundamental
interest

   I married this girl although I loved my cousin. But my
 cousin's parents had arranged a match for their daughter with
somebody else. So I accepted the first wife my parents found
for me. She was nice, but I didn't love her. I used always to
say to myself: "You're young yet; wait a bit and when you've
found the right girl, you'll get a divorce and you'll make a
happy marriage." So you see I wasn't very attached to my wife.
And with the troubles, I got further apart than ever. In the
end, I used to come and eat my meals and sleep almost with­
out speaking to her.
   In the Maquis, when I heard that she'd been raped by the
French, I first of all felt angry with the swine. Then I said
"Oh, well, there's not much harm done; she wasn't killed. She
can start her life over again." And then a few weeks later I
came to realize that they'd raped her because they were look-
ing for me. In fact, it was to punish her for keeping silence
that she'd been violated. She could have very well told them
at least the name of one of the chaps in the movement, and
from that they could have searched out the whole network,
destroyed it, and maybe even arrested me. That wasn't a sim­
ple rape, for want of something better to do, or for sadistic
reasons like those I've had occasion to see in the villages; it


was the rape of an obstinate woman, who was ready to put
up with everything rather than sell her husband. And the
husband in question, it was me. This woman had saved my
life and had protected the organization. It was because of me
that she had been dishonored. And yet she didn't say to me:
"Look at all I've had to bear for you." On the contrary, she
said: "Forget about me; begin your life over again, for I have
been dishonored."
    It was from that moment on that I made my own decision
to take back my wife after the war; for it must be said that
I've seen peasants drying the tears of their wives after having
 seen them raped under their very eyes. This left me very much
 shaken; I must admit moreover that at the beginning I
 couldn't understand their attitude. But we increasingly came
 to intervene in such circumstances in order to explain matters
 to the civilians. I've seen civilians willingly proposing mar­
 riage to a girl who was violated by the French soldiers, and
 who was with child by them. All this led me to reconsider the
 problem of my wife.
    So I decided to take her back; but I didn't know at all how
 I'd behave when I saw her. And often, while I was looking
 at the photo of my daughter, I used to think that she too
 was dishonored, like as if everything that had to do with my
 wife was rotten. If they'd tortured her or knocked out all her
 teeth or broken an arm I wouldn't have minded. But that
 thing—how can you forget a thing like that? And why did
 she have to tell me about it all?
  He then asked me if his "sexual failing" was in my
opinion caused by his worries.
  I replied: "It is not impossible."
  Then he sat up in bed.
  "What would you do if all this had happened to you?"
  "I don't know."
  "Would you take back your wife?"
  "I think I would . . . "
  "Ah, there you are, you see. You're not quite sure . . . "


   He held his head in his hands and after a few seconds
left the room.
   From that day on, he was progressively more willing to
listen to political discussions and at the same time the
headaches and lack of appetite lessened considerably.
   After two weeks he went back to his unit. Before he left
he told me:
   "When independence comes, I'll take my wife back. If it
doesn't work out between us, I'll come and see you in
Algiers."

 Case No. 2: Undifferentiated homicidal impulsions found
   in a survivor of a mass murder.
    S—, thirty-seven years old, a fellah. Comes from a vil­
lage in the country around Constantine. Never took any
part in politics. From the outset of the war, his district
was the scene of fierce battles between the Algerian forces
and the French army. S— thus had occasion to see dead and
wounded. But he continued to keep out of things. From
time to time however, in common with the people as a
whole, the peasantry of his village used to come to the
aid of Algerian fighting men who were passing through.
But one day, early in 1958, a deadly ambush was laid not
far from the village. After this the enemy forces went into
operation and besieged the village, which in fact had no
soldiers in it. All the inhabitants were summoned and
questioned; nobody replied. A few hours after, a French
officer arrived by helicopter and said: "There's been too
much talk about this village. Destroy it." The soldiers
began to set fire to the houses while the women who were
trying to get a few clothes together or save some provisions
were driven away by blows with rifle-butts. Some peasants
took advantage of the general confusion to run away. The
officer gave the order to bring together the men who re-


mained and had them brought out to near a watercourse
where the killing began. Twenty-nine men were shot at
point-blank range. S— was wounded by two bullets which
went through his right thigh and his left arm respectively;
the arm injury gave rise to a fracture of the humerus.
   S— fainted and came to to find himself in the midst of
a group of ALN. He was treated by the Health Service
and evacuated as soon as it was possible to move him.
While on the way, his behavior became more and more
abnormal, and worried his escort continually. He de­
manded a gun, although he was helpless and a civilian,
and refused to walk in front of anybody, no matter who
they were. He refused to have anyone behind him. One
night he got hold of a soldier's gun and awkwardly tried
to fire on the sleeping soldiers. He was disarmed rather
roughly. From then on they tied his hands together, and
it was thus that he arrived at the Center.
   He began by telling us that he wasn't dead yet and that
he had played a good trick on the others. Bit by bit, we
managed to reconstruct his story of the assassination he
had attempted. S— was not anxious, he was in fact rather
overexcited, with violent phases of agitation, accom­
panied by screaming. He did not break anything much,
but tired everybody out by his incessant chatter, and the
whole Service was permanently on the alert on account of
his declared intention of "killing everybody." During his
stay in the hospital he attacked about eight patients with
makeshift weapons. Nurses and doctors were not spared
either. We almost wondered whether we were not witness­
ing one of those masked forms of epilepsy which is
characterized by a wholesale aggressivity which is nearly
always present.
   Deep sleep treatment was then tried. From the third day
on, a daily interview made it possible for us to better
understand the moving force of the pathological process.


The patient's intellectual confusion progressively toned
down. Here are some extracts from his statements:
   God is with me . . . but he certainly isn't with those who
are dead. . . . I've had hellish good luck. . . . In life you've
got to kill so as not to be killed. . . . When I think that I
knew nothing at all about all that business. . . . There are
Frenchmen in our midst. They disguise themselves as Arabs.
They've all got to be killed. Give me a machine-gun. All
these so-called Algerians are really Frenchmen . . . and they
won't leave me alone. As soon as I want to go to sleep they
come into my room. But now I know all about them. Every­
one wants to kill me. But I'll defend myself. I'll kill them all,
every single one of them. I'll cut their throats one after the
other, and yours with them. You all want to kill me but you
should set about it differently. I'd kill you all as soon as look
at you, big ones and little ones, women, children, dogs, birds,
donkeys . . . everyone will be dead. And afterward I'll be able
to sleep in peace. . . .
   All this was said in jerks; the patient's attitude remained
hostile, suspicious, and aloof.
   After three weeks, his state of excitement had disap­
peared, but a certain reticence and a tendency to seek soli­
tude gave us grounds for fearing a more serious evolution
of his disorder. However after a month he asked to be let
out in order to learn a trade that would be compatible
with his disability. He was then entrusted to the care of
the Social Service of the FLN. W e saw h i m six months
after, and he was going on well.
Case No. 3: Marked anxiety psychosis of the depersonaliza-
  tion type after the murder of a woman while tem-
  porarily insane.
  Dj—, a former student, a soldier in the ALN, nineteen
years old. His illness already dated from some months
back by the time he came to the Center. His appearance
was characteristic: he seemed very depressed, his hands


were constantly moist and his lips were dry; his chest was
lifted by continual sighs. Pernicious insomnia; two at­
tempts at suicide since the trouble started. During the
conversation, he struck hallucinatory attitudes while listen­
ing. Sometimes his glance fixed itself for a few seconds on
a point in space, while his face lit up, giving the impres­
sion to observers that the patient was witnessing a play.
Thoughts woolly. Certain phenomena known in psychia­
try by the name of blocking: a gesture or phrase is begun
and then suddenly interrupted without apparent reason.
But in particular one element aroused our particular atten­
tion: the patient talked of his blood being spilt, of his
arteries which were being emptied and of his heart which
kept missing a beat. He implored us to stop the hemor­
rhage and not to let him be "sucked by a vampire" within
the very precincts of the hospital. Sometimes he could
not speak any more, and asked us for a pencil. Wrote: "I
have lost my voice; my whole life is ebbing away." This
living depersonalization gave us reason to believe that the
illness had reached a serious stage of development.
   Several times during the course of our conversations, the
patient spoke to us of a woman who when night fell came
to persecute him. Having learnt beforehand that his
mother whom he had been very fond of was dead, and
that nothing had been able to console him for her loss
(his voice had considerably sunk as he spoke of her, and he
shed some tears), I directed the investigation toward the
maternal image. When I asked him to describe the woman
who obsessed him, I might even say persecuted him, he
declared that she was not an unknown person, that he
knew her very well and that it was he who had killed her.
It was thus a matter of finding out whether we had to
deal with an unconscious guilt complex following on the
death of the mother, as Freud has described in Mourning
and Melancholia. We asked the patient to talk to us about


this woman in greater detail, since he had known her so
well, and since also it was he who had killed her. Thus we
were able to reconstruct the following story:

   I left the town where I had been a student to join the
Maquis. After some months, I had news of my people. I
learnt that my mother had been killed point-blank by a
French soldier and two of my sisters had been taken to the
soldiers' quarters. Up to now, I have had no news of what
happened to them. I was terribly shaken by the death of my
mother. Since my father had died some years before, I was
the only man in the family, and my sole ambition had always
been to manage to do something to make life easier for my
mother and my sisters. One day we went to an estate belong­
ing to settlers, where the agent, who was an active colonialist,
had already killed two Algerian civilians. W e came to his
house, at night, but he wasn't there. Only his wife was at
home. When she saw us, she started to cry and implored us
not to kill her: "I know you've come for my husband," she
said, "but he isn't here. I've told him again and again not to
have anything to do with politics." We decided to wait for
her husband. But as far as I was concerned, when I looked at
that woman I thought of my mother. She was sitting in an
armchair and her thoughts seemed to be elsewhere. I won­
dered why we didn't kill her; then all of a sudden she noticed
I was looking at her. She flung herself upon me screaming
"Please, please don't kill me . . . I have children." A moment
after she was dead; I'd killed her with my knife. My com­
mander disarmed me and ordered me to leave. I was ques­
tioned by the platoon commander a few days later. I thought
I was going to be shot, but I didn't give a damn.* And then
I started vomiting after every meal, and I slept badly. After
that this woman started coming every night and asking for
my blood. But my mother's blood—where's that?

   * After considering the medico-legal experts' report which empha­
sized the pathological character of the action, the legal proceedings
which had been set in motion by the General Staff were closed.


   At nightfall that evening, as soon as the patient went to
bed, the room was "invaded by women" in spite of every-
ing. It was a manifold repetition of the same woman. Every
one of them had an open wound in her stomach. They
were bloodless, pale, and terribly thin. They tormented
the young patient and insisted that he should give them
back their spilt blood. At this moment the sound of run­
ning water filled the room and grew so loud that it seemed
like a thundering waterfall, and the young patient saw
the parquet of his room drenched with blood—his blood—
while the women slowly got their color back, and their
wounds began to close up. The patient awoke, bathed
with sweat and in deep distress, and remained in a state
of nervous excitement until the dawn.
   The young patient was treated for several weeks, after
which time the oneiroid symptoms (nightmares) had
practically disappeared. However, a serious deficiency re­
mained in his personality. When he started thinking of
his mother, the disemboweled woman rose up before him
in redoubled horror. Though it may appear unscientific,
in our opinion time alone can bring some improvement to
the disrupted personality of this young man.

 Case No. 4: A European policeman in a depressed state
   meets while under hospital treatment one of his vic-
   tims, an Algerian patriot who is suffering from stupor.
   A—, twenty-eight years old, no children. We learnt that
for several years both he and his wife underwent treat­
ment, unfortunately with no success, in order to have
children. He was sent to us by his superiors because he
had behavior disturbances.
   Immediate contact seemed fairly good. The patient
spoke to us spontaneously about his difficulties. Satisfac­
tory relations with his wife and parents-in-law. His trouble
was that at night he heard screams which prevented him
               Colonial War and Mental Disorders J 265

from sleeping. In fact, he told us that for the last few
weeks before going to bed he shut the shutters and stopped
up all the windows (it was summer) to the complete
despair of his wife, who was stifled by the heat Moreover,
he stuffed his ears with cotton wool in order to make the
screams seem less piercing. He sometimes even in the
middle of the night turned on the wireless or put on some
music in order not to hear this nocturnal uproar. He con­
sequently explained to us at full length the whole story
that was troubling him.
   A few months before, he had been transferred to an
anti-FLN brigade. At the beginning, he was entrusted with
surveying certain shops or cafes; but after some weeks he
used to work almost exclusively at the police headquarters.
Here he came to deal with interrogations; and these never
occurred without some "knocking about." T h e thing was
that they never would own up to anything." He explained:
   Sometimes we almost wanted to tell them that if they had
a bit of consideration for us they'd speak out without forcing
us to spend hours tearing information word by word out of
them. But you might as well talk to the wall. To all the ques­
tions we asked they'd only say "I don't know." Even when
we asked them what their name was. If we asked them where
they lived, they'd say "I don't know." So of course, we have
to go through with it. But they scream too much. At the be­
ginning that made me laugh. But afterward I was a bit
shaken. Nowadays as soon as I hear someone shouting I can
tell you exactly at what stage of the questioning we've got to.
The chap who's had two blows of the fist and a belt of the
baton behind his ear has a certain way of speaking, of shout­
ing, and of saying he's innocent. After he's been left two
hours strung up by his wrists he has another kind of voice.
After the bath, still another. And so on. But above all it's
after the electricity that it becomes really too much. You'd
say that the chap was going to die any minute. Of course
there are some that don't scream; those are the tough ones.


But they think they're going to be killed right away. But we're
not interested in killing them. What we want is information.
When we're dealing with those tough ones, the first thing we
do is to make them squeal; and sooner or later we manage it.
That's already a victory. Afterward we go on. Mind you, we'd
like to avoid that. But they don't make things easy for us.
Now I've come so as I hear their screams even when I'm at
home. Especially the screams of the ones who died at the
police headquarters. Doctor, I'm fed up with this job. And
if you manage to cure me, 111 ask to be transferred to France.
If they refuse, I'll resign.

   Faced with such a picture, I prescribed sick leave. As the
patient in question refused to go to the hospital, I treated
him privately. One day, shortly before the therapeutic
treatment was due to begin, I had an urgent call from my
department. When A— reached my house, my wife asked
him to wait for me, but he preferred to go for a walk in
the hospital grounds, and then come back to meet me. A
few minutes later as I was going home I passed him on
the way. He was leaning against a tree, looking overcome,
trembling and drenched with sweat: in fact having an
anxiety crisis. I took him into my car and drove him to my
house. Once he was lying on the sofa, he told me he had
met one of my patients in the hospital who had been
questioned in the police barracks (he was an Algerian
patriot) and who was under treatment for "disorders of a
stuporous nature following on shock." I then learnt that
the policeman had taken an active part in inflicting torture
on my patient. I administered some sedatives which
calmed A—'s anxiety. After he had gone, I went to the
house in the hospital where the patriot was being cared
for. The personnel had noticed nothing; but the patient
could not be found. Finally we managed to discover him
in a toilet where he was trying to commit suicide: he on
his side had recognized the policeman and thought that


he had come to look for him and take him back again to
the barracks.
   Afterward, A— came back to see me several times, and
after a very definite improvement in his condition, man­
aged to get back to France on account of his health. As for
the Algerian patriot, the personnel spent a long time con­
vincing him that the whole thing was an illusion, that
policemen were not allowed inside the hospital, that he
was very tired, that he was there to be looked after, etc.
Case No. 5: A European police inspector who tortured
   his wife and children.
   R—, thirty years old. Came of his own accord to consult
us. He was a police inspector and stated that for several
weeks "things weren't working out" Married, had three
children. He smoked a lot: five packets of cigarettes a day.
He had lost his appetite and his sleep was frequently dis­
turbed by nightmares. These nightmares had no special dis­
tinguishing features. What bothered him most were what
he called "fits of madness." In the first place, he disliked
being contradicted:

   Can you give me an explanation for this, doctor: as soon as
someone goes against me I want to hit him. Even outside my
job, I feel I want to settle the fellows who get in my way,
even for nothing at all. Look here, for example, suppose I go
to the kiosk to buy the papers. There's a lot of people. Of
course you have to wait. I hold out my hand (the chap who
keeps the kiosk is a pal of mine) to take my papers. Someone
in the line gives me a challenging look and says "Wait your
turn." Well, I feel I want to beat him up and I say to myself,
"If I had you for a few hours my fine fellow you wouldn't
look so clever afterwards."

  The patient dislikes noise. At home he wants to hit
everybody all the time. In fact, he does hit his children,


even the baby of twenty months, with unaccustomed
savagery.
   But what really frightened him was one evening when
his wife had criticized him particularly for hitting his chil­
dren too much. (She had even said to him, "My word,
anyone'd think you were going mad.") He threw himself
upon her, beat her, and tied her to a chair, saying to him­
self "I'll teach her once and for all that I'm master in this
house."
   Fortunately his children began roaring and crying. He
then realized the full gravity of his behavior, untied his
wife and the next day decided to consult a doctor, " a
nerve specialist." He stated that "before, he wasn't like
that"; he said that he very rarely punished his children and
at all events never fought with his wife. The present
phenomena had appeared "since the troubles." "The fact
is" he said:
nowadays we have to work like troopers. Last week, for ex­
ample, we operated like as if we belonged to the army. Those
gentlemen in the government say there's no war in Algeria
and that the arm of the law, that's to say the police, ought to
restore order. But there is a war going on in Algeria, and
when they wake up to it it'll be too late. The thing that kills
me most is the torture. You don't know what that is, do
you? Sometimes I torture people for ten hours at a stretch....
  " W h a t happens to you when you are torturing?"
   You may not realize, but it's very tiring. . . . It's true we
take it in turns, but the question is to know when to let the
next chap have a go. Each one thinks he's going to get the
information at any minute and takes good care not to let the
bird go to the next chap after he's softened him up nicely,
when of course the other chap would get the honor and glory
of it. So sometimes we let them go; and sometimes we don't.
   Sometimes we even offer the chap money, money out of


our own pockets, to try to get him to talk. Our problem is as
follows: are you able to make this fellow talk? It's a question
of personal success. You see, you're competing with the
others. In the end your fists are ruined. So you call in the
Senegalese. But either they hit too hard and destroy the crea­
ture or else they don't hit hard enough and it's no good. In
fact, you have to be intelligent to make a success of that sort
of work. You have to know when to lay it on and when to lay
it off. You have to have a flair for it. When the chap is soft­
ened up, it's not worth your while going on hitting him.
That's why you have to do the work yourself; you can judge
better how you're getting on. I'm against the ones that have
the chap dealt with by others and simply come to see every
hour or so what state he's in. Above all, what you mustn't do
is to give the chap the impression that he won't get away
alive from you. Because then he wonders what's the use of
talking if that won't save his life. In that case you'll have no
chance at all of getting anything out of him. He must go on
hoping; hope's the thing that'll make him talk.
   But the thing that worries me most is this affair with my
wife. It's certain that there's something wrong with me.
You've got to cure me, doctor.

   His superiors refused to give him sick leave, and since
moreover the patient did not wish to have a psychiatrist's
certificate, we tried to give him treatment "while working
full time." The weaknesses of such a procedure may easily
be imagined. This man knew perfectly well that his dis­
orders were directly caused by the kind of activity that
went on inside the rooms where interrogations were car­
ried out, even though he tried to throw the responsibility
totally upon "present troubles." As he could not see his
way to stopping torturing people (that made nonsense to
him for in that case he would have to resign) he asked me
without beating about the bush to help him to go on tor­
turing Algerian patriots without any prickings of con-


science, without any behavior problems, and with com­
plete equanimity.*

                            SERIES B

  We have here brought together certain cases or groups
of cases in which the event giving rise to the illness is in
the first place the atmosphere of total war which reigns in
Algeria.
Case No. 1: The murder by two young Algerians, thirteen
   and fourteen years old respectively, of their European
   playmate.
   We had been asked to give expert medical advice in a
legal matter. Two young Algerians thirteen and fourteen
years old, pupils in a primary school, were accused of hav­
ing killed one of their European schoolmates. They ad­
mitted having done it. The crime was reconstructed, and
photos were added to the record. Here one of the children
could be seen holding the victim while the other struck
at him with a knife. The little defendants did not go back
on their declarations. We had long conversations with
them. We here reproduce the most characteristic of their
remarks:
   a) The boy thirteen years old:
   "We weren't a bit cross with him. Every Thursday we
used to go and play with catapults together, on the hill
above the village. He was a good friend of ours. He usn't
to go to school any more because he wanted to be a mason
like his father. One day we decided to kill him, because
   * With these observations we find ourselves in the presence of a
coherent system which leaves nothing intact. The executioner who
loves birds and enjoys the peace of listening to a symphony or a
sonata is simply one stage in the process. Further on in it we may
well find a whole existence which enters into complete and absolute
sadism.


the Europeans want to kill all the Arabs. We can't kill
big people. But we could kill ones like him, because he
was the same age as us. We didn't know how to kill him.
We wanted to throw him into a ditch, but he'd only have
been hurt. So we got the knife from home and we killed
him."
   "But why did you pick on him?"
   "Because he used to play with us. Another boy wouldn't
have gone up the hill with us."
   "And yet you were pals?"
   "Well then, why do they want to kill us? His father is
in the militia and he said we ought to have our throats
cut."
   "But he didn't say anything to you?"
   "Him? No."
   "You know he is dead now."
   "Yes."
   "What does being dead mean?"
   "When it's all finished, you go to heaven."
   "Was it you that killed him?"
   "Yes."
   "Does having killed somebody worry you?"
   "No, since they want to kill us, s o . . . "
   "Do you mind being in prison?"
   "No."
   b) The boy fourteen years old:
   This young defendant was in marked contrast to his
schoolfellow. He was already almost a man, and an adult
in his muscular control, his appearance, and the content
of his replies. He did not deny having killed either. Why
had he killed? He did not reply to the question but asked
me had I ever seen a European in prison. Had there ever
been a European arrested and sent to prison after the
murder of an Algerian? I replied that in fact I had never
seen any Europeans in prison.


   "And yet there are Algerians killed every day, aren't
there?"
   "Yes."
   "So why are only Algerians found in the prisons? Can
you explain that to me?"
   "No. But tell me why you killed this boy who was your
friend."
   "Fll tell you why. You've heard tell of the Rivet busi­
ness?" *
   "Yes."
   "Two of my family were killed then. At home, they said
that the French had sworn to kill us all, one after the
other. And did they arrest a single Frenchman for all those
Algerians who were killed?"
   "I don't know."
   "Well, nobody at all was arrested. I wanted to take to
 the mountains, but I was too young. So X— and I said
we'd kill a European."
   "Why?"
   "In your opinion, what should we have done?"
   "I don't know. But you are a child and what is happen­
 ing concerns grown-up people."
   "But they kill children too . . . "
   "That is no reason for killing your friend."
   "Well, kill him I did. Now you can do what you like."
   "Had your friend done anything to harm you?"
   "Not a thing."
   "Well?"
   "Well, there you a r e . . . "
Case No. 2: Accusatory delirium and suicidal conduct dis-
   * Rivet is a village which since a certain day in the year 1956 has
become celebrated in the region around Algiers. For on that evening
the village was invaded by the militia who dragged forty men from
their beds and afterward murdered them.


    guised as "terrorist activity" in a young Algerian twenty-
    two years old.
    This patient was sent to our hospital by the French
 judicial authorities. This measure was taken after medical
 and legal advice given by French psychiatrists practicing
 in Algeria.
    The patient was an emaciated man in a complete state
 of aberration. His body was covered with bruises and two
 fractures of the jaw made all absorption of nourishment
 impossible. Thus for more than two weeks the patient
was fed by various injections.
    After two weeks, the blank in his thoughts receded; we
were able to establish contact and we managed to re­
 construct the dramatic history of this young man.
    During his youth he went in for scouting with unusual
enthusiasm. He became one of the main leaders of the
 Moslem Scout Movement. But when he was nineteen
years old he dropped scouting completely in order to have
no preoccupation other than his profession. He was a
multicopying-machine maker; he studied hard and dreamt
of becoming a great specialist in his profession. The first
of November, 1954, found him absorbed by strictly profes­
sional problems. At the time he showed no interest at all
in the national struggle. Already he no longer frequented
the company of his former companions. He defined him­
self at that time as "completely bent on increasing [his]
technical capacity."
   However, about the middle of 1955, when spending the
evening with his family, he suddenly had the impression
that his parents considered him a traitor. After a few days
this fleeting impression became blunted but at the back
of his mind a certain misgiving persisted, a sort of un­
easiness that he did not understand.
   On account of this, he decided to eat his meals quickly,


shrinking from the family circle, and shut himself into his
room. He avoided all contacts. It was in these conditions
that catastrophe intervened. One day, in the middle of the
street at about half-past twelve, he distinctly heard a voice
calling him a coward. He turned round, but saw nobody.
He quickened his pace, and decided that from then on
he would not go to work. He stayed in his room and did
not eat any dinner. During the night the crisis came on.
For three hours he heard all sorts of insults coming from
out of the night and resounding in his head: "Traitor,
traitor, coward . . . all your brothers who are dying, . . .
traitor, traitor . . . "
   He was seized with indescribable anxiety: "For eighteen
hours my heart beat at the rhythm of 130 pulsations to
the minute. I thought I was going to die."
   From that time on, the patient could no longer swallow
a bite. He wasted away almost visibly; he shut himself up
in complete darkness, and refused to open the door to his
parents. Around the third day he took refuge in prayer.
He stayed kneeling, he told me, from seventeen to eight­
een hours on end each day. On the fourth day, acting on
impulse "like a madman," with "a beard that was also
enough to make [him] be taken for a madman," wearing
neither coat nor tie, he went out into the town. Once in
the street, he did not know where to go; but he started
walking, and at the end of some time he found himself in
the European town. His physical appearance (he looked
like a European) seemed then to safeguard him against
being stopped and questioned by the police patrols.
   As a contrast to this, beside him Algerian men and
women were arrested, maltreated, insulted, and searched.
Paradoxically, he had no papers on him. This uncalled-for
consideration toward him on the part of the enemy patrols
confirmed his delusion that "everybody knew he was with


 the French. Even the soldiers had their orders; they left
him alone."
    In addition, the glances of the arrested Algerians, who
were waiting to be searched with their hands behind their
necks, seemed to him to be full of contempt. The prey
of overwhelming agitation, he moved away, striding
rapidly. It was at this moment that he happened to walk
in front of the building which was the French Staff Head­
quarters. In the gateway stood several soldiers armed with
machine-guns. He went toward the soldiers, threw himself
 upon one of them and tried to snatch his machine-gun,
shouting "I am an Algerian."
   He was quickly overcome and was brought to the police,
where they insisted on making him confess the names of
his "superiors" and the different members of the network
to which he (supposedly) belonged. After some days the
police and the soldiers realized that they were dealing with
a sick man. An expert opinion was sought which concluded
that he was suffering from mental disorders and that he
should be sent to the hospital. "All I wanted to do," he said,
"was to die. Even at the police barracks I thought and
hoped that after they'd tortured me they would kill me.
I was glad to be struck, for that showed me that they
considered that I too was their enemy. I could no longer
go on hearing those accusing voices, without doing some­
thing. I am not a coward. I am not a woman. I am not a
traitor." *
Case No. 3: Neurotic attitude of a young Frenchwoman
   whose father, a highly placed civil servant, was killed in
   an ambush.
   This girl, twenty-one years old, a student, came to con-
  * During the year 1955, cases of this type were very numerous in
Algeria. Unfortunate1^ not all the patients had the good fortune to
be sent to a hospital.


suit me about certain minor symptoms of anxiety complex
which interfered with her studies and with her social re­
lationships. Her hands were constantly moist and at times
presented very worrying symptoms when sweat "flowed all
over her hands." Constrictions of the chest accompanied
by nocturnal headaches. Bit her nails. But the thing that
was most apparent was above all the over-easy contact, ob­
viously too rapid, while a severe anxiety could be clearly
sensed underlying the facile approach. The death of her
father, though judging from the date fairly recent, was
mentioned by the patient with such lightheartedness that
we quickly directed our investigations toward her relations
with her father. The account which she gave us was clear,
completely lucid, with a lucidity which touched on in­
sensibility and later revealed, precisely by its rationalism,
this girl's uneasiness and the nature and origin of her
conflict.

    My father was highly placed in the civil service. He was
responsible for a very large rural area. As soon as the troubles
 started, he threw himself into the Algerian manhunt with
 frenzied rage. Sometimes it happened that he would eat
nothing at all, and not even sleep, he was in such a state of
excitement over putting down the rebellion. I saw without
being able to do anything about it the slow metamorphosis of
my father. Finally, I decided not to go to see him any more
 and to stay in town. The fact was that every time I went
home I spent entire nights awake, for screams used to rise
up to my room from down below; in the cellar and in the
unused rooms of the house Algerians were being tortured so
as to obtain information. You have no idea how terrible it
is to hear screaming all night like that. Sometimes I used to
wonder how it was that a human being was able to bear hear­
ing those screams of pain—quite apart from the actual tor­
ture. And so it went on. Finally, I didn't ever go home. The
rare times that my father came to see me in town I wasn't
able to look him in the face without being terribly frightened


and embarrassed. I found it increasingly difficult to force my­
self to kiss him.
    For you must understand that I had lived a long time in the
village. I knew almost all the families that lived there. The
Algerian boys of my age and I had played together when we
were small. Every time I went home my father told me that
fresh people had been arrested. In the end I didn't dare walk
in the street any more, I was so sure of meeting hatred every­
where. In my heart I knew that those Algerians were right.
If I were an Algerian girl, I'd be in the Maquis.
    One day, however, she received a telegram which an­
nounced that her father was seriously injured. She went
to the hospital and found her father in a coma. Shortly
afterward he died. He had been wounded while on a re-
connoitering expedition with a military detachment; the
patrol fell into an ambush laid by the Algerian National
Army. "The funeral sickened me," she said.
    All those officials who came to weep over the death of my
father whose "high moral qualities conquered the native
population" disgusted me. Everyone knew that it was false.
There wasn't a single person who didn't know that my father
had the whip hand of all the interrogation centers in the
whole region. Everyone knew that the number of deaths un­
der torture reached ten a day, and there they came to tell
their lies about my father's devotion, his self-sacrifice, his
love for his country, and so on. I ought to say that now such
words have no meaning for me, or at any rate hardly any.
I went back to the town directly afterward, and I avoided all
the authorities. They offered me an allowance but I refused
it. I don't want their money. It is the price of the blood spilt
by my father. I don't want any of it. I am going to work.
Case No. 4: Behavior disturbances in young Algerians
  under ten.
  These children were refugees, the children of fighting
men or of civilians killed by the French. They were sent
to various different centers in Tunisia and Morocco. These
children were sent to school, and games and outings were


organized for them. They were examined regularly by
doctors; that is how we came to have occasion to see some
of them.
   a) In each of these different children there exists a very
marked love for parental images. Everything which re­
sembles a father or a mother is sought out with the
greatest tenacity and jealously guarded.
   b) Generally speaking, they all have a noise phobia
which is very noticeable. These children are very much
affected when they are scolded. They have a great thirst
for peace and for affection.
   c) Many of them suffer from sleeplessness and also
from sleepwalking.
   d) Periodical enuresis.
   e) Sadistic tendencies. A game that is often played is to
stretch a sheet of paper and feverishly poke holes in it. All
their pencils are chewed and their nails bitten with dis­
tressing regularity. They quarrel frequently among them­
selves despite a deep fundamental affection.
Case No. 5: Puerperal psychoses among the refugees.
   The name puerperal psychoses is given to mental dis­
orders which occur in women around childbirth. Such
disorders may appear immediately before or some weeks
after giving birth. The determimsm of such illnesses is
very complex; but it is considered that the principal causes
are the upsetting of the functioning of the endocrine
glands and the existence of an "affective shock." The
latter heading, though vague, covers what most people
refer to as "violent emotion."
   On the Moroccan and Tunisian frontiers there are to
be found something like 300,000 refugees since the deci­
sion of the French government to practice their burnt
earth policy over hundreds of kilometers. The destitution
in which they exist is well known. International Red Cross
committees have repeatedly paid visits to these places and


after having observed the extreme poverty and precarious-
ness of living conditions they have recommended in­
creased aid to these refugees from international organiza­
tions. It was thus only to be expected, considering the
undernourishment which is rife in these camps, that
pregnant women there should show particular propensities
for the development of puerperal psychoses.
   The atmosphere of permanent insecurity in which the
refugees exist is kept up by frequent invasions of French
troops, applying "the right of following and pursuit,"
bombardments from the air, machine-gunnings—it is well
known that no further attention is now paid to bombard­
ments of Moroccan and Tunisian territories by the French
army, of which Sakiet-Sidi-Youssef, the martyred village
in Tunisia, was the most appalling—together with the
break-up of homes which is a consequence of the condi­
tions of the evacuation. To tell the truth there are very
few Algerian women who give birth in such conditions
who do not suffer from mental disorders.
   These disorders take various forms. Sometimes they are
visible as states of agitation which sometimes turn into
rages; sometimes deep depression and tonic immobility
with many attempted suicides; or sometimes finally anx­
iety states with tears, lamentations, and appeals for mercy.
In the same way the form which the delusions take are
many and divers. We may find a delusion of persecution
against the French who want to kill the new-born infant
or the child not yet born; or else the mother may have
the impression of imminent death, in which the mothers
implore invisible executioners to spare their child.
   Here once more we must point out that the fundamental
nature of these problems is not cleared up by the regres­
sion and soothing of the disorders. The circumstances of
the cured patients maintains and feeds these pathological
kinks.


                            SERIES G

Affective-intellectual modifications and mental disorders
after torture.
   In this series we will group together patients in a fairly
serious condition whose disorders appeared immediately
after or during the tortures. We shall describe various dif­
ferent groups in this category, because we realize that the
characteristic morbidity groups correspond to different
methods of torture employed, quite independently of its
evil effects, whether glaring or hidden, upon the person­
ality.
Category No. 1:' After so-called preventive tortures of an
   indiscriminate nature.
   We here refer to brutal methods which are directed
toward getting prisoners to speak, rather than to actual
torture. The principle that over and above a certain thresh­
old pain becomes intolerable here takes on singular im­
portance. The aim is to arrive as quickly as possible at
that threshold. There is no finicking about There is a mass
attack taking several forms: several policemen striking the
prisoner at the same time; four policemen standing around
the prisoner and hitting him backward and forward to
each other, while another bums his chest with a cigarette
and still another hits the soles of his feet with a stick.
Certain methods of torture used in Algeria seemed to us
to be particularly atrocious; the confidences of those who
had been tortured are our reference.
   a) Injection of water by the mouth accompanied by an
enema of soapy water given at high pressure.*
   "This type of torture is the cause of a very large number of
deaths. After these enemas given at high pressure, the mucous mem­
brane of the intestine becomes in fact the seat of numerous lesions
which provoke minute perforations of the intestine. Gaseous em­
bolisms and cases of peritonitis are thus very frequently caused.


   b) Introduction of a bottle into the anus.
   Two forms of torture called "motionless torture":
   c) The prisoner is placed on his knees, with his arms
parallel to the ground, the palms of his hands turned up­
ward, his torso and head straight. No movement is al­
lowed. Behind the prisoner a policeman sitting on a chair
keeps him motionless by blows of his truncheon.
   d) The prisoner is placed standing with his face to the
wall, his arms lifted and his hands against the wall. Here
too if he makes the slightest movement or shows the
slightest sign of relaxing the blows rain down.
   We must now point out that there are two categories of
people who undergo torture:
   1) Those who know something.
   2) Those who know nothing.
   1) Those who know something are very rarely seen in
hospital centers. Evidently, it may be common know­
ledge that such-and-such a patriot has been tortured in
the French prisons, but you never meet him as a patient.*
   2) On the contrary, those who know nothing come
very frequently to consult us. We are not here speaking
of Algerians taken prisoner during a general arresting or
a round-up: they do not come to see us as patients either.
We are speaking expressly of those Algerians who do not
belong to any organization, who are arrested and brought
to police quarters or to farms used as centers of interroga­
tion in order to be tortured there.
Symptoms of psychiatric cases encountered:
  a) Agitated nervous depressions: four cases.
  These are patients who are sad, without really being
anxious. They are depressed and spend most of their time

   * We are here speaking of course of those Algerians who, know­
ing something, have not confessed under torture; for it is well known
that an Algerian who confesses is killed immediately afterward.


in bed; they shun contact, and are liable to suddenly show
signs of very violent agitation the significance of which is
always difficult to grasp.
   b) Loss of appetite arising from mental causes: five
cases.
   These patients present serious problems, for every men­
tal anorexia is accompanied by a phobia against all physi­
cal contact with another. The nurse who comes near the
patient and tries to touch him, to take his hand, for ex­
ample, is at once pushed stiffly away. It is not possible to
carry out artificial feeding or to administer medicine.*
   c) Motor instability: eleven cases.
   Here we have to deal with patients who will not keep
still. They insist on being alone and it is difficult to get
them to allow themselves to be shut up with the doctor
in his consulting room.
   Two feelings seemed to us to be frequent in the first
category of tortured people:
   First that of suffering injustice. Being tortured night and
day for nothing seemed to have broken something in these
men. One of these sufferers had a particularly painful ex­
perience. After some days of useless torturing, the police
came to realize that they were dealing with a peaceable
man who knew nothing whatever about anybody in an
FLN network. In spite of being convinced of this, a po­
lice inspector had said: "Don't let him go like that. Give
him a bit more, so that when he gets out he'll keep quiet.t
   * The medical attendants are obliged to sit by the patient night
and day working to explain matters to him. We can understand that
the formula of "treating him a bit rough" is of no possible value
here.
   f This preventive torture becomes in certain districts "preventive
repression." Thus at Rivet, though peace reigned, the settlers did not
want to be taken unawares (the neighboring districts were beginning
to stir) and decided purely and simply to do away with all eventual
members of the FLN. Over forty Algerians were killed in a single
day.


   Secondly, there was indifference to all moral arguments.
For these patients, there is no just cause. A cause which
entrains torture is a weak cause. Therefore the fighting
strength of the cause must at all costs be increased; its
justness must not be questioned. Force is the only thing
that counts.
Category No. 2: After tortures by electricity.
   In this category we have placed the Algerian patriots
who were mainly tortured by electricity. In fact, although
previously electricity was used as one of the general meth­
ods of torture, from September, 1956, on certain ques­
tionings were carried on exclusively by electricity.
Descriptions of psychiatric cases encountered:
   a) Localized or generalized coenesthopathies: three
cases.
   These patients felt "pins and needles" throughout their
bodies; their hands seemed to be torn off, their heads
seemed to be bursting, and their tongues felt as if they
were being swallowed.
   b) Apathy, aboulia, and lack of interest: seven cases.
   These are patients who are inert, who cannot make
plans, who have no resources, who live from day to day.
   c) Electricity phobia.
   Fear of touching a switch, of turning on the radio, fear
of the telephone. Completely impossible for the doctor
to even mention the eventual possibility of electric shock
treatment.
Category No. 3: After the "truth serum."
   The basic principles of this treatment are well known.
When dealing with a patient who seems to suffer from
an unconscious inner conflict which consultations do not
manage to externalize, the doctor has recourse to chemical
methods of exploration. Pentothal, given by intravenous
injections, is the most common serum used to liberate the


patient from a conflict which seems to go beyond his
powers of adaptation. The doctor intervenes in order to
liberate the patient from this "foreign body."*
   It has been generally observed that it is difficult to
control the progressive disintegration of psychical processes
when using this method. Very often a spectacular worsen­
ing of the illness was observed, or new and quite inexpli­
cable symptoms appeared. Thus, generally speaking, this
technique has been more or less abandoned.
   In Algeria, military doctors and psychiatrists have found
a wide field for experiment in police quarters. For if in
cases of neurosis pentothal sweeps away the barriers which
bar the way to bringing to light an interior conflict, it
ought equally in the case of Algerian patriots to serve to
break down the political barrier and make confession
easier for the prisoner without having recourse to electric­
ity; medical tradition lays down that suffering should be
avoided. This is the medical form that "subversive war"
takes.
   The scenario is as follows. First, "I am a doctor, I am
not a policeman. I am here to help you." In this way
after a few days the confidence of the prisoner is won.t
   After that, "I'm going to give you a few injections, for
you're badly shaken." For a few days, treatment of any

   * In fact, it is not "foreign" at all. A conflict is only the result
of the dynamic evolution of the personality, and here there can be
no "foreign body." We ought rather to say that the problem is one
of a "badly integrated body."
   t We can cite in the same way the case of psychiatrists who were
prime movers in "Presence frangaise," who when they were called
in to give an expert opinion on a prisoner had the habit from the
very first of proclaiming their great friendship with the defending
lawyer, and of assuring the prisoner that the two of them (the bar­
rister and the psychiatrist) would get him out of there. All the
prisoners who had the benefit of expert opinions were guillotined.
These psychiatrists boasted in front of us of their elegant method of
overcoming "resistance."


kind at all is given—vitamins, treatment for heart disease,
sugar serums. On the fourth or fifth day the intravenous
injection of pentothal is given. The interrogation begins.
Psychiatric symptoms.
   a) Verbal stereotypy:
   The patient continually repeats sentences of the type of
"I didn't tell them anything. You must believe me; I
didn't talk." Such stereotypies are accompanied by a per­
manent anxiety state. In fact the patient does not even
know whether he has given any information away. The
sense of culpability toward the cause he was fighting for
and his brothers in arms whose names and addresses he
may have given here weighs so heavily as to be dramatic.
No assurance can bring peace to these broken consciences.
   b) Intellectual or sensory perception clouded.
   The patient cannot affirm the existence of a given visible
object Reasoning is assimilated but in undifferentiated
fashion. There is a fundamental inability to distinguish
between true and false. Everything is true and everything
is false at the same time.
   c) Fear, amounting to phobia, of all private conversa­
tions.
   This fear is derived from the acute impression that at
any moment a fresh interrogation may take place.
   d) Inhibition.
   The patient is on his guard; he registers each word of
the question that is put to him and elaborates every word
 of his projected reply. From this comes the impression of
 a quasi-inhibition, with psychical slowing down, inter­
 rupted sentences, repetition, and faltering, etc.
    It is obvious that these patients obstinately refuse all
 intravenous injections.
Category No. 4: After brainwashing.
 Recently much has been said about "psychological


action" in Algeria. We do not wish to proceed to a
critical study of these methods. We are content to bring
to mind here their psychiatric consequences. There are
two categories of centers where torture by brainwashing
is carried on in Algeria.
1. For intellectuals.
   The principle here is to lead the prisoner on to play a
part. We can see that this is a throwback to a particular
school of psycho-sociology.*
   a) Playing the game of collaboration.
   The intellectual is invited to collaborate and at the
same time reasons for collaboration are brought forward.
He is thus obliged to lead a double life: he is a man well
known for his patriotism who is imprisoned for preventive
reasons. The task undertaken is to attack from the inside
those elements which constitute national consciousness.
Not only is the intellectual in question expected to col­
laborate, but he is given orders to discuss matters "freely"
with those opposed to his viewpoint or those who hold
back, and to convince them. This is an elegant way of
bringing him to focus attention on other patriots, and thus
to serve as informer. If by chance he says that he cannot
find any opponents, these latter are pointed out to him,

   * We know that in the United States of America a trend toward
psycho-sociology has developed. Supporters of this school think that
the tragedy of the contemporary individual is contained in the fact
that he has no longer any part to play, and that present-day social
conditions force him to exist only as a cog in the machine. From
this comes the proposal of a therapeutic which will allow a man to
take various roles in a veritable game of activity. Anyone can play
any role; it even happens that in a single day a person's role may be
changed; symbolically you may put yourself in the place of anyone
you please. The factory psychiatrists in the United States are, it
seems, making huge strides in group psychotherapy among workers.
The latter are in fact able to identify themselves with heroes.
Strained relations between employers and workers are considerably
diminished.


or else he is told to behave as if he was dealing with such.
   b) Making public statements on the value of the French
heritage and on the merits of colonization.
    In order to carry out this task as well as possible, the
intellectual is surrounded by "political advisers": officers
for Native Affairs, or, better still, psychologists, social
psychiatrists, sociologists, etc.
   c) Taking the arguments for the Algerian revolution
and overthrowing them one by one.
   Algeria is not a nation; it has never been a nation; it
will never be a nation.
   There is no such thing as the "Algerian people."
   Algerian patriotism is nonsense.
   The fellaghas are ambitious peasants, criminals, and
poor mistaken creatures.
   Taking each theme in turn, the intellectual is expected
to make a reasoned statement on it, and the statement
must be convincing. Marks (the well-known "rewards")
are given and counted up at the end of every month. They
serve as a means of deciding whether or not the intel­
lectual will be allowed out.
    d) Leading a totally pathological communal life.
    To be alone is an act of rebellion: so the intellectual
is always with somebody. Silence is also forbidden; think­
ing must be done aloud.
Evidence of brainwashing.
    The case was that of a person with a university educa­
 tion who was interned and subjected to brainwashing
 which lasted for months on end. One day the camp
 officials congratulated him on the progress he had made
 and announced that he would soon be set free.
    He knew about the enemy's maneuvers, and took care
 not to take this news too seriously. Their technique was
 in fact to announce to the prisoners that they were going
 to be freed, and then a few days before the date fixed to


organize a meeting at which collective criticisms are made.
At the end of the meeting the decision is often taken to
postpone setting the prisoner free, since he does not seem
to present all the signs of a definitive cure. The meeting,
say those psychologists who were present at it, has served
to draw attention to the nationalistic virus.
   However this time there was no subterfuge. The prisoner
was freed for good and all. Once outside, in his own town
and with his own family, the former prisoner congratu­
lated himself on having played his part so well. He
rejoiced that he was able to take his place once again in
the national conflict and began to establish contact with
his leaders. It was at that moment that a terrible, burning
doubt flashed through his mind. Perhaps he had never
deceived anybody—neither his jailors, nor his fellow-
prisoners, nor even himself.
   Where would the game end?
   Here once again we had to reassure the patient, and to
free him from the burden of guilt.
Psychiatric symptoms      encountered.
   a) Phobia of all collective discussion. As soon as three
or four people came together, the inhibition made its
appearance again, and mistrust and reticence weighed
heavily upon those present.
   h) The impossibility of explaining and defending any
given position. Thought proceeds by antithetic couplings.
Everything that is affirmed can, at the same instant, be
denied with the same force. This is certainly the most
painful sequel that we encountered in this war. An obses­
sional personality is the fruit of the "psychological action"
used in the service of colonialism in Algeria.

2. For non-intellectuals.
   In centers such as that at Berrouaghia, subjectivity is


not taken as the starting point for modifying the attitude
of the individual. On the contrary, the body is dealt with:
it is broken in the hope that national consciousness will
thus be demolished. It is a thorough breaking-in.
"Rewards" are taken to mean the absence of torture or
the possibility of getting food to eat.
   a) You must declare that you do not belong to the
FLN. You must shout this out in groups. You must repeat
it for hours on end.
   b) After that, you must recognize that you were once
in the FLN and that you have come to realize that it
was a bad thing. Thus, down with the FLN.
   After this stage, we come to another: the future of
Algeria is French; it can be nothing other than French.
   Without France, Algeria will go back to the Middle
Ages.
   Finally, you are French. Long live France.
   Here, the disorders met with are not serious. It is the
painful, suffering body that calls for rest and peace.


                         SERIES D

Psychosomatic disorders.
   A marked increase in mental disorders and the creation
of conditions favorable to the development of specific
morbid phenomena are not the only consequences of the
colonial war in Algeria. Quite apart from the pathology
of torture there flourishes in Algeria a pathology of atmos­
phere, a state which leads medical practitioners to say
when confronted with a case which they cannot under­
stand: "This'll all be cleared up when this damned war
is over."
   W e propose to group together in this fourth series the
illnesses met with among Algerians, some of whom were


interned in concentration camps. The main characteristic
of these illnesses is that they are of the psychosomatic
type.
   The name "psychosomatic pathology" is given to the
general body of organic disorders the development of
which is favored by a conflicting situation.*
   The name psychosomatic is used because the determin­
ism is psychic in origin. This pathology is considered as
a means whereby the organism responds to, in other
words adapts itself to, the conflict it is faced with, the
disorder being at the same time a symptom and a cure.
More precisely, it is generally conceded that the organism
(once again we are speaking of the cortico-visceral unity,
the psychosomatic unity of former times) resolves the con­
flict by unsatisfactory, but on the whole economical,
means. The organism in fact chooses the lesser evil in
order to avoid catastrophe.
   On the whole, this pathology is very well known today,
although the different therapeutic methods proposed
 (relaxation and suggestion, for example) seem to us very
uncertain. In the Second World War in England during
the air raids and in the Soviet Union among the besieged
populations of towns, notably in Stalingrad, there was a
great increase in reports of the occurrence of such disorders.
Today, we know very well that it is not necessary to be
wounded by a bullet in order to suffer from the fact of
war in body as well as in mind. Like all other wars, the
Algerian war has created its contingent of cortico-visceral
illnesses. With the exception of Group G described
below, all the disorders met with in Algeria have already

   * This nomenclature which expresses an idealist conception is less
and less frequently used. In fact the terminology "cortico-visceral"
inherited from Soviet research work—especially that of Pavlov—has
at least the advantage that it puts the brain back in its place, that
is to say it considers the brain as the matrix where, precisely, the
psychism is elaborated.


been described during the course of "traditional" wars.
Group G seems to us to be specific to the colonial war
in Algeria. This particular form of pathology (a gener­
alized muscular contraction) had already called forth at­
tention before the revolution began. But the doctors
described it by portraying it as a congenital stigma of
the native, an "original" part of his nervous system where,
it was stated, it was possible to find the proof of a pre­
dominance of the extra-pyramidal system in the native.*
This contracture is in fact simply the postural accom­
paniment to the native's reticence, the expression in
muscular form of his rigidity and his refusal with regard
to colonial authority.
Psychiatric symptoms encountered.
   a) Stomach ulcers.
  Very numerous. The pains are felt predominantly at
night, with considerable vomiting, loss of weight, sadness
and moroseness, and irritability in exceptional cases. It
should be noted that the majority of these patients are
very young: from eighteen to twenty-five years old. As a
general rule, we never advise surgical intervention. A gas-
trectomy was performed on two occasions, and in these
two same cases a second intervention was necessary in the
same year as the first.
   b) Nephritic colic.
   Here again we find pains which came on intensely at
night. Obviously, stones are hardly ever present. These
colics may occur, though rarely, in patients from fourteen
to sixteen years old.
   c) Menstruation trouble in women.
   This pathology is very well known, and we shall not
spend much time on it. Either the women affected remain
three or four months without menstruation, or else con-
    * The higher a person is on the neurological plane, the less he is
 extra-pyramidal. As we see, everything tallies.


siderable pain accompanies it, which has repercussions on
character and conduct.
   d) Intense sleeplessness caused by idiopathic tremors.
   The patients are young adults, to whom all rest is
denied because of a generalized slight shaking, reminiscent
of a total case of Parkinson's disease. Here too, "scientific
thinkers" could invoke an extra-pyramidal determinism.
   d) Hair turning white early.
   Among the survivors of the interrogation centers, the
hair often turns white suddenly, either in patches, in
certain areas, or totally. Very often this is accompanied
by serious debility and sexual impotence.
   /) Paroxysmal tachycardias.
   The cardiac rhythm accelerates abruptly: 120, 130, or
140 per minute. These tachycardias are accompanied by
anxiety, and by an impression of imminent death: the end
of the crisis is marked by a heavy sweating fit.
   g) Generalized contraction with muscular stiffness.
   These symptoms are found in patients of the masculine
sex who find it increasingly difficult (in two cases the ap­
pearance of the symptoms was abrupt) to execute certain
movements: going upstairs, walking quickly, or running.
The cause of this difficulty lies in a characteristic rigidity
which inevitably reminds us of the impairing of certain
regions of the brain (central gray nuclei). It is an extended
rigidity and walking is performed with small steps. The
passive flexion of the lower limbs is almost impossible.
No relaxation can be achieved. The patient seems to be
made all of a piece, subjected as he is to a sudden con­
traction and incapable of the slightest voluntary relaxa­
tion. The face is rigid but expresses a marked degree of
bewilderment.
   The patient does not seem able to "release his nervous
tension." He is constantly tense, waiting between life


and death. Thus one of these patients said to us; "You
see, I'm already stiff like a dead man."*
Criminal impulses found in North Africans which have
their origin in the national war of liberation.
   It is not only necessary to fight for the liberty of your
people. You must also teach that people once again, and
first learn once again yourself, what is the full stature of
a man; and this you must do for as long as the fight lasts.
You must go back into history, that history of men
damned by other men; and you must bring about and
render possible the meeting of your people and other
men.
   In reality, the soldier who is engaged in armed combat
in a national war deliberately measures from day to day
the sum of all the degradation inflicted upon man by
colonial oppression. The man of action has sometimes the
exhausting impression that he must restore the whole of
his people, that he must bring every one of them up out
of the pit and out of the shadows. He very often sees that
his task is not only to hunt down the enemy forces but
also to overcome the kernel of despair which has hardened
in the native's being. The period of oppression is painful;
but the conflict, by reinstating the downtrodden, sets on
foot a process of reintegration which is fertile and decisive
 in the extreme. A people's victorious fight not only conse­
 crates the triumph of its rights; it also gives to that people
 consistence, coherence, and homogeneity. For colonialism
 has not simply depersonalized the individual it has colo­
 nized; this depersonalization is equally felt in the collective
 sphere, on the level of social structures. The colonized
 people find that they are reduced to a body of individuals

  * It is hardly necessary to add that there is no question here of
hysterical contraction.


 who only find cohesion when in the presence of the
 colonizing nation.
   The fight carried on by a people for its liberation leads
it, according to circumstances, either to refuse or else to
explode the so-called truths which have been established
in its consciousness by the colonial civil administration,
by the military occupation, and by economic exploitation.
Armed conflict alone can really drive out these falsehoods
created in man which force into inferiority the most lively
minds among us and which, literally, mutilate us.
   How many times—in Paris, in Aix, in Algiers, or in
Basse-Terre—have we not heard men from the colonized
countries violently protesting against the pretended lazi­
ness of the black man, of the Algerian, and of the Viet-
Namese? And yet is it not the simple truth that under
the colonial regime a fellah who is keen on his work or
a Negro who refuses to rest are nothing but pathological
cases? The native's laziness is the conscious sabotage of
the colonial machine; on the biological plane it is a
remarkable system of auto-protection; and in any case it
is a sure brake upon the seizure of the whole country by
the occupying power.
   The resistance that forests and swamps present to for­
eign penetration is the natural ally of the native. His point
of view must be understood; it is time to stop remonstrat­
ing and declaring that the nigger is a great worker and
that the Arab is first-rate at clearing ground. Under the
colonial regime, what is true for the Arab and for the
Negro is that they should not lift their little fingers nor
in the slightest degree help the oppressor to sink his claws
deeper into his prey. The duty of the native who has not
yet reached maturity in political consciousness and decided
to hurl back oppression is literally to make it so that the
slightest gesture has to be torn out of him. This is a


very concrete manifestation of non-cooperation, or at least
of minimum cooperation.
   These observations, which concern the relations between
the native and his work, could equally be applied to the
respect the native has for the oppressor's laws, to the
regular payment of rates and taxes, and to the relations
which the native has with the colonial system. Under
the colonial regime, gratitude, sincerity, and honor are
empty words. During the last few years I have had occa­
sion to verify a very classic fundamental idea: that honor,
dignity, and respect for the given word can only manifest
themselves in the framework of national and international
homogeneity. From the moment that you and your like
are liquidated like so many dogs, you have no other
resource but to use all and every means to regain your
importance as a man. You must therefore weigh as heavily
as you can upon the body of your torturer in order that
his soul, lost in some byway, may finally find once more
its universal dimension. During these last years I have
had occasion to see that in wartime Algeria honor, self-
sacrifice, love of life, and scorn of death have taken on
no ordinary forms. There is no question of singing the
praises of those who are fighting. W e are concerned here
with a very ordinary statement which even the most rabid
colonialists have not failed to make: the fighting Algerian
has an unusual manner of fighting and dying, and no
reference to Islam or to Paradise can explain that gener­
 ous dedication of self when there is question of defending
 his people or shielding his brothers. And then there is
 that overwhelming silence—but of course the body cries
 out—that silence that overwhelms the torturer. Let us
 admit there here we find again that very ancient law which
 forbids any element whatsoever to remain unmoved when
 the nation has begun to march, when man affirms and


claims at the same time his limitless humanity.
   Among the characteristics of the Algerian people as
observed by colonialism we will particularly notice their
appalling criminality. Before 1954 magistrates, policemen,
barristers, journalists, and legal doctors agreed unani­
mously that criminality in Algeria was a problem. It was
affirmed that the Algerian was a born criminal. A theory
was elaborated and scientific proofs were found to support
it. This theory was taught in the universities for over
twenty years. Algerian medical students received this
education and imperceptibly, after accommodating them­
selves to colonialism, the elite came also to accommodate
themselves to the inherent stigma of the Algerian people:
they were born slackers, born liars, born robbers, and
born criminals.
   We propose here to repeat this official theory, and to
recall to mind the concrete bases and the scientific argu­
ments used to create it. Later on we shall go over the
facts and try to reinterpret them.
   The Algerian frequently kills other men. It is a fact, the
magistrates will tell you, that four-fifths of cases brought
to court deal with blows and woundings. The proportion
of criminality in Algeria is one of the heaviest and largest
in the world, or so they affirm. There are no minor
delinquencies. When the Algerian, and this applies equally
to all North Africans, puts himself outside the law, it is
always outside to the maximum.
   The Algerian kills savagely. First, the favorite weapon
is the knife. The magistrates "who know the country"
have created a minor philosophy on this subject. The
Kabyles for example prefer a pistol or a gun. The Arabs
of the plain have a preference for the knife. Certain magis­
trates wonder if the Algerian has not an inner need for
the sight of blood. The Algerian, you are told, needs to
feel warm blood, and to bathe in the blood of his victim.


These magistrates, policemen, and doctors hold serious
dissertations on the relationship between the Moslem soul
and blood.*
   A certain number of magistrates go so far as to say that
the reason why an Algerian kills a man is primarily and
above all in order to slit his throat The savagery of the
Algerian shows itself especially in the number of wounds
he inflicts, some of these being unnecessary once the
victim has been killed. Autopsies establish one fact incon-
testably: the murderer gives the impression, by inflicting
many wounds of equal deadliness, that he wished to kill
an incalculable number of times.
   The Algerian kills for no reason. Very frequently magis­
trates and policemen are nonplused by the motives of a
murder; it may arise out of a gesture, an allusion, an
ambiguous statement, a quarrel over an olive tree which
is possessed in common, or an animal which has strayed by
an eighth of an acre. Confronted by such a murder, some­
times by a double or triple murder, the looked-for cause
and the expected motive which would justify or give
grounds for these murders in finally found to be of disap­
pointing triviality. From thence springs the frequent
impression that the social group is hiding the real motives.
    Finally, robbery as practiced by an Algerian is always
 coupled with housebreaking whether accompanied or not
by manslaughter, and in any case with aggression against
 the owner.
    All these elements which cluster around Algerian crim­
 inality have appeared to specify its nature sufficiently
 clearly to enable a tentative systematization to be built up.
    Similar though somewhat less weighty observations were
 made in Tunisia and Morocco; and thus the question
   * In fact we know that Islam forbids its followers to eat meat
unless they are sure that the animal has been drained of its blood.
This is why the animals' throats are cut.


shifted more and more onto the ground of North African
criminality. For over thirty years, under the constant
direction of Professor Porot, professor of psychiatry on the
faculty of Algiers, several teams worked with the aim of
specifying the forms of expression of this criminality and
of establishing a sociological, functional, and anatomical
interpretation for them.
   W e shall here quote the main works on this subject by
the psychiatric school of the faculty of Algiers. The con­
clusions of the researches carried on for over twenty years
were, let us recall to mind, the subject of authoritative
lectures from the Chair of Psychiatry.
   It is thus that Algerian doctors who are graduates of
the faculty of Algiers are obliged to hear and learn that
the Algerian is a born criminal. Moreover, I remember
certain among us who in all sincerity upheld and devel­
oped these theories that we had learned. W e even add
"It's a hard pill to swallow, but it's been scientifically
established."
   The North African is a criminal; his predatory instinct
is well known; his intense aggressivity is visible to the
naked eye. The North African likes extremes, so we can
never entirely trust him. Today he is the best of friends,
tomorrow the worst of enemies. He is insensible to shades
of meaning, and Cartesianism is fundamentally foreign
to him; the sense of balance, the weighing and pondering
of an opinion or action clashes with his most intimate
nature. The North African is a violent person, of a heredi­
tary violence. W e find him incapable of self-discipline,
or of canalizing his impulses. Yes, the Algerian is a con­
genital impulsive.
   But we must be precise. This impulsiveness is largely
aggressive and generally homicidal. It is in this fashion
that we come to explain the unorthodox behavior of the
Algerian who is a prey to melancholia. The French psy-


chiatrists in Algeria found themselves faced with a difficult
problem. They were accustomed when dealing with a
patient subject to melancholia to fear that he would com­
mit suicide. Now the melancholic Algerian takes to kill­
ing. This illness of the moral consciousness, which is al­
ways accompanied by auto-accusation and auto-destructive
tendencies, took on in the case of Algerians hetero-
destructive forms. The melancholic Algerian does not
commit suicide. He kills. This is the homocidal melan­
cholia which has been thoroughly studied by Professor
Porot in the thesis of his pupil Monserrat.
   How did the Algerian school deal with such an anom­
aly? First, said the school of Algiers, killing oneself is a
turning into and against oneself; it implies looking at
oneself; it means practicing introspection. Now the Alge­
rian is not given to an inner life. There is no inner life
where the North African is concerned. On the contrary,
the North African gets rid of his worries by throwing
himself on the people who surround him. He does not
analyze. Since by definition melancholia is an illness of
the moral conscience it is clear that the Algerian can only
develop pseudo-melancholia, since the precariousness of
his conscience and the feebleness of his moral sense are
well known. This incapacity on the part of the Algerian
 to analyze a situation and to organize a mental panorama
 is perfectly understandable if we refer to the two classes
 of causality set forth by French writers.
    First we must notice intellectual aptitudes. The Algerian
 is strongly marked by mental debility. If we are to really
 understand this datum we must go back to the semiology
 established by the Algerian school of psychiatry. The
 native, it is stated by them, presents the following
 characteristics:
    Complete or almost complete lack of emotivity.
    Credulous and susceptible to the extreme.


   Persistent obstinacy.
   Mental puerility, without the spirit of curiosity found
in the Western child.
   Tendency to accidents and pithiatic reactions.*
   The Algerian does not see the whole of a question. The
questions he asks himself always concern the details and
exclude all synthesis. He is a pointillist, clinging to objects,
lost in details, insensible to ideas, and impervious to con­
cepts. Verbal expression is reduced to a minimum. His
actions are always impulsive and aggressive. He is inca­
pable of grasping detail when looking at the whole, and he
absolutizes the element and takes the part for the whole.
Thus, he will have total reactions when confronted with
particular incitements and with insignificant causes such
as a fig tree, a gesture, or a sheep on his land. His con­
genital aggressivity finds ways of expressing itself on the
slightest pretext. It is a state of aggressivity in its purest
form.t
   Leaving the descriptive stage, the Algiers school begins
on that of explanation. It was in 1935 at the Congress of
Mental Specialists and Neurologists that Professor Porot
defined the scientific bases of his theory. In the discussion
that followed the report by Baruk on hysteria, he pointed
out that "the native of North Africa, whose superior and
cortical activities are only slightly developed, is a primitive
creature whose life, essentially vegetative and instinctive,
is above all regulated by his diencephalon."
   * Professor A. Porot, Medico-psychological Annals.
   ■f In the mouth of the doyen of the judges of a court in Algeria,
this aggressivity on the part of the Algerian is expressed by his love
of the "fantastic." "We are wrong," he stated in 1955, "in believing
this whole revolt to be political. From time to time that love of a
scrimmage that they have has to come out!" For the ethnologist, the
establishment of a series of tests and projective games which would
have canalized the global aggressive instincts of the native would
have had in 1955-56 the power to bring the revolution in Aures to
an end.
01

   In order to estimate the importance of this discovery of
Professor Porofs, we should remember that the character­
istic of the human species when compared to other verte­
brates is that it is corticalized. The diencephalon is one
of the most primitive parts of the brain and man is above
all the vertebrate in which the cortex dominates.
   For Professor Porot, the life of the native of North
Africa is dominated by diencephalic urges. It is as much
as to say that in a way the native North African is
deprived of a cortex. Professor Porot does not shrink from
this contradiction and in April, 1939, in the Southern
Medical and Surgical Gazette he states precisely, in col­
laboration with his pupil Sutter who is at present professor
of psychiatry in Algiers: "Primitivism is not a lack of
maturity or a marked stoppage in the development of the
intellectual psychism. It is a social condition which has
reached the limit of its evolution; it is logically adopted
to a life different from ours." Finally, the professors come
 to the very basis of the doctrine:
   This primitivism is not merely a way of living which is the
result of a special upbringing; it has much deeper roots. We
even consider that it must have its substratum in a particular
predisposition of the architectonic structure, or at least in the
dynamic hierarchization of the nervous centers. We are in
the presence of a coherent body of comportment and of a
coherent life which can be explained scientifically. The Al­
gerian has no cortex: or, more precisely, he is dominated, like
the inferior vertebrates, by the diencephalon. The cortical
functions, if they exist at all, are very feeble, and are prac­
tically unintegrated into the dynamic of existence.
There is thus neither mystery nor paradox. The hesitation
of the colonist in giving responsibility to the native is
not racism nor paternalism, but quite simply a scientific
appreciation of the biologically limited possibilities of
the native.
 30

   Let us end this review by seeking a summing-up which
takes the whole of Africa for its field from Dr. A.
Carothers, an expert from the World Health Organisa­
tion. This international expert brought together the essen­
tials of his observations in a book which was published
in 1954.*
   Dr. Carothers' work was carried on in Central and East
Africa, but his conclusions form a group with those of
the North African school. For in fact the international
expert states: "The African makes very little use of his
frontal lobes. All the particularities of African psychiatry
can be put down to frontal laziness." t
   In order to make his point clearer, Dr. Carothers
establishes a lively comparison. He puts forward the idea
that the normal African is a 'lobotomized European."
We know that the Anglo-Saxon school believed that they
had found a radical cure for certain serious forms of
mental illness by practicing the section of an important
part of the brain. Since then, however, the esablishment
of the fact that this method seriously impaired the per­
sonality has led to its being abandoned. According to
Dr. Carothers, the likeness existing between the normal
African native and the lobotomized European is striking.
   Dr. Carothers, having studied the works of different
authors working in Africa, offers us a conclusion which is
 the basis of a uniform conception of the African. He
writes:
  Such are the given facts of the case which do not concern
European categories. They have been gathered in different
regions of East, West, and South Africa, and on the whole
each author had little or no knowledge of the work of the
  * A. Carothers, "Normal and Pathological Psychology of the
African," Ethno-psychiatric Studies ( E i Masson).
  t Op. cit., p. 176.
03

others. The essential similarity of these researches is there­
fore quite remarkable.*
   We should point out before concluding that Dr.
Carothers defined the Mau-Mau revolt as the expression
of an unconscious frustration complex whose reoccurrence
could be scientifically avoided by spectacular psychological
adaptations.
   So it was that unusual behavior—the African's frequent
criminality, the triviality of his motives, the murderous
and always very bloody nature of his brawls—raised a
problem in observers' minds. The proposed explanation,
which has come to be taught as a subject in the universi­
ties, seems in the last analysis to be the following: the
layout of the cerebral structures of the North African are
responsible both for the native's laziness, for his intellec­
tual and social inaptitude and for his almost animal impul-
sivity. The criminal impulses of the North African are
the transcription into the nature of his behavior of a given
arrangement of the nervous system. It is a reaction which
is neurologically understandable and written into the
nature of things, of the thing which is biologically organ­
ized. The lack of integration of the frontal lobes in the
 cerebral dynamic is the explanation of the African's lazi­
 ness, of his crimes, his robberies, his rapes, and his lies.
It was a sub-prefect who has now become a prefect who
voiced the conclusion to me: "We must counter these
 natural creatures," he said, "who obey the laws of their
 nature blindly, with a strict, relentless ruling class. We
 must tame nature, not convince it." Discipline, training,
 mastering, and today pacifying are the words most fre­
 quently used by the colonialists in occupied territories.
   If we have spent a long time in going over the theories

  * Op. tit., p. 178.
 30

held by colonialist scientists, it was less with the intention
of showing their poverty and absurdity than of raising a
very important theoretical and practical problem. In fact,
Algerian criminality only represented a sub-section of the
questions which were raised by the revolution, which could
be reasoned out on the level of political discussion and
de-mystification. But it so happens that the talks which
formed the subject of this theme were so fruitful that they
allowed us to understand and discern more deeply the
idea of social and individual liberation. When in revolu­
tionary practice the question of Algerian criminality is
raised in the presence of leaders and militants, when the
average figures of crimes, misdemeanors, and robberies are
cited for the period before the revolution, when it is
explained that the nature of a crime or the frequency of
offenses depends on the relations which exist between
men and women and between persons and the state, and
when everybody understands this; when we see before us
the breaking-up of the idea of the Algerian or the North
African who is a criminal by vocation, an idea which was
equally implanted into the consciousness of the Algerian
because after all "we're a quick-tempered, rowdy, bad lot;
that's the way it is": then it can be said for sure that
the revolution is making progress.
   The important theoretical problem is that it is neces­
sary at all times and in all places to make explicit, to
de-mystify, and to harry the insult to mankind that exists
in oneself. There must be no waiting until the nation
has produced new men; there must be no waiting until
men are imperceptibly transformed by revolutionary proc­
esses in perpetual renewal. It is quite true that these
two processes are essential, but consciousness must be
helped. The application of revolutionary theory, if it is
to be completely liberating and particularly fruitful, exacts
that nothing unusual should exist. One feels with particu-
05

lar force the necessity to totalize the event, to draw
everything after one, to settle everything, to be responsi­
ble for everything. Now conscience no longer boggles at
going back into the past, or at marking time if it is neces­
sary. This is why in the progress made by a fighting unit
over a piece of ground the end of an ambush does not
mean rest, but rather is the signal for consciousness to
take another step forward, for everything ought to keep
pace together.
   Yes, the Algerian of his own accord accepts the verdict
of the magistrates and the policemen.* So we had to take
this Algerian criminality which was experienced on the
narcissistic level as a manifestation of authentic virility,
and place the problem on the level of colonial history.
For example, we had to show that the criminal tendencies
of Algerians in France differed fundamentally from those
of the Algerians who were submitted to exploitation which
was directly colonial.
   A second thing ought to be noticed: in Algeria, Algerian
 criminality takes place in practice inside a closed circle.
 The Algerians rob each other, cut each other up, and kill
 each other. In Algeria, the Algerian rarely attacks French­
 men, and avoids brawls with the French. In France, on
 the other hand, the emigrant creates an intersocial and
 intergroup criminality.
    In France, Algerian criminality is diminishing. It is
 directed especially at the French, and its motives are

   * It is moreover clear that this identification with the image pic­
ture produced by the European was very ambivalent. In fact the
European seemed to be paying homage—an equally ambivalent
homage—to the violent, passionate, brutal, jealous, proud, arrogant
Algerian who stakes his life on a detail or on a word. We should
point out in passing that in their dealings with the French of
France, the Europeans of Algeria tend to identify themselves more
and more with this image of the Algerian in opposition to the
French.
 30

 radically new. A certain paradox has helped us consider­
 ably in de-mystifying the militants: it has been established
 that since 1954 there has almost been a disappearance
of crimes in common law. There are no more disputes and
no longer any insignificant details which entail the death
of a man. There are no longer explosive outbursts of rage
because my wife's forehead or her left shoulder were seen
by my neighbor. The national conflict seems to have
canalized all anger, and nationalized all affective or
emotional movements. The French judges and barristers
had already observed this; but the militant had to be
made conscious of it; he had to be brought to understand
the reasons for it,
   It remains for us to give the explanation.
   Should it be said that war, that privileged expression
of an aggressivity which is at last made social, canalizes
in the direction of the occupying power all congenitally
murderous acts? It is a commonplace that great social
upheavals lessen the frequency of delinquency and mental
disorders. This regression of Algerian criminality can thus
be perfectly explained by the existence of a war which
broke Algeria in two, and threw onto the side of the
enemy the judicial and administrative machine.
   But in the countries of the Magrab which have already
been liberated this same phenomenon which was noticed
during the conflicts for liberation continues to exist and
even becomes more marked once independence is pro­
claimed. It would therefore seem that the colonial context
is sufficiently original to give grounds for a reinterpretation
of the causes of criminality. This is what we did for those
on active service. Today every one of us knows that
criminality is not the consequence of the hereditary
character of the Algerian, nor of the organization of his
nervous system. The Algerian war, like all wars of national
liberation, brings to the fore the true protagonists. In the
07

colonial context, as we have already pointed out, the
natives fight among themselves. They tend to use each
other as a screen, and each hides from his neighbor the
national enemy. When, tired out after a hard sixteen-hour
day, the native sinks down to rest on his mat, and a child
on the other side of the canvas partition starts crying and
prevents him from sleeping, it so happens that it is a little
Algerian. When he goes to beg for a little semolina or
a drop of oil from the grocer, to whom he already owes
some hundreds of francs, and when he sees that he is
refused, an immense feeling of hatred and an overpower­
ing desire to kill rises within him: and the grocer is an
Algerian. When, after having kept out of his way for
weeks he finds himself one day cornered by the caid who
demands that he should pay "his taxes," he cannot even
enjoy the luxury of hating a European administrator;
 there before him is the caid who is the object of his
hatred—and the caid is an Algerian.
     The Algerian, exposed to temptations to commit mur­
 der every day—famine, eviction from his room because
 he has not paid the rent, the mother's dried-up breasts,
 children like skeletons, the building-yard which has closed
 down, the unemployed that hang about the foreman like
 crows—the native comes to see his neighbor as a relentless
  enemy. If he strikes his bare foot against a big stone
  in the middle of the path, it is a native who has placed
  it there; and the few olives that he was going to pick,
  X—'s children have gone and eaten in the night. For
  during the colonial period in Algeria and elsewhere many
  things may be done for a couple of pounds of semolina.
  Several people may be killed over it. You need to use
  your imagination to understand that: your imagination,
   or your memory. In the concentration camps men killed
   each other for a bit of bread. I remember one horrible
   scene. It was in Oran in 1944. From the camp where we
 30

were waiting to embark, soldiers were throwing bits of
bread to little Algerian children who fought for them
among themselves with anger and hate. Veterinary doctors
can throw light on such problems by reminding us of the
well-known "peck order" which has been observed in
farmyards. The com which is thrown to the hens is in
fact the object of relentless competition. Certain birds,
the strongest, gobble up all the grains while others who
are less aggressive grow visibly thinner. Every colony tends
to turn into a huge farmyard, where the only law is that
of the knife.
   In Algeria since the beginning of the war of national
liberation, everything has changed. The whole foodstocks
of a family or a mechta* may in a single evening be given
to a passing company. The family's only donkey may be
lent to transport a wounded fighter; and when a few days
later the owner learns of the death of his animal which
has been machine-gunned by an airplane, he will not
begin threatening and swearing. He will not question the
death of his donkey, but he will ask anxiously if the
wounded man is safe and sound.
   Under the colonial regime, anything may be done for
a loaf of bread or a miserable sheep. The relations of man
with matter, with the world outside, and with history are
in the colonial period simply relations with food. For a
colonized man, in a context of oppression like that of
Algeria, living does not mean embodying moral values or
taking his place in the coherent and fruitful development
of the world. To live means to keep on existing. Every
date is a victory: not the result of work, but a victory
felt as a triumph for life. Thus to steal dates or to allow
one's sheep to eat the neighbor's grass is not a question of
the negation of the property of others, nor the transgres-

   Mountain village in Algeria.—Trans.
09

sion of a law, nor lack of respect. These are attempts at
murder. In order to understand that a robbery is not an
illegal or an unfriendly action, but an attempt at murder,
one must have seen in Kabylia men and women for weeks
at a time going to get earth at the bottom of the valley
and bringing it up in little baskets. The fact is that the only
perspective is that belly which is more and more sunken,
which is certainly less and less demanding, but which must
be contented all the same. W h o is going to take the
punishment? The French are down in the plain with the
police, the army, and the tanks. On the mountain there
are only Algerians. Up above there is Heaven with the
promise of a world beyond the grave; down below there
are the French with their very concrete promises of prison,
beatings-up, and executions. You are forced to come up
against yourself. Here we discover the kernel of that
hatred of self which is characteristic of racial conflicts in
segregated societies.
    The Algerian's criminality, his impulsivity, and the
 violence of his murders are therefore not the consequence
 of the organization of his nervous system or of char-
 acterial originality, but the direct product of the colonial
 situation. The fact that the soldiers of Algeria have dis­
 cussed this problem; that they are not afraid of question­
 ing the beliefs fostered among themselves by colonialism;
 that they understand that each man formed the screen for
 his neighbor and that in reality each man committed
 suicide when he went for his neighbor: all these things
 should have primordial importance in the revolutionary
 conscience. Once again, the objective of the native who
 fights against himself is to bring about the end of domina­
 tion. But he ought equally to pay attention to the liquida­
  tion of all untruths implanted in his being by oppression.
  Under a colonial regime such as existed in Algeria, the
  ideas put forward by colonialism not only influenced the


European minority, but also the Algerians. Total libera­
tion is that which concerns all sectors of the personality.
The ambush or the attack, the torture or the massacre of
his brothers plants more deeply the determination to win,
wakes up the unwary and feeds the imagination. When
the nation stirs as a whole, the new man is not an a
posteriori product of that nation; rather, he co-exists with
it and triumphs with it. This dialectic requirement ex­
plains the reticence with which adaptations of coloniza­
tion and reforms of the facade are met. Independence is
not a word which can be used as an exorcism, but an
indispensable condition for the existence of men and
women who are truly liberated, in other words who are
truly masters of all the material means which make pos­
sible the radical transformation of society.
                    CONCLUSION


Come, then, comrades; it would be as well to decide at
once to change our ways. We must shake off the heavy
darkness in which we were plunged, and leave it behind.
The new day which is already at hand must find us firm,
prudent, and resolute.
  W e must leave our dreams and abandon our old beliefs
and friendships from the time before life began. Let us
waste no time in sterile litanies and nauseating mimicry.
Leave this Europe where they are never done talking of
Man, yet murder men everywhere they find them, at the
comer of every one of their own streets, in all the corners
of the globe. For centuries they have stifled almost the
whole of humanity in the name of a so-called spiritual
experience. Look at them today swaying between atomic
and spiritual disintegration.
   And yet it may be said that Europe has been successful
in as much as everything that she has attempted has suc­
ceeded.
   Europe undertook the leadership of the world with
ardor, cynicism, and violence. Look at how the shadow of
 her palaces stretches out ever further! Every one of her
 movements has burst the bounds of space and thought.
 Europe has declined all humility and all modesty; but she
                            311


 has also set her face against all solicitude and all tender­
 ness.
    She has only shown herself parsimonious and niggardly
 where men are concerned; it is only men that she has killed
 and devoured.
    So, my brothers, how is it that we do not understand
 that we have better things to do than to follow that same
Europe?
   That same Europe where they were never done talking
 of Man, and where they never stopped proclaiming that
they were only anxious for the welfare of Man: today we
know with what sufferings humanity has paid for every
one of their triumphs of the mind.
   Come, then, comrades, the European game has finally
ended; we must find something different. W e today can
do everything, so long as we do not imitate Europe, so
long as we are not obsessed by the desire to catch up with
Europe.
   Errope now lives at such a mad, reckless pace that she
has shaken off all guidance and all reason, and she is run­
ning headlong into the abyss; we would do well to avoid
it with all possible speed.
   Yet it is very true that we need a model, and that we
want blueprints and examples. For many among us the
European model is the most inspiring. W e have therefore
seen in the preceding pages to what mortifying setbacks
such an imitation has led us. European achievements,
European techniques, and the European style ought no
longer to tempt us and to throw us off our balance.
   When I search for Man in the technique and the style
of Europe, I see only a succession of negations of man,
and an ava^nche of murders.
   The human condition, plans for mankind, and collab­
oration between men in those tasks which increase the


sum total of humanity are new problems, which demand
true inventions.
   Let us decide not to imitate Europe; let us combine our
muscles and our brains in a new direction. Let us try to
create the whole man, whom Europe has been incapable
of bringing to triumphant birth.
   Two centuries ago, a former European colony decided to
catch up with Europe. It succeeded so well that the
United States of America became a monster, in which the
taints, the sickness, and the inhumanity of Europe have
grown to appalling dimensions.
   Comrades, have we not other work to do than to create
a third Europe? The West saw itself as a spiritual adven­
ture. It is in the name of the spirit, in the name of the
spirit of Europe, that Europe has made her encroach­
ments, that she has justified her crimes and legitimized
the slavery in which she holds the four-fifths of humanity.
   Yes, the European spirit has strange roots. All European
thought has unfolded in places which were increasingly
more deserted and more encircled by precipices; and thus
it was that the custom grew up in those places of very
seldom meeting man.
   A permanent dialogue with oneself and an increasingly
obscene narcissism never ceased to prepare the way for a
half delirious state, where intellectual work became suffer­
ing and the reality was not at all that of a living man,
working and creating himself, but rather words, different
combinations of words, and the tensions springing from
the meanings contained in words. Yet some Europeans
were found to urge the European workers to shatter this
narcissism and to break with this unreality.
   But in general, the workers of Europe have not replied
to these calls; for the workers believe, too, that they are
part of the prodigious adventure of the European spirit


   All the elements of a solution to the great problems of
humanity have, at different times, existed in European
 thought. But the action of European men has not carried
 out the mission which fell to them, and which consisted of
bringing their whole weight violently to bear upon these
 elements, of modifying their arrangement and their nature,
 of changing them and finally of bringing the problem of
mankind to an infinitely higher plane.
   Today we are present at the stasis of Europe. Com­
rades, let us flee from this motionless movement where
gradually dialectic is changing into the logic of equilib­
rium. Let us reconsider the question of mankind. Let us
reconsider the question of cerebral reality and of the
cerebral mass of all humanity, whose connections must be
increased, whose channels must be diversified and whose
messages must be re-humanized.
   Come, brothers, we have far too much work to do for
us to play the game of rearguard. Europe has done what
she set out to do and on the whole she has done it well;
let us stop blaming her, but let us say to her firmly that
she should not make such a song and dance about it. W e
have no more to fear; so let us stop envying her.
   The Third World today faces Europe like a colossal
mass whose aim should be to try to resolve the problems
to which Europe has not been able to find the answers.
   But let us be clear: what matters is to stop talking about
output, and intensification, and the rhythm of work.
   No, there is no question of a return to Nature. It is
simply a very concrete question of not dragging men
toward mutilation, of not imposing upon the brain
rhythms which very quickly obliterate it and wreck it. The
pretext of catching up must not be used to push man
around, to tear him away from himself or from his privacy,
to break and kill him.
   No, we do not want to catch up with anyone. W h a t we


want to do is to go forward all the time, night and day,
in the company of Man, in the company of all men. The
caravan should not be stretched out, for in that case each
line will hardly see those who precede it; and men who no
longer recognize each other meet less and less together,
and talk to each other less and less.
    It is a question of the Third World starting a new his­
tory of Man, a history which will have regard to the some­
times prodigious theses which Europe has put forward, but
which will also not forget Europe's crimes, of which the
most horrible was committed in the heart of man, and
consisted of the pathological tearing apart of his functions
and the crumbling away of his unity. And in the frame­
work of the collectivity there were the differentiations, the
stratification, and the bloodthirsty tensions fed by classes;
and finally, on the immense scale of humanity, there were
racial hatreds, slavery, exploitation, and above all the
bloodless genocide which consisted in the setting aside of
fifteen thousand millions of men.
    So, comrades, let us not pay tribute to Europe by creat­
ing states, institutions, and societies which draw their
inspiration from her.
    Humanity is waiting for something from us other than
such an imitation, which would be almost an obscene
caricature.
    If we want to turn Africa into a new Europe, and
America into a new Europe, then let us leave the destiny
 of our countries to Europeans. They will know how to do
 it better than the most gifted among us.
    But if we want humanity to advance a step further, if
 we want to bring it up to a different level than that which
 Europe has shown it, then we must invent and we must
 make discoveries.
    If we wish to live up to our peoples' expectations, we
 must seek the response elsewhere than in Europe.


   Moreover, if we wish to reply to the expectations of the
people of Europe, it is no good sending them back a
reflection, even an ideal reflection, of their society and
their thought with which from time to time they feel
immeasurably sickened.
   For Europe, for ourselves, and for humanity, comrades,
we must turn over a new leaf, we must work out new
concepts, and try to set afoot a new man.


FRANTZ FANON      was born in 1925 on the island
of Martinique. He studied medicine in France,
specializing in psychiatry. When he was twenty-
seven, he published his first book, Black Skin,
"White Masks, telling of his observations as a
Black and psychiatrist in the Antilles.
   During the French-Algerian war, Fanon was
assigned to a hospital in Algeria and soon found
his sympathies to be with the rebels. Out of his
experiences came two further works, L'An V de
la Revolution Algerienne (published in English
as A Dying Colonialism), and this volume. In
1961 it was discovered that he was suffering from
cancer. He was brought to Washington too late
for medical care, and died there in December, at
the age of thirty-six.
